2
LETTERS FROM KALEIDAVILLE
IN
THE OLD PURCHASE.
LETTER I.
Dear Charles
,You insist that I am an incorrigible
skeptic, and seem inclined to deliver me over to the secular
arm. What! say you, shall we disbelieve the evidence
of the senses, and the testimony of reputable citizens?
What, you triumphantly ask, can be more satisfactory
than experiments, such as the citizens of Somewhersburg
have lately witnessed?men, and even young
women
(!)
rendered
incapable of speaking! and a very mercurial dancing
master arrested at the mere will of the mesmerist, and
made to stand as if petrified, in the act of cutting a
pigeon-wing
!
You tell me, also, that your judges, lawyers, and even
clergymen
, begin to be convinced that phrenology and
mesmerism
have something in them; and that at your
special
desire the clairvoyant was led to Kaleidaville, where she
saw, in a kind of a place, a remarkable looking gentleman
with something like a feather or something else in his
fingers
,
or somewhere near him;in which very lucid
description
you at once recognized your humble servant,and
that without doubt the lady saw me writing a letter!
Very near the truth this, Charles, for on the identical
night I certainly was in a kind of place, being at a
phrenological
lecture; and at the earnest request of the company,
I did consent to sit for my phrenology! It is certainly a
most delightful art, and does one as well as a flattering
mirror
.
Whether the head-fumbler had previously ascertained
my character, or whether struck with my appearance and
port, is uncertain: but he made so decided a hit, as to draw
forth the applause of the company, and
tickle
my vanity not
a little. And then the said lecturer did unhesitatingly
declare
,
what every body already knew, that my developments
showed the author, and that I certainly must have written
one book at least, and would doubtless write another! Your
clairvoyant came very near seeing a feather, or something
like one.
But notwithstanding this admission, and that I did then
and there see some marvellous sights with my own natural
eyes; as, for example, several interesting young men nailed
to the wall, by the tips of their forefingers, with their eyes
open and yet asleep; also three or four magnetized
personages
go off quick as a percussion cap, the instant their bumps
were judiciously touched by a proper wand; and, although
I did moreover distinctly see a set to, in which the
combatants
could not hit each others' faces, while they did most
desperately aim to do so, coming indeed so near, that one of
the parties
did
flinch(which, by the way, was contrary to
rule, as the youngsters were supposed to know nothing of the
external world all the time)and, although a very modest
young lady did prophesy in her sleep(
modest
, I say,
because
she only did such things in company when not exactly
herself)and did prescribe medicines, and visit the fixed
stars, and disclose more wonders than the man in the great
moon-hoax ever saw; and, although Mr. John Smith, whom
all know, and deacon Goodman, and the Rev. Persuasive
Creditworthy, all testified to the unimpeachable character of
the illuminati, and all by acclamation voted the whole no
humbugI remain a skeptic! and as to this subject, like
Gibbon on another, entrench myself behind the skeptic's
impregnable barriersuspicion.
The fact is, I seemed so tickled and looked so stupid and
silly during the search after my developments, that the wise
man never discovered my doubting-organa real Mont
Blanc amidst my other pigmy cranial protuberancesfor I
have felt it myself: hence I am a born doubter, even as
many are
natural
believers of these modern wonders; and
like them I merit neither praise nor blame for my
propensity
,
as I cannot help it.
Nor am I quite so unphilosophical as you hint; because,
in accordance with the Baconian rule, if I find one cause
sufficient to account for the phenomena, I am excused from
looking for others. But this cause I do find in man's
perverse
love of imposition, whether in its active or passive
sense; for in certain matters men love no less to be
deceived
than to deceive: and in such cases the deceivers and
deceived will, on the one side, scruple at no contrivance and
artifice, and, on the other, will yield readily to any specious
trickery. This holds, all the way from popish miracle down
to mormonism and mesmerism, including cures from
galvanized
rings and watch-keys, and magnetized cough-drops,
and by water processes both hot and cold. At all events,
Charles, I find it easier to admit the belief of trickery than
to call absurdity and impossibility, truth: and so, if you
will
call me incorrigible, I answerfeel my organ.
As to your reiterated argument that the brain is the
special
seat and house of the soul, I
doubt
. If I believe at all
here, I rather incline to say with Professor Bush that the
soul is not like a bird in a cage but water in a sponge. In
this way, it is manifest that the soul can more conveniently
on some occasions be
absorbed;
although it is possible that
men of
little souls
have the article confined to the head.
Time was when qualities both moral and intellectual
were deemed resident in different quarters or parts of the
body, as for instance in the breast and bowels; and popular
opinion was then equally good authority and guide for
systems
of mental and moral developments from exterior signs.
Nay, to this very hour we all speak of
good hearts
morally,
as of
sound heads
intellectually; and my own consciousness
persuades me, not infrequently, by certain motions and
emotions
within my chest and parts adjacent, which movements
both precede and follow certain mental states, that my
spiritual
part is as really present there, as in my head. This,
too, is countenanced by the popular mode of praising
generous
men by naming them
all
heart and soul
whole
-souled
fellowsand fellows that
feel
all over.
Hence, I do verily believe that a system of moral and
mental philosophy, indicated by external signs, may be
constructed
,
as ingenious, as honest, and equally popular,
truth-like
,
and successful as the reigning system. The new one
shall rest on the shape, size, tension, relaxation, flaccidity of
the chest, and the size of the breast, the palpitation of the
heart; and it shall set forth what food and exercise shall
have the proper tendency to the development of the signs,
and by consequence to the development of a good conscience,
and the largest charity. At first sight, the proposed system
is not a whit more worthy of contempt, than the old, which is
built on the shape of a skull, or the size of its swellings, or
the hardness and softness of the bone: and as to seeming
facts, the new would, in three months, outnumber the other
system.
Science would, perhaps, fumble for its data, even more
in the dark than it does now; but the great advantage would
arise that we should be delightfully
tickled
into the
knowledge
of our virtues andvices.
However, I must not get too deep, lest, being dubbed
philosopher
,
I lose the credit of obeying my natural bumps.
In my next, expect, Charles, some narrations showing the
influence of imagination; in which will be seen that the
truth
in here at Kaleidaville, is strange as your
fiction
out
there at Somewhersburg.
Yours ever,
R.
Carlton
.
LETTER II.
Dear Charles
,Many years ago there lived in our
beautiful village a very respectable family called Dorson.
Its members were intelligent, and for the times well
educated
;
and their circle of acquaintance comprised the best
families. One thing, however, greatly marred their
happiness
.
The eldest child, a young lady of engaging manners,
affectionate heart, and pious spirit, became, on her approach
to maturity, a prey to a strange disease that baffled all skill
of the physician, and threatened to lay her in an early grave.
She received the information of her speedy death with
no alarm, and calmly prepared to obey the summons, which
at any moment, was likely to call her home. The family,
however, could not so easily consent to part with this beloved
daughter, and, hoping against hope, were prepared to deceive
themselves, and were also willing to be deceived with
expectation
of cure from any strange, mysterious, or even
supernatural
source. They were, indeed, honest; yet desire obscured
the perception of truth, and invested falsehood with its
semblance
.
Perhaps truth was secretly disliked, and that would
make even error pleasing: for we
do
believe as we wish.
In this state of mind the affectionate family, consisting of
the parents and several brothers and sisters, were, a few days
after the sentence of the medical friend was pronounced, all
standing around the bed, and gazing with broken hearts on
the emaciated face of the dying girl, when suddenly the
window of the room, that opened into a piazza, was darkened
by the apparition of a strange man. He was apparently a
beggar, uncouth in his figure, and wrapped in a tattered and
filthy cloak; destitute of hat and shoes, his hair matted, and
his dirt-begrimed face illumined by two fierce and fiery
eyes.
Raising the sash, in a sharp voice he demanded,
What is the matter with this girl?
She is dying! replied the astonished friends.
Dying! yes, so she isbut I can cure her, replied
the mendicant; and at the same time passing to the door, he,
uninvited, entered the room.
The afflicted party, willing not only to catch at any straw
of hope, but even to create one, and imagining they
discerned
something mysterious in the sudden appearance of this
squalid beggar, eagerly asked if he really could do what he
had said, and voluntarily offered to reward him liberally if
he would give life to the dying.
Yes, said the fellow, I
can
cure her, and all I ask as
pay isone quart of whisky.
To be sure, Charles, this reward was asked long before
the temperance era, yet it must seem strange, to all having
little or no acquaintance with facts illustrative of our love of
deception where we wish to be deceived, that the Dorsons, a
family who in other circumstances would probably have
instantly
turned such an insolent intruder into the street, did
not only allow him to try his jugglery, but agreed to pay his
price!
It was determined, however, to ask the permission of the
family physician, the friends not fearing that, as he had
pronounced
the case hopeless, any objection on his part would
be urged.
Beyond measure amazed at the folly of the proposal, it
for the first suddenly occurred to his mind, that as so much
imagination belonged to the parents, possibly the disease of
the patient was imaginary: and as all had faith enough to
be healed in
any
way, he resolved to anticipate the beggar,
and save the family from the ridicule his preposterous
attempt
might bring upon them. The physician, therefore,
assuming a mysterious air, and looking very intently on the
patient said, in a confident tone,
Mary! I think I can cure you,but the means are
strange,will you make the trial?
Can you indeed cure her? doctor, replied all.
YesI think soindeed I am confident; I now
understand
the caseyes, I have the remedy.
Well, Charles, the physician went to his office, and in
due time returned with the medicine. Standing by the bed,
and in the presence of the anxious friends, taking a small
box from his pocket, he thus addressed the patient:
Mary! you are a religious young woman, and happily
in possession of a Christian's hope; death to you, therefore,
as we all believe, can only be gain. Indeed, I well know
you are not afraid to die, and that for some time you have
even been desirous to go to your Heavenly Father. Now,
Mary, I have in this box three pills, and you must take them
exactly as I prescribe, and the effects will follow precisely
as I tell you. In all human probability, after you have
taken the pills, you will be cured,but if not, you will
instantly
die. If you do not take the pills at all, you will die,
but perhaps not quite so soonwhat do you say? Are you
ready for the trial?
A deep and solemn silence now reigned in the chamber,
broken by an occasional sob of some anguished heart, in
that group of agitated friends; in the midst of which Mary
calmly and faintly replied to the physician's proposal, I am
ready!
Well then, replied the physician, take this smallest
pill and swallow it; if you are to live you will, in about half
an hour, feel as if the pain in your hip was falling down your
thigh: then, quick as possible swallow the largest pill. But
if the pain after the first pill does not go down, you need not
take the second one. If you take, however, the second after
the favorable symptom of the first, you will pretty soon find
the pain going still lower towards your kneeand that very
instant swallow the middle-sized pill, when the pain will
seem to shoot from your foot like a bullet, and thenyou are
cured!
The doctor now took his leave, as other patients awaited
his attendance, promising, however, to return in a few hours,
when he confidently expected, as he said, to see Mary
restored
to health.
In two hours the physician returned, and was instantly
overwhelmed with bursts of gratitude and wondering
exclamations
by the whole family, who fairly carried him into the
girl's chamber; and there, sure enough, she sat smiling and
talking, and eager to give her beloved physician a minute
account of her almost miraculous cure.
Yes, doctor, said she, it was just as you predicted;
after the first pill, in
less
than half an hour I distinctly
perceived
something moving about an inch downward, as if the
hip bone were sinking; but directly after the second pill, it
fell away below my kneeand then when I quickly
swallowed
the third pill, the whole went right out of my toe, and
I felt I was cured!
And, Charles, she
staid
cured, and that for many years;
and this miracle, far surpassing any mesmeric or even popish
miracle, was owing to the most potent energy of
three
wheat bread pills!
Yours ever,
R.
Carlton
.
LETTER III.
Dear Charles
,And so you sneer at the bread pills,
as mere stuff! and ask me to account for the wonders of your
phreno-mesmerist! But, sir, do you account for the efficacy of
the pills, and then I pledge myself to account for your amazing
fact, that the young man of good character did, in a
mesmeric
sleep, go to Miss Prude's chamber, and actually
describe
on the toilet a something like an enormous sausage,
swollen in the middle, with tails at each end like tape-worms;
and when Miss Prude indignantly denied all knowledge of
such a monster being in her room when she left for the
lecture
,
Miss Foril, the milliner, rose and modestly begged
leave to say, that `calling at Miss Prude's and finding her
out, she had left on her table a
new tournure!
' And is
not
that
, you triumphantly ask, demonstration palpable,
visible?
But, Charles, is it very wonderful that a clairvoyant, even
if but half asleep, should think he saw a sausage affair
in a lady's dressing-room? The wonder is he should see
any thing else; for the whole female world is nearly
encompassed
inbustle. And, moreover, I do stoutly maintain
that it is, for me at least, easier to believe that the young
man of good character had made an arrangement with
Miss Foril to call and leave the article, than to believe his
spirit went forth from his body on a bustle-hunt! Neither
nature nor science can be so essentially impertinent.
When clairvoyants reveal where treasure is hid, or
murdered
victims are buried; where are springs of water or
mines of gold, or tell about the spiritual worldwhy in such
sort of matters we can give in to the deception; we are
willing
to be deceived, for after all, the clairvoyant sees no more
than a thousand waking dreamers see and believe every day,
nor half so much as some learned and philosophic
religionists
see even now, and believe:but that the spirit of a
man
should be let out, and sent to pry into a lady's bed-chamber,
and tell where her slippers lie, or something like a long
and hollow leather something,bah! Clarence, you can't
be such a dunce.
Come, I will tell you another story, but alas! not with an
ending like the first.
Some twenty years since, and within fifty miles of
Kaleidaville
,
lived a man known as the Indian Doctor. He did
not, however, confine himself to a mere herbal practice, but
he professed, in all cases where it was impossible or
inconvenient
for patients to come to his house, that he was able to
cure, even without a prescription, all sick persons who would
2*
believe in his power and give him in a letter a description of
the complaint, with their real name, precise age, and their
height and complexion; and incredible as some may deem
it, cures, or seeming cures, were effected in this way.
Forty miles from the faith-doctor's residence, was a
substantial
farmer, whose wife, for many years, had been what
is often called ailing; and who, after in vain having tried
the regular doctors, prevailed on her husband to try
Doctor
Herbal. The husband consenting, on a certain day a
letter, properly written and with the fee inclosed, was handed
to the farmer's man, who, mounting his horse at the door,
set out on the journey. In the meanwhile the wife, wholly
unable to rise from her bed, on seeing the man ride away
with the letter, called her husband from the door to the
bedside
,
and thus addressed him:
Husband, when do you think John will reach the
doctor's
?
Well, Molly, answered he, I have ordered John to
ride exactly so many miles an hour, and making all
necessary
allowances for stops and so on, he will reach the
doctor's
to-morrow evening at sundown.
And then, husband, rejoined the wife, I shall be
curedI knowI feel it; yes, husband, as soon as the
doctor
reads and wills me to be cured, I shall get right up out
of this bed!
The morrow came, and just as the sun was setting, the
farmer's wife, to the utter amazement of the husband and
the whole family, did actually arise from her bed! and
relieved
,
too, from all her sickness and weakness! Nay, she
deliberately, and without aid, dressed herself and engaged
with cheerfulness in her domestic duties. Nor, from that
hour, did she take medicine, or complain of any pain or
disorder
.
Full six months elapsed, and then the wife, wishing to
celebrate her miraculous cure, made a feast, and invited her
numerous friends and neighbros, who, full of joy and
wonder
,
came. Never had the wife been apparently so well.
Her spirits were exuberant, and with a thankful heart, she
spoke of her recovery, and was loud in praise of the
wonderful
doctor and his miraculous cures. At this moment,
the kind husband, playfully and affectionately taking his
wife's hand, said:
Molly! I do believe you are, indeed, well; and we are
all happybut, wife, I cannot allow the deception to go any
furtherthe letter we wrote never went to the doctor's at
allJohn only staid out of the way for two or three days
and here is the letter now!
Rash man! I exclaimed, to the gentleman who knows
the incident to be true, and who related it to me; rash
man! he endangered her life!
Alas! replied my friend, you are but too correct in
this apprehension: the woman was on the very instant seized
with all her former symptoms; she took to her bed again,
and in ten days we laid her in the grave!
Yours ever,
R.
Carlton
.
LETTER IV.
Dear Charles
,Are you in earnest in defending
phrenomagnetism
?
Are you drawing me out merely? Surely
you will not insist on it, as argument conclusive, that good
and pious men believe and practise it; that we ought not
impertinently
(!) to propose experiments, but be content with
such manifestations as nature may be pleased
voluntarily
to
exhibit; that you yourself have witnessed the drawing of
teeth, the removing of tumors, and other surgical operations
on patients in the mesmerie state, &c.
My dear fellow, if good and pious men were never
weak; if such had never been deceived, and could not be
deceived; if old Adam were never too strong for young
Melancthon; I would give a more logical anwer to your
proton-pseudos. But come, sir, what have you to urge in
defence of witchcraft? Pray, did not good and pious
men, men of piety and intelligence, too, far transcending
the present good men, who think there is something in
mesmerism
,
did they not believe in witchcraft? Were they not
furnished with facts innumerable, incontrovertible, and
attested
under oath?
They themselves saw the possessed,
talked with them, watched with them, prayed with and
preached about them; alas! condemned some to
imprisonment
and death!
Why, Charles, the seeming facts in favor of witchcraft,
were a thousand-fold more numerous, and ten thousand times
better attested, than facts establishing our modern wonders;
and yet we very sapient men of the nineteenth century,
we
sneer at the Puritans! And you, brother, are a cool and
philosophic disbeliever in witches, readily ascribing all
wonders
in the by-gone era to delusion, and error, and weakness,
and malicious trickery, and yet you pretend to believe in
phrenology, and mesmerism, and clairvoyance! Oh!
consistency
,
and so forth!
Reverend sir, have you forgot the history of the golden
tooth? Wise, and scientific, and learned men saw the tooth
in the fellow's jaw with their own eyes, (whether the tooth
may have been in the jaw of an ass is not so clear, but we
know where the eyes must have been,) yes, saw it with their
own natural eyes, and then examined it with their spectacles
on, and afterwards went to work and set forth their opposite
theories to account for the
lusus natur
, in which was proved
the
possibility;
and then the
probability
of a man's having a
golden tooth! and yet, after all, the tooth proved to be a tooth
neatly covered with gold-leafgilded for the occasion!!
And, sir, are not the holy coats, and the bottles of blood,
and the thousand pieces of the true cross, and the heels of
Peter's sandals, and the hairs from the beards of Moses and
Aaron, and the specimens of the lice and flies sent to plague
Egyptare they not all believed in, and sworn to, and gazed
at, and worshipped, by professedly good men, and wise, and
learned? Yea, are not cures wrought by touching,
smelling
,
and even looking at the relies?
Charles, let men of your cloth not tamper with delusion
and trickery. Science, falsely so called, will sooner or later,
with cool impudence, account for the miracles of the Bible
on principles of frenzy-mesmerism, if the world can be
seduced
or deluded into admitting its principles; and you men
that are set for the defence of truth should not countenance
error.
And why will you, in so pitiful a way, entreat that we
shall not demand of mesmerism any other proof or
experiment
than its professors choose to allow? What!
Charley
,
shall Miss Martineau's entranced maid-servant tell of
the shipwreck of an hermaphrodite brig, with a cargo of rum,
ginger, and slate-pencils, and may we not ask her what has
become of the President? Be satisfied, say you, with such
developments as nature may be pleased voluntarily to
exhibit
,
and wait her time! Oh! shame, where is thy blush?
Charles, if you do persist in this sort of supereminent
nonsense
,
I will turn Diogenes in Lucian's dialogues, and
sing at you all the best classic
O tempora! O mores!
Pray, sir, what does nature give in philosophies, that
is not rigorously demanded from her? Is that not her own
law and will, that we must pertinaciously seek what she
conceals
?
And what principle in morals and science is true,
that flinches from the test of severe and rigorous
examination
?
Whatever here will not bear
torturing
is false.
Nature's
secrets are yielded only to the
rack:
and if
mesmerism
and its kindred fooleries are stretched tightly, and
twisted inquisitorily, they will yield up nothing but the ghost!
Animal magnetism, it is affirmed, is nothing new; and
claim is set up for an antiquity of many centuries. Why
then has it not made more progress in the world? Why is
its life spasmodie and periodical? Every thing in it is
agreeable to our nature; it gratifies our love of the
marvellous
,
our excited curiosity, our cupidity, our love of power,
of gold, of pleasure, of fame, of ambition. Nor has it lacked
determined advocates and enthusiastic disciples, who have
said it is true and it shall be true, and men must and shall
and will believe it. Steel pens, if not iron swords, have
been drawn in its defence;and it certainly needs
steel
in the pen as well as
brass
in the facebut still it only
marks time in its movement, rather than marches in the
world: for after the dust its occasional appearance raises is
scattered, there is mesmerism just where it was when Mark
Antony was mesmerized by the touch of Cleopatra, and ages
before that when Samson slumbered under the fascinations of
Delilah.
Now take a true science, and mark the difference. Take
electro-magnetism for instance. Does that skulk into a corner,
and in a sulky voice say, You needn't ask me any more
questions, for I shan't answer? Does that go before a
justice
of the peace and depose under oath, like a quack doctor
with some everlasting elixir of life, or some infallible
corn-plaster
,
with power, if all exerted, sufficient to pull the very
toe out of joint, and then and there swear that on a certain
night in Dark Alley, at No. 39, in the third story, it did
indeed
and double deed cure a fit of the wind colic? No,
sir; look at its open, manly countenanceit cannot stoop to
that. It asks not, like your New Purchase politicians, for
support to its character from certificates, and oaths, and
affidavits
:
but it comes into your house and keeps the hour,
and, twenty-four times every day,
strikes
conviction through
your eyes and ears. It plays between the galvanic piles before
your eyes for ever. It whirls about on the circumference of
a wheel and grinds your knives and scissors. It stretches
nerves of iron along your streets and across your fields and
over your houses; and by means of its invisible fiery ink it
thinks
your wishes for you a thousand miles away in a
moment
!
It ever stands in the public places and says to all
comers, Ask me what you like.
But that other thing has its nauseating tricks cut and dried
and calls them experiments! and its furnished answers,
and says they are developments! It is placarded like another
quackery, as from Paris or Londona sort of royal
corn-cutter
to majestyand a pimple eradicator to highness! And
keeps on swearing itself to be truethough it looks exactly
like a lie!
And what, if now and then a patient of a peculiar
temperament
,
be lulled by soothing words and looks,
peradventure
by subtle essences inhaled through the nostrils or
swallowed
by the throat; or who, by having the mind so absorbed
in contemplating something else, is comparatively insensible
to plain: for
that
is possible, and especially where the operator
is pre-eminently skilful and his instruments perfect! How
often, too, where we anticipate and dread an operation,
supposing
it necessarily to be very painful, and find it actually
much less than our expectations, how easily do we say the
pain was none? Why, Charles, you remember the tooth
pulled for me by the Hoosier doctor on Big Bear Wallow
Bottomdon't you know how I magnified the torture by
anticipation, and yet, it was so little in reality that I jumped
up and cried, Doctor, it did not hurt at all! Unlucky
fellow
,
why did he not mesmerize me beforehand?Falsehood
thus could have been established for truth; and he could
have emptied all the jaws and pockets in the Big Bear
Wallow
settlement!
I shall, however, conclude this
lengthy
letter by making
it a little
lengthier
with the addition of an incident or two.
Not long since, in this very village, a man had the artery
of his arm taken up and tiedan operation known to be
painful in general, but in this case uncommonly painful and
tedious; and yet, so quiet did he remain, with his eyes
closed, that some of the attendants said he was asleep, and
the operator himself feared he ahd fainted: but he was
neither asleep nor in a swoon, for he was wide awake!
Suppose our surgeon, knowing the man's character of
fortitude
,
had previously arranged with him the behaviour of one
mesmerized for an operation, how easy for even medical
bystanders
to have been deceived, and then to have given
certificates
to the world? And even learned and scientific
human nature will stoop to trickery for gold and glory.
We had, also, among us in by-gone days a poor creature
called Betsey Coblit; from the following incident, however,
better known as Bet Possum. Ashamed to beg openly, and
yet unwilling to work, she affected to be sickly: and in
this vocation so wrought on the sympathies of our good ladies,
as not only to be pitied and visited, but liberally supplied
with food and clothing. Desirous to ascertain how much she
was valued, poor Bet resolved to die. Hence, one sad
morning
,
the doctor was summoned in much haste to her house;
and on arriving was met at the door by several of the
sorrowing
ladies, or sisters of charity(for Protestants have
many such, though unincorporated)and with the
exclamation
,
Doctor, you are too late, poor Betsey is goneshe
has breathed her last!poor thing, we did all we couldbut
alas! she is gone!
The physician thought, however, he would take a kind
of professional look; and so he entered the chamber of
death. And sure enough there lay the poor creature, her
jaw fallen, her eyes half open and glassy, one hand on her
breast, and the other one extended towards the outer edge of
the bed. A lady was near who had been holding a
looking-glass
over the face of the deadbut in vain, its surface was
undimmed. From habit, our doctor took the arm that was
extended, and was in no small degree surprised to find a
pretty fair pulse with a regular beat!
He made no remark at this, nor even changed a feature,
but stepping to the table picked up a vial of liquid hartshorn,
and while the kind-hearted ladies stood around, some with
elevated and mourning eyebrowsothers with sad tears
falling
on their cheeksand others again audibly sobbing(for
poor Bet was no better than she should have been)the
doctor suddenly emptied the whole of the liquid into the open
mouth of the subject!
The explosion of combined coughsneezegaspand
strangled exclamation from poor Bet was really terrific:
and the astonishment of the company baffles description.
And so our heorine
acted
as well as a
mesmerized
woman
under the best artists could have done, and richly deserves
for ever to stand at the head of the Betsey Possums.
Yours ever,
R.
Carlton
.
LETTER V.
Dear Charles
,And could
you
remain a witness of
such a scene as described in your last, and not rebuke the
gross folly and impiety? Surely you need no argument
against insanity so monstrous or hypocrisy so diabolical!
Charles, there is a short way for us of dealing with all
such matters, and that is this: Let God be true and every
man a liar. When I am well satisfied that any seeming
science, with all its array of seeming fact and wonder and
miracle,
is
opposed to the Bible, I coolly and most
determinately
call it
a lie!
Its believers and advocates and
admirers
and professors, in return, may then call me what they
likea bigot, a fool, a fanatic, a poor dawdling nincompoop
unworthy the age, or worse.
Do they call on me to look at the evidence in its favor?
I say, No; what is opposed to the plain, obvious,
commonsense
view of the Scriptures,
can have no evidence
. This,
sir, is my philosophy, and this is all that can prevent us
plain folks from being blown about with every wind of
doctrine
.
For instance, I know there is a God. I know this
from reason, from revelation, from feeling. Now, when an
atheist comes into my neighborhood, I shun him as I would
hell
. He may be learned, and bland, and argumentative;
and he may offer to show me most cogent reasons for his
atheism, if I will only listen. But I will
not
listen: he is a
liar, and the truth is not, and
cannot
be in him. All this he
may deem obstinacy, discourteousness, and the like; and he
may regard me as priest-ridden, and as afraid of the devil;
and he may sneer at me, as led by faith and not by reason,
I am unmoved. I will not even
hear
him advance proof
of a lie.
Does any one, therefore, say, Mr. Carlton, do you not
believe that a person in the mesmeric trance can behold
things in the spiritual world?I interrupt him and say,
Begone. Does he offer me proof that the thing is
possible
?
I say, Get thee behind me, Satan. Does he then
become
angry, and call me agreeable names? I say, Bah!
Not only does Scripture assure me of the impossibility of
such things, but my whole reason revolts at the idea; and
from my very soul, I either pity the frightful delusion, or
abhor
the awful profanity.
Charles, clergyman as you are, I tremble at the
possibility
of your being caught in the snare, if you go into the
way of the tempter. Have not many professedly good men,
yea, have not several ministers of the gospel been utterly
befooled
by this outrageous nonsense? And what is usually
the result? Most neglect their clerical duties; and others
go wondering after the beast, till they get a mark to carry
with them to the grave. One, I am told, attributing all the
influences of religion to
mesmeric influence
, instead of a divine
influence, abjures not only his clerical character, but his
very christianity, and becomes an itinerant mountebank and
idler, selling phrenological charts and other gammons and
guzzles to the silly and the vain, while
one
aye, Uncle
Toby's recording angel would have dropped a tear in writing
it
one
, alas! noble and mighty in the intellectual and
theological
world,
thinks
he expects, by the wondrous disclosures
of mesmerism, to introduce a religion vastly more ethereal
and sublimated than that of the Old Church!
Animal
magnetism
it is, most truly,and of the earth, earthy!
Oh! Charles Clarence, the spirituality of the moral man
inwrought by a divine agent, is something measurelessly
different
from the
spirituel
of French vivacity, German
transcendentalism
,
poetic elevation, papistical fervor, or
Swedenborgian
vagaries. What pride and self-complacency is
that, which would make our refined earthly airiness equal,
or even superior to, a heaven-produced sanctification! Aye!
these profound and learned gentlemen sayBlockhead!
your skull is too thick, you do not understand uswe are too
deep for your sounding-linestick to your last. Granted,
learned masters,but if we understand the other, that is all
the light we cravewe know then that we are of the light,
and the world(in all its forms, and under all its names,)
is
in darkness.
If any animal magnetic fluid be abroad, it surely is of an
intoxicating nature; for many completely saturated do cut
strange antics, and perform wonderful somersets.
Do, dear Charles, never again countenance such
exhibitions
as tend to throw, directly or indirectly, discredit on our
holy religion. Amuse yourself, if you must, with the common
pawing
or
paw-wowing
of phreno-mesmerism, clairvoyance,
and the like:fumble about, in combed or uncombed hair,
for developmentsput friends into gentle slumbers, and then
draw their old snags or cut their cornsmake them tell, if
you can, where a pot of Kid's money is buriedor send
some well-travelled clairvoyant to Kaleidaville to see what
we may be a-doingor touch the sleepy people off, first on
one organ and then on another, till sparks of mental and
moral qualities are drawn from all the conductorsdo any
or all of these grave and solemn and dignified fooleries
but do not, my dear fellow, ever again, in any shape
whatever
,
have to do with pretended disclosures respecting the
Spirit Land.
Let me tell you something that has just happened about
seven miles from Kaleidaville.
A friend of mine whom I occasionally visit, not exactly
in a professional way, but pretty near it, has a sick wife;
and as she has for a long time been an invalid, he is very
naturally inclined to quack nostrums and the like, as he
despairs
of the regular treatment. For a long time, however,
he obstinately refused all proposals to try our village
mesmerist
and his clairvoyant; but, at long last, after earnest
persuasion on the part of his wife's relatives, he consented
that the couple should come, and in his presence prescribe
for the sick in the neighborhood; agreeing, if convinced of
the truth, that the grand medicine should prescribe for
his wife.
Well, the conjurer and his imp came. At first they
confined
themselves to the easier parts of the vocation; such as
describing the furniture in the room, and then venturing up
stairs and describing something square and flat against the
wall, with such oracular accuracy that it would answer for a
looking-glass, or a picture, or a box; then also something
longish and rather roundish like, hanging in a dark closet,
where certainly the parties never could have been, and
which compendious description would apply to a bag or a
breeches; till having got their hand in and the credulity of
the folks up to
believe-all point
, they ventured to peep into
the interior of several sick neighbors, brought thither for the
purpose.
With astonishing precision they told on which side was
liver and spleen, and the size and shape and situation of the
kidneysfinding in one a hole, in another something like a
worm, and in another something like gravel; then they
described
the involutions and evolutions, and, indeed, all the
crinclecumcrancle of the intestines; and how this man's
articles had a wrong twist, and that one's had alternate
layers
of unmentionable things packed within: and finally they
prescribed for the sufferers, in some cases, brandy and water
(like Miss Harriet's
seer
,)in some, three shads' heads and
two cats' tails boiled into a jelly, and to be taken ten
mornings
,
before breakfast; and, in one case of great danger,
the oil of forty weasels condensed and to be rubbed on the
part affected; till at last our friend, who was most essentially
bamboozled at the rattling fluency of the little sleeping
rascal
,
and his intimate acquaintance with his secret chambers
and the dark regions of the human frame, asked the
seer
if
he could tell any thing about Henry Gaddy?
Now said Gaddy, detected in certain criminal ways
several
years before, had been forced to make himself skerse in
these here diggins, and after wandering about in different
parts of the world for a long time, had been reported dead.
Here was an unexpected question; and certainly no
collusion
could have taken place between the mesmerist and the
clairvoyant; and yet the wonderful little fellow went on
without embarrassment and without delay: Gaddy!Oh!
I see a man a wanderin about!there he goesto France
I see him in EnglandOh! goodythere he's deadand
now I see him in
heaven!
My friend was convinced, and he resolved that next day
the
par nobile
should look into his wife, and see what
did
so
baffle the regular doctors. Well, the next morning bright
and early he went down to the Great River, a few rods from
his dwelling, and there met, coming from on board a small
coasting vessel, a manand that was
Henry Gaddy!
Charles, a malicious unbeliever would say the chaps told
a deliberate lie! It looked like itdidn't it?
Yours ever,
R.
Carlton
.
LETTER VI.
Dear Charles
,I still insist, with all due deference,
that human nature can do any thing, however base, wicked
or deceptious, to excite wonder, attract admiration, or get
money. Of this there is no more doubt with me than that
fire burns. Careful observers can recall innumerable
instances
to verify my remark. Not only every city and large
town, but every village and hamlet, and even every nook of our
retired settlements, has been repeatedly the theatre of the
grossest impositions. Indeed, one folly succeeds another,
just as fashions change; for men love variety in humbugs as
they do in dress: and humbugs have their artists as any
other pet of the public. Hence among us veteran doubters,
trick
is believed in preference, not only to impossibility, but
even improbability; and where folly is evident, we cannot
be induced even to examine pretension, unless to expose it.
For my part, Charles, I must say that the phrenological
and mesmeric tricks are vastly inferior, in amusement and
adroitness, to those of legerdemain. These latter have, in
reality
,
more the semblance of a supernatural character than
the others; and certainly they are more amazing.
Does your mesmerist triumphantly ask, Sir, will you
not believe your very senses? Did you not
see
that entranced
person stop at the order and stand like a statue? And
did you not
see
the other leap up and dance a hornpipe the
instant his organ of saltation was touched? And did you not
hear
that fellow squeal out when his ear was pinched at one
time and not at another, because the mesmerist so willed it
and could you or any other man have endured such a pull
without crying out?
I answer, Oh yes! I must believe my senses to be
sure. But, Doctor Rubmybump, what do
you
say to that
pancake affair the other night? Did we not
see
the conjurer
with our own identical eyes break two dozen fresh-laid eggs
into a bran new beaverwave over said hat his wand
hear
with our own ears fat fry and splutter
smell
with our own
noses the essence of pancake that came steaming out of the
hatand then did we not see Mr. Sleightohand turn up the
said new beaver and empty out four dozen greasy, smoking,
savory slap-jacks? And did he not hand round the
delicacies
,
and did we not actually
eat
them? Yes, doctor, and
we saw him hatch from a
goose
-egg, a full grown
ring-dove
,
all formed and feathered like a Minerva from the brain of a
Jupiterand then we saw that orphan dove fly around the
room! Yes, sir, and we also saw the magician lick a
red-hot
iron poker with his own veritable tongue! Now,
Doctor
Rubmybump, why shall I not believe that the conjurer's
tricks are as much animal magnetism as yours? The only
reason, perhaps, is, on your principles, that my friend Mr.
Sleightohand
said
his were
tricks
but you call yours
inexplicable
mysteries, or natural developments, and so forth.
Had he averred that his wonders were in obedience to the
laws of an invisible, intangible, subtle fluid, moved and
directed
by his will and motions, and had he called in
testimony
to his own character and added several affidavits, his
disciples
,
sir, would have been more numerous than your own;
and how would Sleightohand have been confuted?
To argument like this, the doctor replies, Oh! aye!
hem! yes, but that is altogether another thingevery
body
must
see that is all trickeryour
senses
were
deceived
.
Doubtless, we answer; and in the other
case, where we
must
know all is trickery, may not the
senses be deceived?
Above is a heavy kite, but we will fly it with an ample
bob-tail:in other words, Charles, we shall illustrate with
a long tale.
In an obscure region of the adjoining county is a
settlement
remote from the polish and intelligence of Kaleidaville.
Here are congregated some forty or fifty families, who,
among other primitive habits, retain a reverence and fear of
witches. Often, while riding through the district, may be
seen a cracked horse-shoe nailed to the lintel of the door,
forbidding all entrance to the venerable dame on a
broom-stick
.
Here doubtless was it, that folks used to sit on
Bibles to escape enchantments; although even that care did
not always prevent the evil, as in the case of a respectable
neighbor who, on rising to depart home, after a visit to a
suspected house, found to his unutterable horror a large
quarto Bible on which he had seated himself by stealth,
strangely adhesive to his inexpressibleshis host's unlucky
urchin of a son having unseen maliciously placed on the
Bible a large plaster of shoemaker's wax!
Here, too, must have lived the poor fellow who, night
after night, for months, was saddled and bridled by an old
witch, and ridden, as her hobby, to a meeting of some sort,
and there fastened by a halter to a worm fence; till once, in
outrageous anger and vengeance, he attempted to eat off the
halter and kick down the fence: at which he so entirely
succeeded
as to discover in the morning that he had chewed off
a piece of his bed-cord, and kicked out the tail-piece of his
bedstead!
Farming and churning, and blacksmithing and
carpentering
are, with many other matters, all done according to
the waning and waxing moon. Radishes there, if planted
at one time, go down deep; and manure, if spread at another,
rises up and rests on the top of the grass! Worm fence
itself
refuses to rest, if laid in the ascent of the moon! And a
friend of mine, a carpenter there, by way of experiment,
shingled opposite sides of a roof at opposite times, and within
three months the shingles on one side were immovable,
whilst on the other, they were easily blown awaythe nails
driven at the unpropitious time all coming out! And my
friend, a very worthy and an intelligent man, believed this
as firmly as Miss Martineau believes in clairvoyanceand
certainly on as good evidence.
In such a community, unusual diseases are very naturally
attributed to witchcraft, and cures sought from spell and
incantation; and hence deceit, whether in counterfeiting
sickness, or in pretending to miraculous healing, easily gains
credit. Indeed the success of any imposture indicates, not
only a people's ignorance, but their wishes and tastes; nor
could trickery exist if folks had not a relish for it.
But don't forget the story. Well, in a comfortable
frame house, at the foot of a lonely mountain, lived not long
since a respectable family called Herwig. A daughter was
the only child. She was very pretty, but very self-willed;
and often, when restrained by her parents, would become
frantic with passion, and sometimes fall into a fit. On one
occasion, being refused permission to attend some
merry-making
in the neighborhood, she became affected with violent
spasms, which continued for several days, and in despite of
the physician's skill. One morning this gentleman was
hastily summoned to the patient; and, on his arrival at Mr.
Herwig's, he was told by the terrified parents that the fits
had indeed suddenly ceased, but that their poor daughter
was bewitched!
Dear Charles, I had designed to make this a very long
letter: but the sequel and conclusion must be reserved for
my next.
Yours ever,
R.
Carlton
.
LETTER VII.
Dear Charles
,I have acted like a Turkish story-teller;
and without doubt you are
on pins
till you know the rest!
and it is a
pin
story too.
Well, in proof of her daughter's bewitchment, the
affrighted
mother showed to the doctor more than fifty pins
which she had that very day taken from the feet of the girl!
And the girl herself affirmed that her whole body was full of
the same, and that they felt as if they would all work down
and come out at her feet!
The marvellous story soon spread through the country, and
presently multitudes of wondering folks arrived, as eager for
the sight of the bewitched young woman's foot, as devout
papists for the sight of a martyr's big toe. And all had
ocular demonstrationfor there were the pins, and there the
pin holes in the feet of the damsel. And when asked how
the pins came into her body, her invariable reply was,
I don't know how, only Satan filled me with them when I
was in fits!
Here then was a plain, manifest, decided case of
witchcraft
;
and to doubt, was felt by the whole community to be
madness. Indeed, every body had corroborative instances of
witchcraft to relate; and all the old women, aye, all the old
men too, of the settlement, declared it was high time to be
looking out for the witch. And one very acute and knowing
old patriarch took the doctor aside, and in a very solemn tone
offered to impart to him, in confidence, a mode of detecting
the witch that had been tried by his own father in detecting
old Peg Steinburg.
And as this method is perhaps the most efficacious of all
known recipes, I shall, by way of episode, garnish my epic
with it. The direction is as follows:
You must, said the worthy old farmer, take a corn
cake, about the size of your hand, and then you must make
on a good fire of hickory; and when you have plenty of
coals, you must make a hole in the fire and chuck in the
cake. Well, when your cake is covered up, you must think
of the witch, and then the cake will work out; but you
must keep it well covered with hot coals; and though you feel
ever so sleepy you must watch all night; and then the old
witch you suspect will be burned over just like the cake!
And I tell you, doctor, it will do it; for my father told me
before he died, that he made a cake for Old Peg Steinburg
and when he put it in the fire he heard noises about the
house; but he was determined not to be frightened; and
that it was as much as he could do to keep awake; and that
he could hardly make the cake stay in the fire; and the next
morning he went to Peg's house, and she was in bed, and
when she wouldn't say what was the matter with her, he
pulled down the bed clothes, and she was burnt all over just
like a red blister!
Potent and certain as was this method, our doctor declined
trying its effects: and although he was somewhat puzzled,
yet observing what others in their
willing and pleasant
blindness
had not cared to remark, that
the pins were all without
heads!
he thought he had a clue to the mystery.
Nothing is so common as the fact that we believe and
disbelieve
as we wish; and very often our very senses are
affected by our desires. Truth has always its evidence,
and falsehood its follies and inconsistencies, if we possess
sufficient skill, perseverance and
honesty
, to discover their
criteria: but our skill, perseverance and honesty depend so
much upon the state of our feelings and wishes, that our first
care must ever be
to keep cool
. Hence it happened that, of
all the hundreds of visitors and examiners, none except my
friend the doctor, saw that the pins were headless; or if they
saw, they drew no adverse inferenceswhy? Because they
did not
wish
to see; or, rather than give up the theory of
witchcraft, the popular and darling theory of the day, they
were ready to believe that Satan, in a strange fit of
tenderheartedness
had clipt off the heads and used them in lieu of
needles, of which article he was probably in want.
Hence the self-styled doctors and professors of
mesmerism
and clairvoyance, rather than abandon one folly, will
propagate another; or, for instance, they will deny the
attraction
of matter, or will contend that matter is only another
form of spirit; and offer even to tell out of what the world
is made! Naythey will irreverently and with shocking
impiety discuss the mysterious existence of the Most High!
And the mob, willing to believe one folly, will admit the
others!
My friend did, indeed, venture to express his dissent from
the popular opinion that the girl was bewtiched; but his
resistance
was about as efficacious to stay the current of
opinion
,
as would be these letters of mine, to break up the
business
of an impudent and shameless mesmerizing rascal, who
was picking the pockets of willing fools, under pretext of
looking by his clairvoyant into their inner man, and
prescribing
for their imaginary diseases. The simpletons
wish
to be guzzled, and
purposely
keep their eyes and ears closed
against truth!Aye, Charles, the gullable part of the world
tie red flannel over their own eyes and ears, as well as
over their pump nosesan allusion, perhaps, you cannot
understand
3
unless you have been favored with as extraordinary
gooses
out there as in here; which is hardly possible, as
with you schoolmasters are not
so
abroad in the land as with
us, nor your folks so learned and scientific as ours.
But to return. After some days our physician,
accompanied
by an intelligent friend, repaired to Mr. Herwig's
house, where he found the mother in an outer room alone,
and greatly distressed at the state in which her daughter
continued
,
fresh pins daily being taken from her feet. The
doctor
informed the mother that he had come, not as a physician,
and with no intention of curing or dis-bewitching the girl,
but with a wish to show her that the whole affair was a case
of wickedness and imposture, in which Satan had no other
agency than that of instigating her daughter to commit sin.
Leaving, therefore, his friend in the outer room with the
mother, our doctor entered the chamber where the girl
lay upon a bed, awaiting the visits of the wondering
neighbors
.
He closed the door, and indeed locked it: and then
with a solemn air advanced and addressed the daughter:
Harriet, said he, I know very well that you are
practising a wicked deception
I am not, doctor, was her reply, and I don't know
how the pins got in me.
Yes, you do knowand I insist on the truthyou shall
tell me, rejoined he.
I have told the truth, doctorSatan filled me with
them, was, as usual, her answer.
On this, the doctor looking her in the face, said,
Harriet
!
do you know, that although you are not sick as you
pretend to be, you may possibly die very suddenly? If you
are not sorry for the deep affliction of your mother, have you
no fears of the bar of God before which you may possibly
stand in a few hours?
Here the poor creature, suddenly seized with great
agitation
,
as if conscience was struggling with pride, at last,
bursting into tears, cried out,
Oh! doctor! doctor! I am wicked!I did it allI
ain't bewitchedI did it myself!
And that, Charles, was the case. This foolish girl had
actually counterfeited spasms as of a fit! And, with her
own hands, after cutting off the heads, had inserted scores
of pins laterally into the soles of her feet! And all for
revenge
!
and the satisfaction of being the wonder of an hour!!
But such
is
human nature; and we doubtless
will
suspect
lying where we are called to believe impossibilities or
follies.
The doctor now opened the door, being desirous of
conveying
the confession of the penitent to her afflicted mother,
when lo!to his astonishment, his friend sat in one corner of
the room, and Mrs. Herwig in another!and both pale and
speechless! For, while the doctor had been exhorting the
girl to the confession, a very large black-snake arose slowly
and spirally through a knot-hole in the floor, and after
looking
around him, spitefully moved towards the girl's chamber
door! But when the confession was uttered, amid sobs and
tears, the serpent, retreating from the door, quickly withdrew
from the outer room, as he had entered! And so amazed
and terrified were the two persons, as to have neither
inclination
nor power to kill the reptile!
Charles, it was not so wonderful that both, but especially
the mother, should have thought the serpent was Satan, and
that he had come to prevent the cure of his victim, and
when disappointed, had hurried away in a rage!
Had not the girl confessed, this singular accident would
have established the truth of witchcraft, even as a thousand
accidents strengthen men's belief in phrenology and
mesmerism
;
although I do
not
mean to say the devil has
nothing
at all to do with them.
Yours, ever,
R.
Carlton
.
LETTER VIII.
Dear Charles
,Your rebuke is not merited. I am far
from attributing
all to deliberate imposture
. In regard,
for instance, to certain systems of medicine, as we must call
them, I believe that sometimes practitioners are deceived as
well as patients.
Cures are not unfrequently the result of accidents, the
doctor being as much surprised as any one else; and then it
is, that cunning and dishonest persons avail themselves of
such accidents, to laud what they term a system matured
after many years of hard study, and tested by innumerable
experiments! Soon they obtain disciples, who, duped
themselves
by the surpassing effrontery of the originator, or
rather
machinator, buy the books and set to work applying the
rules to the killing or curing of other simpletons.
A very large proportion of diseases are imaginary, arising
wholly from derangement of the nervous system. These
diseases are of course healed, or cease to be imagined, from
very different and even opposite causes; and, of course,
they seem to be cured often by seeming medicines, or a
prescription
that administers
nothing
.
Confidence towards a physician is highly important in
the cure of many real diseases; but in regard to imaginary
complaints, not only is confidence in the physician and his
remedy important,
but
it is very often the only thing that
cures. In such cases, then, the physician, regular or
irregular
,
true or false, must administer, not a dose of medicine,
but a dose of
confidence
. And that dose, whether taken in
pill or potion, or reduced to a powder, effects the cure.
Now, Charles, scarce any form of quackery exists, that
will not, again and again a thousand times, light on patients
with seeming, that is, imaginary complaints: and, beyond
all doubt, when such patients have full confidence in the
proposed remedy, a quack nostrum (if otherwise harmless)
will cure as well as any other medicine; and any remedy is
just as efficacious as
nothing
. I speak not now of the
permanent
injury often done, when men, by tampering with
quack potions, and pills, and the like, exchange a seeming
disorder for a real one; nor of the constant failure of such
remedies when they meet with real and especially violent
diseases: but my wish is to convince you that the quacks
and quackeries you allude to, owe, in great part, their
popularity
to the cause just named.
It is a gross error, if one supposes that regular, and
learned, and honest physicians go always by inflexible rule,
and ever administer the same drugs. Such a man is
intimately
acquainted with the history of imaginary diseases,
and even treats them as imaginary: that is, he
seems
to give
medicines, because that semblance is necessary, but he gives
nothing. He treats seeming diseases as seeming ones, and
real disorders as real; and in this consists one important
distinction
between the true medical man and the panaceist
and every other quack.
Charles, I have on divers occasions quacked a little
myselfbut alas! my disease was too real, and would not
stay curedit was toothache! For you must know, your
reverence, that I once had the worm taken out, and that
by an old lady in the South, who had learned the art from
the Indians, or some other savages. But ah me! that
hateful
maggot, by some contrivance, crawled back into the
grinder; and so tooth and worm had to be wrenched out
together
,
and that so effectually that neither one nor the other
has ever since reappeared! On the old lady's book, however,
among 'squires innumerable, with a smart chance of ladies,
and a clever sprinkle of generals and other magnates, is
recorded
an humbler name, as one
cured
of the toothache by
the extraction of the worm!
In a similar way are obtained myriads of certificates.
And rarely does one ever erase or recall a name. Indeed,
I do happen to know, also, that certificates are given for the
cure of one disease, when the person had been healed of
another
:
for certain vile rascals threaten to expose licentious
men, if such give not, for instance, a certificate in favor of
Doctor Franois' corn-plaster and shin-oil, when neither
plaister nor oil had been exhibited or applied, but the
man of pleasure had used a specific without mercury.
Is it right, your reverence, for
the cloth
to lend their
name in approbation of any mere
nostrums?
Pray, what do
clergymen know about such matters more than we plebeians!
And is it not more than possibleis it not certainthat
innumerable
plasters, and oils, and other greases, and pills,
potions, lozenges, and so forth, gain a very undeserved
notoriety
,
and a very injurious use, merely from clerical
influence
?
It is something like an impertinence, that learned
and regular parsons should not confine themselves ad
consilii
medicinam, for the morals of the communityin other
words, mind their homilies, and allow learned and regular
doctors to take care of our bodies.
For my part, as age advances, the more my organ of
anti-quackitiveness enlarges; and hence I have settled down
to a fixed resolution to be killed or cured secundum artem.
If others choose to be
quacked
off the stage, the laws of our
state do not forbid: but assuming that the regulars
themselves
cure only by accident, our sages have let loose upon
us a horde of irregulars to aid in the butchery; believing
that when all the patients are killed, the medical art will
end, and, therefore, that such desirable consummation will
be more speedily brought on by throwing down all barriers.
But, Charles, it will be found that well-educated
physicians
,
like all well-educated persons that make a profession a
science, as well as an art, are necessarily and of choice,
open, and honorable, and philosophic in their course. Every
thing with such, is the result of study, and is tested by
experiment
;
and such have no arcana, or mysteries. They
do, indeed, often fail, and are mistaken; but have they
ever said failure and error are impossible? Now, the
arrogant
pretension of quackery should certainly be, with
educated
clergymen,
the very
reason for despising its pretension.
Some physicians of my acquaintance have met cases in
their practice, where a reputation for specifics, or for a
specific
practice, could easily have been established, and
hundreds
of dollars been extorted, where the ordinary fee has
been almost refused. For one other important distinction
between
science and quackery is, that the latter has an eye
solely to money; the former does regard honor also, and, at
least, the
esprit du corps
.
A portly citizen here became nervous some years ago;
and one evening, being in company with the widow Snively,
he complained of his symptoms; on which, the matron, by
way of condolence, replied: Aye, Mr. Biggins! that's
just the way poor Snively felt after he was taken with the
dropsy! Instantly Mr. Biggins hurried home, and huddling
into bed, summoned the doctor; upon whose speedy arrival
he exclaimed, Oh! doctor, I've got the dropsylook here
I'm swelled! Our man of pills fortunately knew his
patient's
nerves, and calmly replied, Well, it does look
something
like it, to be sure; but here, this powder will set all
right, and by to-morrow at this time the swelling will vanish,
and then he administered a Dover powder: and next day Mr.
Biggins called in person, at the doctor's office, to let him know
that the dropsy had gone, and that he felt the swelling had
subsided.
What a chance this to have obtained an affidavit before
some justice of the peace, a solemn testimony in favor of
The unparalleled North American Hydragogue, discovered
after five and twenty years' unwearied study of Doctor
Jonathan
Eastman! and now offered to the afflicted as the only
remedy for draining waters from the body andmoney from
the pocket.
A case of hernia lately occurred, in which a warm
application
was important: but no credit was given to the
suggestion
,
till a by-stander affirmed that the best cure was to
make a poultice by boiling together two pounds of pork, one
and a half of beef, four beets, and half a dozen small turnips,
and then applying said poultice as
warm
as could be endured.
This was done; but the good result was attributed to the
jumble
and not to the
heat!
and in that settlement the
natural
doctor is valued more than the regular. Here, too, a
patent could have been obtained for The Wonderful
Emolient-Medicated-Cataplasm! But the natural doctor,
in this case, had no wish to quack on a large scaleand so
his plaister may enrich another.
This is the steam-age, metaphysically as well as
physically
;
and folks
will
go by the steam, even if we burst ever
so many boilers per diem. We have a distaste, too, for
what we understand, and demand in medicine what we
demand
in all other thingsquackery.
I shall conclude this long letter by an account given me
lately, by a medical friend, corroborative of my remark, that
regular physicians, if dishonest, could often avail themselves
of accidents to obtain credit for a specific practice or a specific
medicine; and that where, strictly speaking,
nothing
had
been done or given.
My friend, one morning, was hastily summoned to attend
a gentleman several miles from Kaleidaville, with an earnest
request not to delay a moment. Of course he set out
instanter
;
but scarce had he got a quarter of a mile when he
was met by a second messenger, and before he could reach
the patient's house he encountered a third, who stated that
Mr. Wilton was in imminent danger.
On entering the gentleman's chamber, the doctor found
the patient in bed, and in great alarm, as if from visibly
impending death.
Why, Mr. Wilton, asked the physician, what is the
matter?
Doctor, was the reply, I am just returned from
New-York, from the yellow feverand I have taken it. I
know the symptoms well(the gentleman had once himself
practised medicine)and I wish you to arrest the progress
of the disease before it gets too strong a hold.
My friend, after making his observations and feeling his
pulse, replied,
Mr. Wilton, there is positively nothing the matter with
you: here is some mistake
No, sir, interrupted the patient, I am not mistaken.
This morning I was apparently as well as usual; but, while
shaving, I perceived, all at once, my whole face and hands to
be as yellow as saffronand that
is
the beginning of the fever.'
The doctor now stepped to the toilet near a window,
where the shaving apparatus lay, and instantly found his
own face and hands dyed a saffron color! How so? you
ask, had he caught the fever from Mr. Wilton?
Not exactly, Charles, but he had caught it from a
beauteous
soft mellow light reflected from the changing leaves of
a delightful autumn morningwhich was giving all things
in that quarter of the apartment a somewhat
jaundiced
hue!
Yes, that was the secret. And the knowledge of that
secret could have been turned, by a quack or a dishonest
man, in several ways, to his own advantage. The mistake
of the patient, however, was soon corrected; yet so
powerfully
had his imagination been wrought upon, that it was
necessary for the physician to divert his attention by a long
ride together, and several hours of conversation.
Doubtless, Charles, the humbugaths would wrinkle up
the nasal appendage at all such stories and incidents, with
an ohah!but I am not easily
nozzled
out of a
deep-seated
conviction that all usually comprised under the head
of nostrum, mesmerism, and quackery in general, may be
traced to trickery; or to a selfish cunning taking advantage
of accident and the wonderful readiness men every where
show to aid imposture. You and I may lack skill or
opportunity
to detect the trick or the accidentbut that one or
the other, or both exist, is, to me at least, certain.
Yours ever,
R.
Carlton
.
LETTER IX.
Dear Charles
,You are a very modest man in offering
me a recipe for a
multum in parvo
letter, as if my
consilii
medicina
might have been condensed, and so saved double
postage. Why, sir, that expense and the breadth of the
plaister, being thus spread over two sheets, will of
themselves
effect your cure: and I had an eye to that when the
blister was sent.
But what a blister of both sorts does that sentence in
your last demand?that I
obstinately
refuse to join the
anti-gallows society! And, does your reverence really
believe, I have no good reasons for withholding my name
and influence, from the Murderers' and Assassins' Friends
Society? Have
you
joined, Charles, and are you sincere
in wondering at me? The mania has invaded your order, I
see, judging from the smart sprinkle of
reverends
prefixed to
the names of the officers; and all the grand rascals with
black hearts and bloody hands are soon to have the
benefit
of clergy.
You are right enough in supposing that I have not read
all the papers and pamphlets; but not quite so near the
mark, in thinking the perusal must of necessity change my
opinions. Wise men do, indeed, change their opinions
but wise men, I presume, do sometimes adhere to their old
friends: and to the latter class we belong. Somehow being
fully confident that common sense, common humanity,
natural
instinct, the sense of justice, the good of society, and an
old fashioned book called the Bible, are all in favor of the
death penalty,
my
logic infers that the contrary opinion is
trickery or error. I stand and say come to me; for I
cannot
come to you. Not that I am unwilling to have my
opinion overthrown; but, that if my foothold be not now
on rock, it never can be: and so I am not willing to waste
time with the unanswerable arguments.
Think not, Charles, that quackery is confined to
philosophy
and medicine; it is found in morals, and education, and
religion. And a distinct mark of humbug is the
vox populi
,
in manifest opposition to the
vox Dei
. In many moral
questions
the agitator excites popular clamor in order to conceal
his false principles, to promote his selfish ends, and even
3*
to cover his hostility to revealed truth.
Majority
is his logic;
and with that he votes in his quackery.
And pray, reverend sir, in what consist the wondrous
moral excellence and refinement of our age over all ages
past and future? Why are we too good and elegant to
have the gallows? Granting all that is claimed for our
superiority in such matters, does supreme excellence in
fine arts, poetry, music, painting, statuary,
dancing,
dressing
,for
these two and other similar things are reduced
to rules and taught and practised as artsdoes supreme
excellence here seem inconsistent with a bad heart, with
bad morals, or with open irreligion and even atheistical
thoughts and practices?
Is the worldly-mindedness generated, and kept ever at
fever-heat, by an endless round of amusement and
refreshment
concert
roomsoperasplay-housesmuseums
bowling greensand oyster cellars, where they hang up
indecent
paintings, and retail
thunder and light!
by the gill,
in little glass gobletsand all the
et ceteras
of Five Points,
both vulgar and politeis all this, and the like, proof of
transcendent moral excellence and extreme sensitiveness?
And this refinement is shocked by the gallows! And yet,
Charles, does such refinement never open a plain way to
the gallows? Some eyes are keen enough to discern,
amidst all the flowers and elegence of such a society, the
hideous forms of vindictive malice and revengeful hate, and
brutal lust, and all-grasping avarice, and godless idolatry;
and this, though all are bowing with blandest courtesy, and
moving with matchless grace, and smiling with witching
faces and speaking honied words. And where there are
these, there will even be
murder!
True, this society will not call the fiend by his right
name, and they will sanction his deeds and palliate his crimes;
yea, they will so laud his honor, and his bravery, and his
manly spirit, and so soften his rage into a morbid and
unfortunate
state of insane affections, and they will so
represent
his provocations, and the superhuman force of the
temptation
and the potency of the circumstances, that the world
shall say, Alas, poor wretch! let him not die for that!
how
could
he help it? And then the fashionable and the
rectified humanity of the times will exclaim, with
unutterable
scorn in word and action, and with ineffable
self-complacency
for its own virtuous self, What! strangle the
gentleman
for that!!
And because men now all hasten to be rich, and are
lovers of pleasure more than lovers of God, will they
necessarily
,
when
hanging
is abrogated, and the fear of man as
well as the fear of God is removed, will such men
immediately
cease to do evil and learn to do well, and will they
not
fall into many foolish and hurtful lusts, and bite and
devour one another? Whence come wars and fightings?
Come, sir, how will you prevent crime?
Construct suitable jails and imprison the
unfortunate
criminals for life, you reply.
And why not addtax the widow and orphan to
maintain
the murderer of the husband and father? To this you
say, and with most devout eyes turned to the clear sky,
Well, that would teach men to return good for evil! They
ought not to be tempted and encouraged to foster a spirit of
revenge!
What a moving picture does Christianity, thus ennobled
and refined by moonshine, present, as the Rectification stands;
the hands meekly crossed on its philanthropic, milky bosom;
its face, in humble pride, sweetly turned with a complacent
smile of a mouth puckered at the corners, and its eyes
calling up a look under the graceful curvature of brows
ready for a daguerreotype!
But, Charles, suppose a governor should pardon the
unfortunate
,
or that the poor deluded criminal should murder
his keeper or a fellow-prisoner?
To be sure, you reply, but these are extreme cases;
and after the new era commences, governors will doubtless
be immoveable by any argument addressed to his pity, or
ambition, or covetousness, or
infidelity;
jailers, too, will be
incorruptible, and criminals so pervaded with the sense of
gratitude as to render such fears as the objection hints
wholly
needless.
But what
if
an unfortunate criminal
should
, in a new fit
of insane affectionfor how can a man prevent insanity
what
if
he should kill his jailer or a fellow-prisoner? You
would perhaps say, Put him straightway into
two
dungeons.
Your folks, the anti-hangers, often speak of Draco;
whom, after all, they seem to imitate in sentiment. He
deemed the smallest crime worthy of death, and for the
greatest had no higher punishment; and your senators,
deeming perpetual and solitary confinement the highest
possible
punishment for one deliberate or insane murder, have
none other for any additional repetitions of the
fault
, or
crime. And why should a wretch care how many murders
he committed when one murder sentences him to a
punishment
,
severer than which would not await a dozen? He
would say, as the philosopher in Lucian said to Tantalus,
Why should I fear any other doom? there is but one
imprisonment
.
One of your papers sent to me affirms that executions
in
private
argue
shame
in the public mind! and infers that
the rational sentiment is thus shown against the punishment
of death itself.
Are all things men conceal
therefore
shameful? And
ought such things ever to be abandoned and avoided? May
not some things be inconvenient and unbecoming in one
place that are in all points suitable for another? Corns (
in
pedes
) are not cut in public; is it a shame, and hence a sin,
to eradicate them in private? Pleasantries wise men freely
indulge when together; which innocent recreation is ceased
from when a fool approaches. Why? Because in the one
case good arises; in the other, injury.
All deliberative bodiespolitical, legislative,
ecclesiastical
sit
at times with closed doors, and yet no person
believes
their secret councils necessarily traitorous or immoral.
Animals designed for the shambles bleed not in public,
because
,
in addition to inconvenience, danger would arise,
doubtless, to morals; but is it wicked to slaughter such
animals
in private? A Grahamite can here find a powerful
reason, in the principles of the anti-hangers, for considering
our carnivorous tendency shameful and wicked.
Many good reasons exist in favor of private executions,
without inferring or saying governments are
ashamed
of the
death penalty.
Admit, reverend friend, for argument's sake, that
punishment
is, as the Murderers' and Assassins' Friend Society
affirm, to
reform
the criminals; then, pray what time is
considered
necessary to reform the said gentrythe criminals I
mean? How and when shall we be satisfied that the
reformation
is complete, so that the unfortunates might be let
out with safety to our pockets and throats?
Will a whole lifetime in solitary confinement be too short
a period? Where then is the boasted efficacy of the remedy?
Will a less period than a whole life be sufficient? Then
why confine a man after he is reformedif that be the
sole
end of the penalty? Would not that be cruelty? Would
it not be tantamount to punishing an innocent person?
What! keep a poor unfortunate cut-throat in fetters and
dungeon after he has become as worthy a citizen as before
his misfortune! and when to make amends he is ready even
to marry the poor widow of the murdered man and to take
charge of the fatherless little ones! Shocking inhumanity!
savage barbarism!and we in the nineteenth century!
Well enough for the dark ages of Moses and the ignorance
of early Christendombut for these times of canals and
rail-roads
and magnetic telegraphs!!
Oh! yes, Charles, you deem all this just like Carlton,
but, Sir,
will
no modern philanthropist full of the milk of
human kindness and running over till his chin calls out for
bibs,
will
none such ever construct a jail-delivery system on
something like the above argument; and deeming his pet
jail-birds sufficiently reformed, determine to send them with
bran new wings, forth-flying again upon society? Are there
not persons now ready to agitate, and petition, and lecture,
and print, and to stuff mail-bags with very sapient twaddle;
and all to prove that it would be cruelty to keep a murderer
confined if it were perfectly certain he was reformed and
would never murder again? Would not such men practice
with
meck
governors and
patriotic
legislatures to pardon,
years before the end of life, whenever it
seemed
certain that
murderers had reformed? Law, it may be replied,
would forbid pardon. How long would that law stand
unrepealed, or how soon be disregarded in an age just
coming
even more enlightened and humane than our own?
I despair not of seeing phrenological science so improved,
that the time necessary to reform criminals may be known
a priori
, or rather
a capite
, and sentence and treatment of
murderers of insane sensibility or affection be according to
the
dicta
of philosophers. Even now, judges and jurors are
addressed and cautioned to decide on
such
philosophic
evidence
;
and facts and testimony yield to the
developments
, or
are explained, and diluted, and warped, to suit the
organs
.
Perhaps no direct attempts are here made, but the indirect
are not wanting; and the secret persuasion of judges and
jurors seems wrought by the kind of marks and tokens that
belong to phrenology, if not to mesmerism. At all events,
we shall have thenforgive the punas now,
capital
punishments
.
I can and do with you, dear Charles, weep over those
unhappy men, who, perchance, may have been condemned
and executed wrongfully: for it seems possible, and is
doubtless true, that here and there an innocent man has
perished
on the scaffold. But mistake, or even wilful advantage
taken of a good law, ought not surely to overturn all law.
Or if it overturn one, why not another? The mere error or
warping of the rule does not prove that the rule itself is
wrong. The risk men run of enduring evil or injustice, or
of losing life wrongfully, in a civilized state, is
immeasurably
less than in the savage or barbarous state; and none
but an extraordinary simpleton, or most obstinate
anti-gallows
advocate, would venture to say he would prefer
savageism
or barbarism to a condition in which what they term
legal
murder, is occasionally done on an innocent man; nor
can such prove that the occasional error or injustice is,
per
se
, argument for the injustice of the law itself in putting to
death the truly guilty.
Far from me to reflect on the character of some innocent
victims to a needful law, now in their bloody graves; but
yet is it most undeniable, that many, who to the last, deny
their guilt, are men of most base character, and have ever
been bosom companions of the utterly vile and abandoned;
and having by their own act destroyed the force of
presumption
in their favor arising from a good and virtuous life and
proper companionship, they owe their death to their own
folly, rather than the mistake of the law. Nor is it going
too far to believe, that some such companions of thieves and
murderers, if guiltless of the one act, may have been
accessory
to others, and would be, if life were spared, accessory
again.
One of the papers you forwarded to me, whilst it
ferociously
advocates the anti-hang doctrine, doth actually praise
military companies!praises trained butchers of the human
species! Nay, said paper advocates firing on mobs!kills
by wholesale to
prevent
murder! Yea, it goes for the whole
Oregon! When your editor reconciles his inconsistencies,
we will pay attention to his other conclusive arguments.
I do not know who your sapient traveller was that knew
by spying a gallows in the distance that he was approaching
a civilized land, and was
so
shocked that
he did not
go back
to the barbarians! but I do know he was either a veritable
ninny himself, or the fiction of some ninny
story
teller. If
the traveller preferred savage life, where murder is done by
wholesale, and the avenger of blood
ever
lives, why was he
coming back to civilization, where he knew the gallows
must of necessity meet his eye? I will answer for him:
that very gallows assured him that justice and protection
reigned; that a whole community were pledged for his
safety; and so, with a most puerile slander on a wholesome
law, he
willingly
came snugly under its guardianship.
I know this letter will cost double postage, Charles, but
that will be a proper punishment for your inclining an ear
to our modern New Lights. It will not be very surprising
if you become even an advocate, if not a member, of the
Moral Suasion Society. If you do, Charles, I will positively
lick you; I have a rod in soak.
Yours ever,
R.
Carlton
.
LETTER X.
Dear Charles
,No: it is
not
so surprising that there
should be fears about your becoming a member of a Moral
Suasion Society. Have you yet to learn that these affairs
go in clusters? Begin where you choose, either at the
centre, or any point in the circumference of modern
abolitionism
,
and you will go the entire circlein other words,
the whole figure.
The real out-and-outers, who originate certain moralities,
are very often persons who, in various ways, run opposition
lines against puritanism, and even against the Scriptures
themselves. Hence such persons affect to get up something
double-gilt and very glittering, and therefore very attractive;
and they are desirous to pass, if not for puritans or
Christians
,
yet for something as good, and, perhaps, a little better
splendid philanthropic artists, and with confidence in man!
And no wonder their pretensions are admitted, for they have
patent contrivances for changing the spots of leopards, and
washing Ethiops white! and the world all run mad after
pills, potions, lotions, plasters, not only for the beautifying
of the physical man, but also of the moral and spiritual.
I am not deeply read in their slang and cant, yet I have
heard their whine about the dignity of that human nature
which my Bible says is deceitful above all things and
desperately
wicked; about confidence in men, when that book
teaches me to cease from man, and not put confidence in
princes; about our equal tendency, when every thought
of the imagination of the heart from youth up is evil;
about the efficacy of persuasion, irrespective of a divine
efficiency, when we hate the light, and as did our fathers,
always resist the Holy Ghost; about the grandeur of our
morals and good works, when we are often whited
sepulchres
without, and filthy graves within.
True to their
proton pseudos
, as you learned clerks call it,
belief in the native goodness of man,they give us
scheme after scheme, some impracticable, some insane, others
worse,all based on the wondrous potency of moral
suasion
and circumstance; and all, more or less, eschewing
force and punishment. These self-complacent
philanthropists
all begin at the centre, and in due time, by a thousand
radiating paths, thrust their meek visages out of the grand
circumference.
Others, like my reverend friend,come, do not wince,
Charley,very good sort of folks, and with no evil intention,
caught by the seeming truth, and confounded by the glare of
a dozen common-places, streaming like light before their
eyes, and adroitly flourished on the wheel, attach themselves,
in an unluckly moment, to some point on the circumference,
intending to
stand
there. But once within the influence of
the wheel, away they whirl, through all the kindred moralities
of modern abolitionism. An active fellow may, indeed,
occasionally
leap off at a tangent, or may be he is hurled off; but
usually the good sort of folks do once at least go the entire
circumferencenothing save one whole revolution satisfies.
Sometimes, for instance, a man will begin with an
ultra-peace
society. There are made to glare with a strange light
some very plain matters ever believed by wise and good
persons
,
such as, war is a great evilpeace a great blessing,
revenge demoniacal, and the like: and from these plain
principles, after a good deal of argument, and parade, and
flourish, comes forth, by some sort of logical legerdemain,
the most preposterous conclusion, that self-defence is sinful!
A man sometimes begins with such a society; and soon
he becomes an anti-slavery man, in the worst sense of the
term, and ready in defence of his abstraction to cut the
throats of all the slaveholders, and coolly to dissolve the
Union itself!an intemperate temperance man, so
tee
-total
as to give up even
tea
; and so fierce for humanity as to
slander and revile any one who, at his own table, should,
once in a year, drink one thimblefull of wine!an
anti-renter
prepared to give landlords lead for gold, and
gunpowder
for flour!a universalist!an anti-hanger!a
moral persuader abolishing all rods from families, and ferules
from school-rooms!
Let a man get the
whirl
fairly into his system, and he
will go it, like a mammoth humming-top moved by steam!
Do not misunderstand these remarks, Charles; for I do think
men of your cloth may join
some
moral societies, and
ought
,
perhaps, to join others; as, for instance, certain peace and
temperance societies. But I am well satisfied that the clergy
should never commit, or rather
abandon
themselves to mere
phases
of morality. That will put the
whirl
into you; and
you will become, almost of necessity, a giddy fanatic; or if
you get violently thrown from the wheel, you stand a chance
of being deemed crack-brained the rest of your life, and your
influence becomes for ever impaired.
Hence I am not at all surprised to learn that my old
townsman, Solomon Lacsuck, so dislikes Mr. Birchem, the
new schoolmaster, elected by your trustees. But your
village
can never recover from the bad effects following from
Mr. Smoothey's administration, who was recommended to
your board by the Moral Suasion Society, till a return to the
old rod-enforced discipline. I am glad you had firmness to
resist the rigmarole about corporal chastisement in schools;
and that you had common sense enough to know that
legislators
do not
ex officio
possess a knowledge of the art and
mystery of school-keeping. That is a kind of government
beyond the abilities of most representatives elected by
majorities
;
and our venerable law-makers would be still more
venerable, if they would stick to their own last, and let
Birchem stick to his. And so ought we to be unmoved by
the humdrum of a thousand lecturers and editors, many of
whom would be benefitted by a judicious switching
themselves
,
and who owe the little wisdom they really do
possess
to the honest scourging of their schoolmaster.
Were not the matter too serious for sport, it would be
very edifying to behold some theoretical schoolmen practising
in certain schools on the sugar-plum and do-it-my-little
dearee-system: or on the more plausible system of mere
appeal
to the moral sense, or the sense of honor in pupils. As
far as my observation extends, young ladies and gentlemen
are very much like sinners of mature age, and they often
not only sin wilfully and deliberately, but even
con mucho
gusto
, against both honor and conscience, and all the utilities
at the same time. The sense of honor, and the moral sense
of most pupils, resides in the palm of the hand, or even lower
down; and the rod and the ferule is the moral persuader to
touch that sense.
Some pupils are malicious and scornful; some are
profane
,
indecent, lying, quarrelsome, and even thievish; and
not a few are desperately addicted to crooked pins,
shoemaker's
wax, paper fly boxes, and all the instruments and doings
of idleness and fun: and most are in all and every respect
as crooked as a grape-vine, as knotted as a crab-stick, as
prickly and rough as a thorn-tree, and sour as vinegar, and
with folly bound up in the heart.
Mr. Smoothey is competent now, I presume, to deliver a
course of lectures on the miraculous efficiency of oil and
milk in the training and government of the young. The
Secretary of the Moral Persuaders says that Smoothey is
not appreciated, and, that in contradiction to your folks of
Somewhersburg, he will affirm that Smoothey taught the
alphabet
in twenty-six lessons, and the
and-per-se
in two;
which feat he accomplished by small cakes baked for the
purpose in shape of the letters, and eaten at proper intervals
on every successive day! Others say, however, that while
that was, indeed, true enough, yet when he attempted to
teach syllabication without the gingerbread, the thoughtless
and ungrateful urchins would not learn. Hence the master
deserted our little darlings, and put off with his cake-bag to
your village.
He was, at first, very popular, as he never spake a cross
word in the school-room; and he had a scheme for the nicest
adjustment of disagreement among the larger pupils on
principles
of law and honor; but, at last, the dishonorable and
lawlessand these were a very respectable minoritymade
him a king log: and so much time was wasted by
working
the complex machinery, that little or no improvement
was made in the several studies. The school became a
miniature house of
lords
, of which he, however, was neither
governor nor chief speaker; and all made very considerable
attainments in self-conceit, self-importance, and impertinence,
and entertained great contempt for brutal pedagogues that
dealt in oil of birch or strap-grease.
Under special and favorable circumstances, and especially
where family government has been uniform and judicious,
a preceptor may teach and govern with no resort to the rod
and its cognates; although even then, corporal chastisement
must be deemed possible; but most commonly, resort must
be had to such chastisement.
With some children in all schools, and in many schools
for a time, mere kindness and tenderness, and appeals to
common
sense and virtuous feelings and sentiments will do
wonders
in reforming and governing; but he that hopes, by
shedding tears over the generality of bad and disobedient
scholars, to win them to his purpose, must have a good
fountain
head of tears, and a tear-pump that works remarkably
easy; and then he will discover, after the exhausting of his
well, that most will remain as idle and vicious as ever, and
with contemptuous feelings toward an inefficient and weeping
master. Charles, you cannot
cry
folly out of a child's heart
all experience teaches that it must be done by the rod of
correction.
Charles, I rather suspect, from some hints in your letters,
that my crudities are read to certain of your friends out
there. Well, as you like; but do not show this to poor
Smoothy
,
unless you do think it would do him some good.
Yours ever,
R.
Carlton
.
LETTER XI.
Dear Charles
,You ask, if I do not believe the blessed
founder of our religion would have countenanced the
societies
that you name.
This, dear friend, is a grave and solemn question; and
merits a grave and solemn answer: and in that way and yet
with all honesty will I give an opinion which you may use
as is deemed best.
Let me say, then, first and without offence, that I have
been sometimes disgusted and even shocked, in hearing the
confident asseverations of certain public speakers and their
admirers, as to what would have been proper for the Saviour
to have done in given circumstances, and as to what he would
now do if he were upon the earth. For, evidently, it can
be but presumption in us to lay down any plan for the
conduct
of the divine Redeemer. It is his province to act, and
ours to imitate; and if our wisdom cannot extricate us where
moralities are complicated, it is great irreverence to say, or
even think, His wisdom would be at fault, unless it took
lessons
of ours.
We may safely say, indeed, that Jesus Christ would have
always countenanced all that is morally good, whether found
in societies or individuals: but we are by no means
competent
to prescribe the manner in which that encouragement
and approbation would have been bestowed. That
we
do it,
in a certain favorite mode, is no safe reason for saying that
would have been or ought to be the divine mode: that mode
must be inferred from what is plainly revealed or done in the
Scriptures.
Thousands of evils and abuses, incidental and inseparable,
are inwrought with our best schemes; and he that is pledged
to a moral society, or a moral principle, or mode of doing
good, appears to the world pledged with what is accidentally
or unavoidably wrong in that system. He is, unless he
protests
,
held responsible for the error as well as for the truth.
Do we err, then, Charles, in believing that our blessed Master
would have stood aloof, even from many moral organizations,
in which was much that we do know he would have approved?
Jesus Christ, dear friend, loves all his true-hearted
followers, and that wherever found. But who, except
Romanists in principle, do not believe that such followers
are in churches and communities and countries differing by
many varieties? Wide apart too are the modes of thinking
and acting produced by education, rank, and a hundred
other circumstances. Can we think, then, that the
Redeemer
,
always so distinguished for his tenderness, would
have hurt the feelings of some among his disciples by
seeming
to pass unqualified approbation of a part only, and thus
censuring the others? If he, indeed, should say what was
truth, all would cheerfully acquiesce: but his word is in
the Scriptures, and that word admits unity and variety.
To a careful reader of the Scriptures it will become
more and more clear, that Christ
intended
to lay down
general
principles only; inference and the use and application
are left to his followers, who have, indeed, the promise of
the Holy Spirit for their guidance into all truth. Hence the
Saviour, on one occasion, refused to be a divider of an
estate
;
and on another refused to pass sentence on the
woman
taken in adultery, leaving the condemnation to the
existing law, if the accuser saw fit to lay the case before
the proper tribunal. Hence also the apostles never
intermeddled
with politics or government, wishing to show, in
all things, that their master's kingdom was not of earth, but
that it was a spiritual kingdom, and would, if admitted into
men's hearts, in due time regulate all external actions
according
to the law of love.
If, therefore, Charles, this be true, and it appears so to me,
surely we cannot think, if Jesus Christ were now on the
earth, or had made his appearance for the first time, that he
would in any degree depart from a line of conduct which he
manifestly has been pleased to prescribe for himself. The
inference, then, does not seem improper, when we say our
master would not now attach himself to any one society or
party in morals, or even any one creed in religion.
Infallibilists
will reject this inference, especially so far as religion
is concerned, but we fallibles must adopt it.
The present state is not the one for the divine
adjudication
of the comparative amounts of truth and excellency in
systems and societies: that is reserved for the day when
every man's work shall be tested by principles already fixed
in the Word, and when, if a man's work be good, he shall
receive a reward; if less good, or faulty, or wrong, he shall
suffer loss; while himself, if a true believer, and having done
works in faith, shall be saved.
Indeed, Charles, all exertion of mind must be destroyed;
all trouble of thinking, all exercise of forbearance and
charity
must cease, if one could at a word know from his divine
Master when he was right or wrong. This very exercise of
the mind, and of all Christian graces, is necessary to the
perfection
of the good man's character; and all this would be
wholly impossible if Christ's living voice did settle every
question. Nay, my friend, the Bible would not be so read,
and examined, and weighed line by line, word by word, and
letter by letter, if the truth could be had with less, or rather
no trouble and pains. It does seem to me that our
expectation
of unity so perfect as to admit no variety, is
preposterous
.
The unity of the spirit and the bonds of peace have
always obtained among believers; but that unity is not
inconsistent
with many differences and varieties in the modes
of exhibiting truth, teaching the disciples, and governing the
church. And, to me, the very fact that the true church has
always had these differences and varieties is proof, not only
that they are allowed, but actually designed, by the Head of
the Church. And hence, I do not think that blessed Head,
if now upon the earth, would decide which form of
government
or mode of worship was the true one; because, in the
first place, several modes may be equally true ones; and
secondly, because he has given us all the directions deemed
important; and it would be irreverence in us to ask for any
clearer ones than Infinite Wisdom has given.
How intolerant and intolerable would be the overbearing
insolence of many professedly moral and religious people,
could they boast a name on their books, or to their pledges,
such as the sacred one in question, and in the partizan sense
contemplated in this inquiry! A miracle of grace might
prevent, but most would act more tyrannically than ever.
Many things in moral and religious schemes are worthy of
the divine approbation; but the name of the Saviour would
be used for intolerance and persecution in general, and for
pushing forward such parts of a scheme as are actually
anti-scriptural.
There is a very important sense in which the Supreme
Being is the God, not of the Jews only, but also of the
Gentiles
.
Poor, fallen human nature, however even partially
renovated, tends ever to making God the head of a party,
and not of the good and pious, wherever found. We ever
want to take and make Jesus Christ a king, not of the heart
and conscience, but of our sect and our society; and while
ready thus to do him honor, it is only as we would honor
some great, and rich, and influential persons who had headed
our paper with their names.
Woe! not to the wicked, or the ignorant, or the obstinate
only; but woe to the cautious and prudent inquirer after
truth! aye, woe to the scrupulous and conscientious, if
Christ were
politically
of our party, and we had the power!
Many are Romans who are not of Rome; and he is a
Roman
who is one inwardly, if not outwardly! Charles, even
good and worthy disciples would not know their spirits; and
although kept meek and kind by existing circumstances now,
would then flame out with strange zeal, and call down fire
from heaven, to destroy all not apparently of their party!
and all the Garrisons, and Burleighs, and Folsoms, with all
other infidels of their stamp, would, in the name of Christ,
literally trample under their feet the real followers of the
Redeemer; and, like fiends, even bathe their hands in
blood. Such men want but the sanction of Christ's name to
destroy Christ himself.
No, my friend, our blessed Redeemer is the head over
all in too godlike a sense to admit the idea that he ever could
become a head in the low, and partial, and oftentimes pitiful
sense intended by some who, directly or indirectly, propose
the query you have asked.
For my part, I am well satisfied that great irreverence is
ever manifested in affirming what a divine lawgiver would
do, further than as a matter of clear inference from his own
laws and rules; and I feel that the confident and arrogant
speeches of certain pseudo-reformers and philanthropists are
shocking to taste and religion. I fear that many mere
partisan
philanthropists, if Christ were on earth, and would not
attend their meetings, and sign their papers, and second their
resolutions, would drive him out with hisses and execrations.
Nay, I have with my own ears heard one such affirm that
there are on earth now many men as good as Jesus Christ;
and that if no more Bible had been written than the Sermon
on the Mount, it had been better for the world! and that
man was a self-styled minister of the gospel, and led off in a
great
moral
reform!!
It seems to the superficial and self-righteous very
plausible
,
to debar
all
slaveholders and
all
dealers in ardent
spirits
from church communion. But
if
that be the
sole
disqualification
,
and the person be, otherwise,
externally
a pious man
and honest citizen, such prohibition is contrary to the Bible
and to common sense. Suppose, now, our Saviour were on
earth, and were enrolled as a member of some Anti-Slavery
and some Total Abstinence Society, what a rod and sceptre
of iron would such societies wield over us! And yet we do
know that an inspired pen has recorded for our use, an
exhortation
to
pious
and
believing masters
of slaves and
owners
of
pious slaves
both members of one communion. True,
we do not regard such exhortation as either allowing or
disallowing
any species of slavery: but it is a plain admission
that both master and slaves may, at the same time, be genuine
Christians and going together to the same heaven. Some
may
hate
the apostle for penning such words and epistles;
but pseudo and ferocious philanthropists and moralists will
ever be found opposed to the Bible.
I honestly say, it is my belief, that our Saviour would
ever smile on whatever is really humane (and there is
much
of that character) in an Anti-Slavery Society, and also in a
Colonization Society; but were he on earth, it is evident to
me, that judging from the past, Christ would attach himself
to neither society. And whilst he would ever reiterate
no drunkard can inherit the kingdom of heavenhe
would not sit
only
and
specially
in churches where men are
debarred from communion
solely
and
simply
for making, or
temperately using, certain drinks, and when
nothing else
could be laid to their charge.
Sentiments like these, I am aware, would make ultra
men call me a winebibber and a gluttonous man; but
that is a slander every conservative must willingly bear.
The fury, and malice, and billingsgate of partisan moralists
will soon become proverbialand dictionaries of hard names
may easily be complied from their speeches. The
nineteenth
century is remarkable for many changes, but not the
least remarkable change is the transfer of blackguardism
from the illiterate wicked, to the lectures, and essays, and
sermons of the learned (?) good (??) men! But with some
saints, pious frauds are holy artifices; and their ends justify
all means, there being usually, however, a decided
preference
for bad means, and a bad use of good means.
Doubtless your neighbors out there will
excommunicate
me for such opinions, even as they have one of their
number who ventured a book on slavery: but they could not
be more willing to get rid of me, than I of them.
Yours ever,
R.
Carlton
.
LETTER XII.
Extract from a letter from Charles Clarence
.
Somewhersburgh, Intermediate Purchase.
Dear Robert
, * * * but you have turned
theologian
.
Suppose we tax your time and patience on some of
our clerical topics? What if I ask whether you believe in
Special Providences?
By the way, how do you get so much into company with
learned doctors of medicine? Do you go among the learned
gentlemen of the law, too, dear Robert? I know you like
our cloth as well as ever; but our model Bishop, poor Shrub,
is gone clean over the dam. Alas! I had learned to love
him, from many years' intimate acquaintance, and I love him
yet; but being an orthodox man myself, of the stern old
school divinity, I can but condemn the bishop now. His
mind seems of such a nature as to fill entirely up with one
idea at a time, to the exclusion of all cautions, exceptions, and
consequences; making him forgetful, that in most matters,
4
the truth and its value to us, is in the whole and not the part;
as if a man should contend that the hand or the foot was all.
Separately, things may be useless, or pernicious, or false,
which, when combined, are the whole truth and nothing but
the truth. Our friend seems not to take the whole at once;
although like your circumferential men he bids fair to go the
whole figure in another way. And yet, we may rather call
him tangential, for he flies off continually, first in one
direction
,
and then in another. Let us hope, however, that after
having fairly run down all his hobbies he will, weary with the
exercise, return to the good old way. Perhaps if his friends
prayed more for him, and scolded less, we should again have
him among us, preaching as before. For my part, Robert,
I dare not say he went out from us because he was not of us;
because his spirit is so like that of a Christian, as to make
one hope all his aberrations may yet be consistent with grace
in the heartat all events I will never voluntarily tear him
from our charityGod be his judge.
You draw occasionally, dear Robert, incorrect inferences
from certain remarks in my letters. With you I full well
know how easy it is for the mighty to fall, and the fine
gold to become dim; but I act not from mere curiosity,
philosophy is often my aim. You need not fancy yourself a
nonpareil, so infallible and immaculate, and talk to your
fellows
as if ninnies, and the like. Set not up for a Pope, or we
will send you an old lady's scarlet undergown and her night
cap for a tiarafit vestments for infallibility, Mr. Carlton.
Robert, is there nobody in your settlement able to write
down Fourierism? Are you aware that, stripped from all
disguises
and under any name, and all modifications, it is a
covert system of bideous infidelity? We have looked into
the thing more narrowly since the vile community was
established
at Squabbleton, near Somewhersburg, and the result
of our peep is, among other matters, a conviction that their
women will become in time as shameless as the ancient
Spartan
women, who were notorious and infamous throughout all
Greece. A community in goods does very well to start with,
but it becomes before long a community in persons. The
fellows at Squabbleton
cultivate
their passions! hence it is
not very surprising that they learn to
indulge
the same. But
some of these shameless immoralists do not blush, in
admitting
consequences, and that for a very good reasonthey
have discovered that lewdness is a virtue! A church
allowing
such virtues would be wonderfully crowded! That is a
very ingenious philosophy that makes evil good, and calls
darkness light; and it has the advantage of enlisting human
nature in its favor and may plead that it is the most
natural
philosophy.
But some of the discoveries are beyond even the
vastness
of the great nineteenth itself:they have discovered
the dirt age! If association succeeds, all juveniles from
nine to twelve or thereabouts, will as naturally fall to
cleaning
gutters, hog-sties and the like, as the seniors will to lying,
stealing, and licentiousness! In that case, these philosophers
will have the glory of commencing the dirt century, and of
glorying in shame! Then all the legitimate illegitimates
may riot in the warm sunshine of their life as maggots in a
rotten carcass! And thenstupendous thought!
orphanage
will cease!the tears of widows be unknown!the
mourning of fathers ended!for every child, instead of being
fatherless and motherless, may claim any of a thousand
men and women as progenitors!and thousands of men and
women will even smile with parental love on swarms of
interesting little ones, all brothers, all sisters, like so many
small pigs squealing and grunting through community.
Infidelity! Behind thy smooth, hypocritical blandness,
some see thee as thou arta fool and a liar! The wicked
and the godless thou wilt ever beguile, but the prayerful
never. May Heaven confound thee, and blight and scatter
all thy shallow schemes and plots. Farewell!
C. Clarence
.
LETTER XIII.
Dear Charles
,Theoretically, I have ever believed in a
special providence. The denial of such proceeds from very
dishonorable views of God, and tends to practical atheism.
For years past, however, my belief has been confirmed by
experience and observation.
Special providences are not, however, so plain as to
obviate
the necessity of faith, for that would manifestly be
injurious
,
by begetting self-confidence and presumption; but
to the modest and humble, such providences are plain enough
to preserve in their souls joyous hope and filial trust, and to
inspirit them to watchfulness and prayer. I could, if you
cared to know them, give a few incidents that to myself are
corroborative of this position; but we shall not enter further
into the subject at present.
Charles, you seem curious to know how we contrive to
become intimate with the medical folks; well, I will tell
you. One of our rules, (and we have several,) has ever
been this: Go every where; see every thing; get
acquainted
with all sorts, classes and conditions of men; mingle
freely with your fellows; never let official dignity and that
sort of consequence be a barrier to a rational intercourse
with the world.' Hence, reverend sir, we have contrived
with some slight damage, perhaps, to the high polish and
solemn grandeur of dignitywe have yet contrived to
mingle
pretty freely with black men and with men of black;
with men of law and with lawless men; with the curative
fraternity and with some that do not cure at all; with people
that are professors of all things and with some that profess
nothing: in short, as far as our limits allowed, we are a kind
of cosmopolite, and yet, as we would fain hope, not a
worldly
man.
It may be useful to your little people to know, that very
early in life the desire which led to my forming the rule was
awakened by the story of the two schoolboys that spent a
half-holiday in precisely the same circumstances, but with
this difference in themselves: the one kept his eyes shut, the
other open. If, therefore, Mr. C. may, in imitation of the
great Roman orator, speak of his attainments, capabilities,
and the like, as being something worth naming, they are due
in very great measure to that little story; and children's
books do often producehem!great results.
And, if we mistake not, our reverend friend himself must
have certain rules not unlike our own. Did he not once
travel in a stage-coach, and without his clerical regimentals,
and there so warmly and eloquently and successfully
advocate
religion and morals as to be mistaken for a
pious
lawyer
?
And did he not occasionally hear and see a thing or
two not usually said and done before the officially religious,
but which, to the surprise and may be edification of
fellow-travellers
,
were so corrected and rebuked as to make it felt
that
truth
had been offended and not a
parson?
But apropos of doctorspermit me to introduce one, of
whom the Faculty are not ashamed; a man among men,
whom this guarded praise even will make blush: my
intimate
friend and bosom companion, Doctor Winterton. To
him, Charles, you owe the incidents in my former letters,
where we talked so irreverently of mesmerism and other
quackeries; and those stories are true, strictly and literally,
except that
names
and
places
are made to conceal persons.
Indeed, my friend's store is apparently exhaustless; and could
I tell his histories on paper as he tells them orally, why then I
do believe the world would have another book. Perhaps, if we
send them to you in our letters, you may try a hand at the
art and mystery of enlightening and enlivening the world
hey? And now, I think, some incidents in the doctor's life
will illustrate our position and opinion about special
providence
,
and we shall give you one or two hereafter.
Alas! poor Shrub! and yet I am so far provoked as to
say he deserves to be anagrammatized and writtenBrush.
If the
fine gold
there have not become dim, the fragrance, at
least, of his good name is gone, and we have instead, only
the crackling of the dry wood. Charles, I mean not to
defend
,
in the general, what is called light reading, but had
our dear friend dealt more in that kind of writing and
literature
,
and less in theological writing, his mind would have
escaped a species of monomaniaphilosophizing about
religion
.
Nor could any light reading that
he
would have
written, have done harm to the extent of his philosophical
writingsnay, Shrub
could
have written only what was
useful
.
Few men equal himnone excel himin delightful
conversation: easy, fluent, spicy, sprightly, playful, serious,
religious, yes, spiritual. And what immense stores of
knowledge! And what style and diction! Why, Charles,
our friend could, like the Scotch reviewer, have written a
whole magazine himself: critiques, heavy articles, light
articles
,
histories, tales, poetry, proseall himself. And that
would have made him, what he is not, a man of the world,
and enlarged his organ (he loves phrenologies) of
common-sentive-ness
,
and destroyed the bigness of his other organ,
gummabilitiveness. He would have stood at the head of the
review and magazine world, instead away down ever so far
in the theological.
Let us subject to philosophical processes all natural
things, and our own minds, as far as they are
natural;
but
spiritual things, and our own minds, wrought upon by a
spiritual
agent, may not, without arrogance and danger, be
subjects
of philosophy. Here faith and obedience are reason;
and the main and essential principles require no philosophy
either to discover or elucidate them. It may sometimes be
unavoidable, but even then, it is to me, Charles, an alarming
necessity to speak of the intellect and will of God in a manner
analogous to our own. Not only is there a vain philosophy,
such as the apostle names, but a philosophy, true in some of
its uses, becomes vain and often impious when applied to
heavenly things.
Who by
searching
can find out the Almighty further than
he is revealed in his word? And why should Christians
know in this age, except by
faith,
other than Christians in
primitive times? By
faith
then was it known that the worlds
were made; are we now, in the nineteenth century, to know
that fact in a different way?
Men, indeed, affect to philosophize about the manner
only, and not the facts themselves. But is not the manner a
fact as mysterious and incomprehensible as the other facts?
And how very soon do we come, first to doubt and then to
deny facts, unless such may have happened, or shall happen,
in
our
manner? If a knowledge of modes were essential to
salvation, philosophy would be duty, and industry here be
rewarded
with success; but if facts, and without inquiry, are
to be admitted and believed as the rule of life, then concern
about modes is vain, impious, and pernicious.
To me, Charles, it seems wise as well as reverent, to
believe
that God made the worlds. And if he says it was only
so many centuries ago, that I will believe, although geology
might seem to affirm otherwise. If, indeed, the Scriptures
allow a variety in interpreting the five chapters of Genesis,
very well: but if that be inadmissible, geological facts must
be explained on some hypothesis that shall not contradict the
Bible. And so, if it be true that our mortal bodies are to be
raised, a simple belief of that fact is all that is required, and
I may not, and I
will not
disturb my mind as to the manner;
nor, if the manner revealed shall seem to contradict our
philosophy
,
will I laboriously bend revealed fact there to what
we call reason. The resurrection is not to be judged by
natural
philosophy at all; it is to be subjected to no tests
whatever;
it is simply to be believed
. If, indeed, we are
asked to admit what is manifestly absurd, and plainly
contradictory
to our senses, we may, and must reject such a
matter; but, in regard to the common and popular doctrine
of the origin of the world and the resurrection of the body,
no such absurdity and contradiction exist. The
resurrection
of the same identical body after the lapse of many ages,
may
contradict all human philosophies, and yet be true;
or
rather it is a fact beyond the range of human sciences, and
neither contradicts nor agrees with our known laws and
rules. It is a law and rule, and, if we may so speak, a
philosophy
and science by and of itself. At all events, I feel
myself safer with the
multitude
here, than with the few
sagacious
men, who have had visions, and dreams, and
imaginary
revelations; and I shall, with God's grace, go down into
the grave believing that I shall rise again, with a new and
spiritual body, and yet so like the present as to be properly
and truly the same.
Charles, I pardon your sneer about my infallibility,
especially
as you, a grave and reverend seigneur, indulge
in that pretty philippic about Fourierism. It seems that folks
not
infallible, may yet on fitting occasions have a very
virtuous
indignation towards fools or infidels. But, sir, I have
yet to learn that one may not laugh at what is intrinsically
absurd
,
and speak indignantly at manifest wickedness, without
being maliciously ranked among the popes. Know, my
friend, that a very wide difference lies between ridiculing
what is true and proper, and setting in its true and proper
light what is intrinsically false and ridiculous. That
ridicule
is not always a test of truth, and that it may be
improperly
applied, we admit: but it is a legitimate and valuable
weapon with which to attack follies of a certain character.
When we set folly and absurdity in a true light, we do not
ridicule, but we merely place a matter where it ridicules
itself
.
And he that can fairly set a ridiculous and wicked
thing in such true light and faithful attitude, does virtue and
goodness a valuable service. All argumentation is only to
reduce things to few and obvious principles, and much
argumentation
is to reduce things to an absurdity (the
reductio ad
absurdum
of the logician); but if we set a wicked and silly
thing where it is seen through without argumentation, we
act both logically and religiously; and we also save time.
But look to it, neighbor; the nice ears and delicate taste
of folks now-a-days would be greatly shocked and disgusted
to hear you say dirt age; perhaps as much so as others
would be to see the real vileness, and hear the infidel chuckle
of the solemn jackasses who go the whole hog (yes, hog it
is) in the Fourier conspiracy against religion and virtue.
Many folks are too refined to use or hear vulgar words,
that see and do very vulgar things; and these will ever
object
to your decrying or opposing vice, unless it be done
tastefully!
Of such, sir, beware! for should you read my
letters to your friends, I shall do the ditto in here, and here
we have some very
nice
people.
Yours ever,
R. Carlton
.
LETTER XIV.
Dear Charles
,Of course, you were not wrong in your
guess: I had a doctor at my elbow; and, as you insist, here
is an incident in his life; and one in which my friend sees
clearly the hand of a special providence.
Like many persons who have been distinguished in life,
he is the son of a worthy farmer. His father, who died
some twenty years ago, left his children little beyond a
patriarch's
blessing. Hence my friend in early manhood,
after
having completed a course of medical reading and study
under the direction of the best physician in Kaleidaville,
found himself unable, for want of pecuniary means, to attend
the medical lectures annually delivered in our larger cities.
While looking around for means of raising money, being
resolutely bent on completing his education, the company of
volunteers, of which he was a member, was unexpectedly
ordered by the governor of his native state to proceed to
the fort on the sea-coast, as part of the garrison.
To all human appearance, here then seemed an
impervious
barrier to the attainment of his object; and he appeared
farther removed than ever from completing his education.
Abandoning, therefore, with a heavy heart his hopes,for he
was too patriotic and too poor either to look for, or pay a
substitute,he shouldered his musket, and with the
knapsack
at his back, in which was stored all his earthly goods,
away he marched to the scene of his new duties.
A few nights after the arrival at the fort, and after a day
of severe manual labor, he had thrown himself, in his
fatigue
dress, upon the floor, and was sinking into a profound
slumber, when suddenly the door of the room was opened,
and the colonel of the regiment in full uniform entered, and
asked for Mr. Winterton.
On being roused by his comrades, our friend, presuming
some military duty was required, arose, made his military
obeisance, and was in the act of shouldering his musket,
when the colonel said,
No, sir; you will not need your musketfollow me.
Surprised and wondering, our hero followed the officer,
and having at that age more than a due veneration for the
epaulettes
,
he kept so far in the rear, as to render it necessary for
the colonel to beg the favor of his nearer company. After
a walk of some five minutes, the party halted in front of the
governor's head-quarters; and in a few moments our friend
followed the colonel into a large room where he found a
company of officers, and, in the midst, the governor and his
staff and suite. In a few minutes the captain of Winterton's
company arose and said,
May it please your excellency, the young gentleman
is present, that I named to your excellency.Mr. Sarben
Winterton.
What was the still greater wonder of our herowho
before
had a thousand mingled thoughts and misgivingswhen,
upon this, his excellency, in a very courteous and
conciliatory
manner, thus addressed him;
4*
Mr. Winterton, you are appointed physician to the
regiment. You will please, therefore, assume a dress
befitting
your rank: and as several of the men are reported on
the sick list, and need immediate attention, we beg you will
lose no time in entering on your new duties. You will draw
on the commissary department for what shall be needful;
and in due time present your accounts for settlement.
The Gubernator and his Primarii and Secundi, it would
seem, as is usual among the higher ranks of patriots, both
civil and military in all ages, were enjoying a feast for the
good of the state; when in the midst of the hilarity, several
soldiers were reported as being suddenly seized with an
alarming illness; and inquiry, of course, was made at
head-quarters
for the regimental physician. But, alas! the young
gentleman, Doctor Drag, whose friends had all been anxious
for his appointment, and who had in fact been recorded in
the governor's book as the physician, had not yet made his
appearance. Hence arose no small perplexity. It was late
at night; no medical aid could be got from the city till the
next day; and that delay might be fatal to the sick, and
disgraceful
to the superiors.
In this dilemma, Captain Bevan, who commanded
Winterton's
company, and who was well acquainted with our
friend, and with all his family, arose, and said,
If your excellency permit, I beg leave to say, that there
is in my company a young gentleman, who has studied
medicine
for some years with a very prominent physician at
Kaleidaville
;
and in this emergency nothing better, perhaps,
can be done than to commit the sick men to my friend Mr.
Winterton.
Nothing more fortunate, Captain Bevan, replied the
governor, your friend without doubt will answer your
expectation
.
Who will conduct Mr. Winterton hither? And
then turning to his secretary, he continued, Mr. Secretary,
please erase the name of Doctor Drag, and insert that of
Dr. Winterton.
Captain Bevan immediately offered to summon our friend
into their presence, but was prevented by the colonel of the
regiment, who instantly set out for his quarters, and as we
have seen, returned with the new-made physician.
Well, Doctor Winterton, without the loss of a moment
repaired to the hospital, and was so successful in his
prescriptions
and nursing, that the sick were soon relieved and
in a few days reported as fit for duty. And what is very
remarkable and creditable, so judiciously did Winterton treat
the sick at that time, that, during the whole period of six
months which the regiment did duty in the garrison, not a
single soldier died!
An officer, indeed, of high rank was taken ill, and being
deemed too important a person by his friends to be left in
camp, he was sent to the city; but there, from some cause
not known, he died, and that with all the skill of eminent
medical
men exerted in his case. Some even regretted that the
officer had not been left to the care of our friend.
In the official reports of the day, Doctor Winterton was
honorably named; and on applying for his salary it was
cheerfully paid, and with many encomiums. With that
salary he was able to attend a suitable course of medical
lectures, and thus to lay still broader the foundation for
becoming
what he has becomea very eminent physician and
surgeon.
In all this my friend thinks, as we have remarked, that
he discerns the hand of a special providence; and, Charles,
we cannot but think he discerns rightly.
Yours, ever,
R. Carlton
.
LETTER XV.
Dear Charles
,I knew you would be interested in my
friend, and that you would like to hear more about him.
Well, here are two incidents more in his life, which are given
that you clergymen may learn that other folks meet with
early trials in getting into professions and trades. Scarce
any man, please your reverence, but has passed through
some curious affairs in youth; only the parsons, gowned and
ungowned, have the ear of the world, and they contrive, in
one way or other, direct and indirect, to let that world know
their histories, while we laymen are regarded as
commoners,
in
incidents and circumstances. If we kept diaries and
journals
,
and had a score of religious newspapers to record and
herald all our private feelings, and doings and intentions, as
well as our public ones, the world would oh! and ah! over
us too; but that belongs to the privileged class.
However
,
I do not mean any offence, Charles, but yet I think no
more of a
private
journal
intended
to be published, than of a
private
prayer
intended
to be overheard; for a domine's heart
is about as tricky and treacherous as other men's, and he
may pray and preach and sigh for
Buncum,
rather than for
the church.
But let me not digress. My friend, as you know, was
not born to affluence. Hence, while engaged in his
elementary
medical studies, he labored under many
disadvantages
from want of books and bones: for in his master's
office
was no skeleton. His progress was therefore, of
course, slow, since no deep impression was left on the mind
from mere text-books; and our hero became haunted, not
with a ghost, but with a desire after a veritable raw head
and bloody bones. Not knowing, however, where that rarity
was to be obtained, he became disheartened; when a friend
came to his relief.
A gentleman one day, on entering the office, found Mr.
Winterton in a melancholy mood, and on learning the cause
he replied: Then, Winterton, you need be plagued no
longer, for about three miles from this, in the woods, I passed
a human skeleton to-day. A few months ago, a poor
unknown
man was found dead in the woods; but as the body
was almost a mere mass of putrescence, the neighbors could
not bury it, and therefore they only heaped over it a mound
of earth. The dogs, however, have dragged the body out,
and I saw the bones to-day: there is a skeleton for you, if
you dare go after it, Winterton.
Well, our friend did dare to go after it, and he determined
to obtain the precious articles within the ensuing
twenty-four
hours. Then, as now, great repugnance existed in the
community towards every thing in the way of bone-stealing,
and so the skeleton was to be brought away at night.
Furnished
with a suitable bag, Winterton sallied forth that night
alone, and after groping his way through a gloomy and
tangled
forest, rendered more solemn by the dubious light of a
beclouded moon, he came to the desecrated spot. And there,
sure enough, lay torn from the rude sepulchre by greedy
dogs, the sad relics of the unknown wanderer!
Charles, what a scene! what strange thoughts must have
passed through Winterton's mind as he stooped to gather
those bones! How like an unholy wizard about to engage
in mystic rites, for which were essential the bones of a
murdered
man gathered at midnight! How strangely dismal
and frightful the distant howl of a doga signal to the fierce
demons that preside over murder and hate to hasten to the
scene of incantation! How would the Roman Satirist have
wrought up such an act to immortalize a neighbor that
had incurred his ill-will, or that seemed worthy of censure!
Bag the bones, however, did our hero, a youth then just
seventeen years old; and returning without interruption
from the manes, he long preserved the skeleton to aid his
studies. Is it very wonderful that Winterton should have
made an eminent physician and surgeon? He would have
stood the shot from Hunting-shirt Andy.
Many years after this event, when my friend had become
widely and favorably known as a physician, he was placed
in a situation in which were oddly and frightfully combined
the ludicrous and the solemn: and where nothing but great
self-possession could have saved him from violence.
Several miles from Kaleidaville, among wild hills and
rude inhabitants, an aged man had died in a manner so
singular
,
that our doctor was desirous of ascertaining the cause.
He accordingly obtained permission for the
post mortem
,
explaining
,
as he supposed, what would be done, and what was
the intention; and late at night, attended by several medical
students and a neighboring physician, he appeared at the
house of the deceased, and with the implements of the
profession
.
The house had but two rooms. In one lay the body of
the grandfather in a coffin; in the other,
asleep
in their
beds! were the
bereaved
grandsons,two stout young
semi-barbarians
,
with all the prejudices of illiterate men against
dissections and skeleton-mongers. Whether they had fully
understood the benevolent design of the doctor is
questionable
:
at all events the affair as yet did not seem to disturb
their equanimity, for both were snoring away, leaving the
grandfather to his fate.
The body was quickly removed from the coffin, and,
divested
of the shroud, was laid upon the table. The coffin
itself was placed upon the floor immediately along side the
table, and the lid of the coffin was put against the wall.
And now the company stood around, to witness the
dissection
.
Detail is unnecessary; but, as is frequent with tyros
in this sort of cutting and slashing, one of the party near the
end of the coffin suddenly sickened, and, before it had even
been noticed, fell in a deep fainting fit, exactly into the open
coffin belowa substitute for the dead man!
At the instant, aroused by the noise, the two grandsons
sprang, in terror, from their beds, burst through the partition
into the roomin sleeping costume, both brief and
unornamented
,and
changed at the sight of the bloody corpse into
furies, with doubled fists and loud outcries, they charged on
my friend, now suddenly deserted by the others! for, at the
first alarm all had hurried away, leaving the doctor alone to
confront the savages!
Imagine all this, Charlesthe coffin with its new tenant;
the naked body gashed with a frightful wound and stained
with blood; the doctor in dissecting order, knife in hand,
and blood upon his arms; before him two half naked furies,
yelling and swearing, ready to tear him to pieces, and he the
while self-possessed!
It undoubtedly requires courage to stand in the array of
battle, confronting danger in the field; but surely he, also,
that could be self-possessed and calm in a scene like that in
which my friend stood, and threatened with such a danger,
is courageous.
The doctor succeeded, at length, in pacifying the young
men; and with their aid he restored the fallen, if not from
the tomb, yet from the coffin; and then, all matters being
adjusted, our party returned home. But it was several days
before the terrified student recovered from this
post mortem
.
Many other passages could I give you from the Diary
of a Physician, to show that many laymen have had early
struggles and curious adventures; although many excellent
people seem to imagine that such matters are specially
confined
to clergymen. As for myself, I have been too intimate
with several medical gentlemen, not to know that their
labors
,
trials, anxieties, and disappointments equal, if not greatly
exceed, those of most clergymen. But you know, Charles,
that my love for your order, and my opinion of their very
great excellence, has been expressed,
ex animo
, in a public
work.
Yours ever,
R.
Carlton
.
LETTER XVI.
Dear Charles
I am not surprised that you stand
up for the clergy; but why read my last two letters to that
inveterate skeptic, Coolheady? Did you not know he would
say, All accidentall accident: general providences are,
perhaps, well enough; but none of your special affairs for
me; or, if any special ones occur, it is only on grand
occasions
.
And have you learned to sneer from that old infidel, when
you wish to know what special providence is illustrated
by the incident of the skeleton and that of the dissection?
Why, you wiseacre, those two incidents were not told for that
purpose; although, even in them, we can see goodness, and
wisdom, and even specialty. Such things may be necessary
to form a special character; and to act in circumstances
where previous drilling in calmness and courage and
self-possession
were the main things needful to success.
Pray, tell me, Charles, does your
soi-disant
philosopher
believe at all in a Supreme Intelligent Sovereign? If he
does not, our argument is ended; an infidel of his age is past
my powers. But if he does, please ask him what he means
by
accidents
in the government of an infinitely wise and
powerful ruler?
We all know that things, as far as we are concerned,
may often be accidental; they may happen without our
contrivance
,
forethought, wish; but that is a sorry philosophy
which makes such things accidents with God. Contempt is
generally felt, and by a certain class often expressed, for our
views. Aye! they are the men; and devout people, with
them, are little better than good simpletons. But we really
pity that folly which can admit, in the government of God, a
single accident; and which makes the all-wise one rectify
his mistakes and alter his plans, when accidents have (
horresco
referens
) taught Him weakness or error! What a
magnificent worm a self-inflated philosophist is!
My old neighbor allows indeed, general, but not
special providences! Possibly, Coolheady may
confound
special
with
miraculous
interference. In that case
his distaste of a misapprehended doctrine, is not marvellous.
Some nominally good persons do seem to speak as if, with
them, special providence was a miraculous interference, in
which the laws of nature were contradicted, or suspended,
or altered: but nothing can be more unscriptural,
unreasonable
,
or even unnecessary.
By special providences, we mean a divine arrangement
that affects and influences all persons, things, actions, and
events, disposing and allotting all matters minutely and
accurately
,
and yet in, and by, and with, the proper use of
suitable and common means. Providence is so general, as
usually to human sight it seems to neglect and overlook
the particular; and then on the other hand so special, as if
it contemplated one thing, and one only.
We further believe, that the special providence is such
disposal of all things, whether rational or irrational, animate
or inanimate, and of all means, agencies and
instrumentalities
,
as shall at a precise moment, accidental to us, but
intended
by God; miraculous to human eye, but wholly,
naturally
,
and well understood to any endowed with higher
intelligence
,
or to man himself, if admitted to a nearer view;
as shall at a precise moment of need, do for us or give us,
what was most earnestly desired, but not expected. It is in
this secret ordering and arranging of natural causes the
special providence consists.
And, Charles, such special providence, more or less
marked, takes place every day and hour and moment. No
man is altogether destitute of such peculiar divine care, in
his history. Most, however, have no skill to discern them;
and too many have not piety enough to regard them, or be
thankful. God, in this respect, as well as in what is deemed
his ordinary and general care, has not left himself without
witness; but men impiously shut their eyes, resolving all
into accident, and confessing, with something like a
complimentary
acknowledgment, that the Supreme is a God in the
general way, yet has neither power, wisdom, skill nor
inclination
to enter into specialties.
Doubtless, special providences are more remarkable in
the case of good men; for in this sense, as in all others,
The secret of the Lord is with them that fear him: yet
such providences are not confined to professedly or really
good men. The goodness of God in this way leads men to
repentance. If men do neglect the special interference,
and particularly if they scorn it, they seem to be often given
over by God to delusion in regard to his government; and
come at last on this, as on all other moral and spiritual
subjects, to believe a lie.
Dear Charles, it is my firm conviction, founded on
evidence
satisfactory to myself, that if providences are
carefully
regarded by us, and thankfully improved, and if we do,
childlike, trust implicitly in God as a Father reconciled
through his Son; it is my firm conviction that special
providences
will increase in number, and, if I may so speak, in
intensity, so that we may look back and see them like so
many distinct and bright lights in the darkness of the past,
marking there the path along which we are walking to our
rest. Or, perhaps, our sight becomes improved, and we
clearly discern the finger of God, where the wilfully blind
see only chance. In either case, we reap the good fruit of
obedience and love; and thus walking with God we have a
clear and blessed light, where others grope in darkness.
Mr. Coolheady
pities
my delusion! No, Charles, he
scorns
mine: it is I that
pity
his. How can he
pity
, when
he cannot believe me a loser? I see and know him to be a
loser of measureless joy and hope. Alas! poor old
gentleman
,
I have spoken playfully about him sometimes, but
Charles, I
do
pity him.
What infatuation! to suppose the Supreme Being acts
specially and particularly on what we deem state occasions;
or when there is a time worthy of a God. All God's
creatures
are dear to him, Charles. Oh! the blessed Bible!
it so accords with our natural instincts and wants and desires
and fears and hope! It was sent down from Heaven for the
childlike, for the helpless, the weak, the poor, the
disconsolate
.
What a world of assurance in a few words!the
hairs of your heads are all numbered! not a swallow
falls to the ground without God's permission! No! no!
philosophers never
did
make the Biblethat is true enough.
And thank God they
never
did. Philosophy would have given
us a
general
providence, a dignified, gentlemanly,
scholar-like
,
statesmanly affair! Avaunt thee, Fool! Wrap
thyself
courtly in the robes of stateliness and formality and
scornful complaceney! Strut around with bespangled fan of
peacock and large feet, before the wondering eyes of gaping
earth-worms! In the lawful way of God's own book, I
hate thee with perfect hatred; and I account thee
mine
enemy, for thou art God's.
Yours, ever,
R.
Carlton
.
LETTER XVII.
Dear Charles
,Doubtless your opinion is, in the
general
,
correct; autobiography is interesting and valuable. But
do you really think mine would be as much so as other
men's?
I do, indeed, see in my own life incidents corroborative
of the doctrine of special providences; but a thousand
circumstances
partially forgotten, and many others not suitable
to make known, are necessary to set in a clear light the
whole of the fact. And yet the conviction in my mind arose
from the whole, of which these circumstances are an
essential
part. I act, however, not irrationally if that conviction
is retained as a general principle, even when the steps of the
induction may have been forgotten. Most of the grand rules
and principles regulating any man's life are, I presume, thus
retained; when the reasons for his rules and principles are,
in some cases, gone beyond recall, and in others, are very
obscurely perceived. Nay, we sometimes in trying to satisfy
ourselves and others about our principles, give very good
reasons, which yet are not
the
reasons precisely that led to
our adoption of the principles, although the new or modified
reasons are corroborative of the principles. Perhaps, every
good principle in its exercise, gives continual insight into the
reasons of its own existence; for if good, it must be
reasonable
,
and become fortified at every step.
You say, you cannot but think I must speak from
experience
myself, and that it would really be gratifying, and
no doubt instructive to hear that experience! Dear Charles,
do you wish me to become a Congregationalist, and give
in my experience to the church, not in a representative but
collective capacity? Why, Charles, that experience
contains
a dream; and would, no doubt, by some pure
democratical
churches be regarded as a very important part. I
have no great objection to give certain incidents to you, and
through you, to the few friends: but these incidents must
be taken unsupported by many circumstances, and rather as
part only of the reason, fixing my conviction of a special
providence.
But what, dear friend, shall be first told? To my mind
the perpetual guardianship of Providence has been so marked,
that I feel like a witness to the truth of a remark made once
in my hearing by one of your venerable clergymenthat
God took special care of the orphans of religious parents!
You know my history, Charles, how I was left an orphan
in early infancy. But God so ordered that, although I never
had any legal guardian, I was most carefully instructed by
those sainted friends who acted as mothers to the deserted
child. I was by them imbued in the precious elementary
doctrines of the Christian religion. And
that
mark me
carefully
,
Charles
that
was to me a most special providence:
for that only saved me from an early perdition, and, if I ever
reach a better world, did, as an instrument, insure my home.
But how came I to receive that religious instruction?I
think(how can I think otherwise?) it was in answer to a
Mother's prayer!
* * * *  yes! thou hadst a crushed spirit,
my mother! Thy little ones all in their widely separated
graves! thyself brought down from the high pinnacle of this
world's grandeur to the lowly valea stranger far away
from thy home of the sunny South! They told me, dear
faithful Africans, in after years, how thou wouldst gush into
tears, when looking on thy sole-remaining, feeble little boy
and pray! Oh! I see theea misty dream of the dim
pastyet real! I see theea stately forma flowing dress
in the fashion of by-gone years! Mother!but alas! I
should not know thee!thy face I never learned! Yet I
have read that
Prayer!
Years ago it was minethe
heedless child lost itbut
God
lost it notHe heard and
answered
!
Clarence, my second mothers (they were Christ's friends)
used to make me kneel night and morning in prayer; they
carried me to the house of God; they sought in every way
to fill my mind with truth; and they did, indeed, so
preoccupy
and impress my soul, that years after, as shall be
presently
shown, the effect was visible. The seed was sown,
and the harvest at last came.
Those dear friends died, and I became a second time an
orphan. I became worsea wanderer far away from God.
Alas! a wanderer, not in the ordinary sense of that term,
but I became an open reviler of religion! I went no more
to church. I ceased even from prayer! It may not be told
how very far and fast was my wandering from all goodness.
Many, Charles, have gone only half my frightful way, who
have never returned. And why? No dear mother ever
prayed for themno special providence staid them.
You know, my friend, my passion for the theatre in early
life. Did you know, too, that I had once resolved to become
a player? And what, think you, prevented such an one as
I from turning to that unholy profession? How happened
it, that a young man of infidel sentiments, of licentious
thoughts, an habitual Sabbath-breaker, who spent that sacred
time in reading plays and practising instruments of music,
one who for years did not affect to pray even by rote, and
dared to scoff at things the most holyhow happened it, that
such a person, with strong passion for the theatre, and, as
some would say, with no mean capacity for that employment,
and after resolving to go to the managers of the theatre and
seek admission, that such an one should suddenly stop, and
far enough from being what is termed awakened or
converted
,
turn away in horror, as if from a deep and frightful
abyss?
Hear why, Charles. Down deep in his inmost heart
were dormant truths, implanted years before, which all of a
sudden waked in their energy, and said in a still small voice,
and yet powerful as God's own thunderThou hast gone
to the verge of ruin away from God!another step and
return
is
impossible! As yet thou hast not
sold
thyself for a
price! In the theatres they act on Saturday night till
Sabbath
morning; and during the Sabbath they rehearse to play
again on Monday night. Now, if thou dost deliberately take
gold
, and do all this, it is
selling thy soul to hell!
Forbear!
If thou dost not, return to God is
impossible!
Did I, who had scoffed at all religion, and in such a way
as would have chilled your very blood, Charles, did I scoff
at this? And why not? Would not every infidel in the
land that should be told this scoff at it
now
, and regard me
as a fool?
My answer is, a mother's prayer had been recorded, and
a special and direct providence recalled the former religious
teaching of my second mothers, and made it suddenly and
irresistibly efficacious.
Yours, ever,
R.
Carlton
.
LETTER XVIII.
Dear Charles
,You say that no comments will be
made till you have other incidents, and that perhaps you will
then favor me with some remarks.
Well, I do not propose to give you my whole string of
onions at once, or one at a time; but I shall throw specimens
off as they come to memory.
From boyhood, even to the very hour of writing now, I
have had a nervous horror as to certain forms of violent
death. I profess not to be a brave man; and yet am I not,
perhaps, pre-eminently a coward. In a just cause, I could,
especially if
backed
by an officer sword in hand, face the
cannon's mouth;
but either with or without an officer, I
certainly
would not, and could not, stand a charge. I should
die with fright! If my death must be a violent one, let my
head be shot awaybut oh! do not run me through with
any thing like cold iron or gleaming steel! Eh! there's a
shiver now!
In other words, Charles, my imagination is not utterly
overwhelmed with horror in contemplating violent death in
some of its forms. Death, for instance, from a cannon ball
is passed in a moment; it leaves no time for thought. My
agitation, however, is very great if death approaches me
slowly yet surely, and penetrates by inches to the seat of
life. Let my courage be screwed ever so near to the
sticking
or standing point, the point of a pike or the gleam of a
bayonet, or the flash of a sword, would lower my martial
ardor in a moment down to zero, if not several inches below.
At all events, the bare sight of two ill-favored cutlasses
once saved me from entering on a mode of life in which there
is the greatest probability of departing far away from
goodness
and heaven. Certainly some ways of living, deemed
lawful, are yet utterly and irreconcileably at war with
Christianity
.
In my wild oats eraand wild enough they wereI
determined, partly in a fit of burning indignation at what
was conceived ill-treatment, and partly in a fit of boyish
heroism
,
to abscond from a detested employment, and become
neither more nor less than aprivateersman! For many
days the subject was deeply pondered; and all the chances of
death, life, pleasure, plunder, honor, and the like, were
calculated
,
till a resolution was taken to brave all consequences
and immediately to enlist on board Moffatt's vessel. Having
no day so opportune, I waited till the coming Sabbath, and
then, instead of reading Shakspeare, I called up all the
manor demon, (?) Charles, and wended my way, sullen
and resolved, to the wharf.
And there lay the vessel. I may not say there were in
my heart no misgivings, no relentings before; I may not say
there were no thoughts of dear and kind friends that had
taught me prayers, in my dark and tossing spirityes, there
was a fierce conflict within. But alas! what home had I?
Ah! Charles, there were things in my early days bitter
indeed
,
and which often drove my wayward and proud spirit to
the verge of madness, or worse! The changes in my
treatment
and hopes were too sudden and grievous for a boy to
bear philosophically, and with scarce a friend or adviser. I
may not say, then, there were no repentings before. But at
last I was on the point of entering the ship; it was low tide;
the scene is before me now; but as I was about to put my
foot on her deck to inquire for the captain, my eye caught,
just above the entrance of the companion-way, two drawn
cutlasses crosseda sign that she was a vessel of war!
Had no weapons been there, or had the weapons been
pistols
,
muskets, or any species of fire-arms, my resolution
would not have been shaken; but at the sight of these drawn
swords, in a moment all my nervous fear of death from
cutting
awoke, and I became in an instant what the world calls
a coward, andI fled!
I know Mr. Coolheady will enjoy a hearty laugh at this
accident
, as he will call it. Very well; I am afraid of cold
steel, it is true, but my nerves will stand his scorn and that
of a ship-load or regiment of skeptics and infidels. Because
use is made of my idiosyncracy, if you please, or of any
other natural instrumentality, to preserve me from what is
worse, in reality, than mere temporal deaththe death of my
moralsthe care of Providence is not less wonderful, nor
less to be thanked.
We do not expect Providence to use what some would
deem great instruments only. It is more wonderful and
dignified
,
(if that term here is admissible,) for Him to work
with any and every means, and with very ordinary
instruments
to accomplish the most extraordinary results. I am,
in fact, somehow or other so steeped in my belief, or rather
the conviction of special and direct interference from heaven
is so wrought into the very fibre and texture of my soul, that
this very soul itself must be destroyed before that conviction
can be. I may be pressed with many objections, some of
which are difficult, perhaps impossible to answer; but
that is the case with any and every moral subject where it is
intended that faith should have any exercise. It is, indeed,
the case with many matters of art and science. Often, very
often is a thing admitted as true and beyond doubt, from the
clear evidences in its favor, although,
ab ignorantia
, we or
others may start unanswerable objections.
Must you have my dream, Charles? I once refused it
to a clergyman who wished to publish it. If you insist, I
must yield.
Yours, ever,
R. Carlton
.
LETTER XIX.
Dear Charles
,Allow me to write a preface to my
dream. I am not, in the vulgar sense, what is called a
believer
in dreams. Still, there is no crime nor any danger in
thinking that
some
dreams have been extraordinary and have
led to extraordinary results. It does not seem either
unreasonable
or irreligious, to hold that in regard to certain
temporal
matters in no apparent way connected with the gospel, and
therefore in no way connected with the object of revelation,
monition by unusual modes may be imparted to our minds.
Many presentiments and impressions are so marked, so clear,
so distinct, and have been followed by consequences so in
accordance with their nature, that it is more irrational to
resolve
them into accident than to admit their real character
a providential interference. And if so in regard to these
monitions, why not in regard to dreams?that is, some
dreams.
Certainly no impossibility can here be urged. And if
good cause, or a
cui bono
can be shown, as we believe may
be for some remarkable monitions by presentiment, dream,
(nay, start not, domine,) or even
apparition
, it is both
reverent
and wise to attribute such to a special, superintending
Providence.
Our day, Mr. Clarence, is Sadducean in its spirit. Men
feel
a scoffing spirit towards all views, however supported by
probable and rational argument, on the intercourse between
this visible and that invisible state, separated by a line almost
as thin as imaginary ones between the zones. Yet strange!
many infidels, who abhor the admission of such possible
intercourse
because it would admit a God at the same time, do
assiduously cultivate mesmerism! And why? Because they
hope to prove by some hocus-pocus of logic, that all miracles
may be resolved on natural principles. It is granted that
great caution is necessrry in treading on this solemn ground
of divine interference; for not a few who admit what is now
contended for, do become visionary and fanatical. But a
wide difference may be discovered between modest and
probable
things, and the hallucinations of Swedenborg.
No new religious truth, no new moral revelation is
supposed
to be conveyed to our mind by providential and special
monition: yet by such monition we may be urged to attend
to what is already revealed. Or we may be induced to shun
a lurking danger, or to send relief where it is needed. And,
pray, Charles, what harm if unusual hints and intimations
preserve in our minds a solemn awe of that mysterious world
real, although invisible?
Is it so very wonderful and incredible that the Supreme
should care about his creatures? And
a priori
is it not
vastly more probable that certain unusual monitions should
be vouchsafed, than that such should not be? For my part,
I find it impossible to divest myself of the belief of what is
now advanced; and I make the avowal, at the hazard of
being
thought credulous. Cooler and wiser men by far have
fully believed that there are more things in heaven and
earth than are dreamed of in our philosophies; and hence
if shelter be necessary, I stand behind these, and am well
content to be sneered at in such company.
Thus much for preface, and now the dream. Alas! in
recording it, I record my shame: but like other penitents, I
may, for good cause, tell of what is now sincerely abhorred
and deplored. Rarely in those days did I enter a church;
and then only to deride and scoff. Nay, my chosen
companions
would often grossly disturb and insult such religious
meetings as could be disturbed and insulted with impunity.
At length so guilty a pre-eminence was gained in impiety,
that I often, and without much alarm, used to say, If there
be
a hell, I am very sure of it! Most truly was I living
without hope and without God; and once in a sudden
fainting
fit, as I believed myself to be sinking away from the
light of life, and the cold chill of a deathful shudder was
quivering through my very soul, with senses all keenly
awake, I thought within myself, If there be a hell, perhaps,
I am
sinking
into it!
Oh! dear Charles!twice have I thought myself to be
dyingonce as an infidel apostateand once as a believer
in the Son of Godand how different my feelings! May
the Infinite Mercy keep me from the view of the abyss once
before my terrified soul!my very blood even now curdles
at the thoughts of my danger!
In the midst of this demoniacal life, when all ordinary
5
means seemed powerless to alarm me: and when, a few
months before the time of my present narrative, in the midst
of a fearful tempest, while the fierce lightnings were
gleaming
over the city like the sword of the Eternal, and the loud
voice of his thunders was shaking the houses to their
foundations
,
and many, in consequence of a prediction,
fearing
that in very deed the day of doom had arrived, lost their
senses, I had sat apparently calm upon a grass plot, and to
show my hardihood, had played an instrument of music in a
lively tuneeven in such a course of life, I was thoroughly
alarmed
by a dream!
I dreamed one night; and nothing suggested the dream
that I ever recollected, for the storm alluded to happened
months before; I dreamed myself as having gone with a
wicked comrade, one Sabbath afternoon, to disturb a prayer
meeting of Presbyterians. The meeting was held in a room
up a court or alley at the north side of the church. Whilst
we were engaged in making a disturbance at the window, on
a sudden the heaven above was wholly veiled with a
mysterious
and portentous darkness! Soon, vivid and forked
lightnings shot forth in all directions, and with an intensity
so keen that they appeared to pierce to the centre of the
earth; and loud, crashing thunder-peals made it tremble
under
our feet, as if all things were in the agony of
dissolution
!
And then immediately before our eyes opened a gulf
widebottomless! and far away down in its terrific abyss,
were voices, and wailings, and cries of strange horror! and
quenchless fires were raging in vast tumultuating waves!
Fixed at the edge of that amazing gulf, we looked at each
other in utter despair. We knew it had something to do
with our conduct; and that God Almighty was fiercely yet
righteously angry; and we seemed to be waiting only for
some invisible power to plunge us into that fiery abyss!
Soon I heard a sweet voice above me in the thick darkness
that seemed to say, Dost thou wish to be saved?on
which I eagerly replied, Oh! yes! yes! And then I
was borne up by my hair, and in an instant stood safe, across
that fearful chasm!
In a moment I looked back on my poor comrade in guilt;
and again came the voice from the darkness above, If he
will take your hand, he too can be saved; on which I
immediately
stretched out my hand, inclining myself away over
the burning pit; and my comrade, as soon as he touched
the point of my fingers, was brought over, and stood
wondering
at my side!
At that very moment the lightnings ceased; the mysterious
pall of sackcloth darkness gave place to a bright, cloudless
sky; and the awful gulf closed, leaving, as its edges were
compressed, a long ridge in the pavement. Turning to my
friend, I said, Oh! William, this is a great deliverance!
Oh! come let us go into church! The poor boy seemed
unwilling, still we both went into the house and sat together
in a pew. Upon looking at the preacher, I perceived he was
a stranger;for when I did go to church it was to this church
I came usually, and the preacher was not the one that
ordinarily
preached there. He was solemn even to awfulness;
and I listened with the profoundest solemnity, while my poor
comrade seemed careless as usual. And here the dream
was ended.
In the morning, my very soul quaked with terror. It
was with much difficulty I could perform a task. I related
the cause to a young man in the same employment, and who
himself was far from righteousness; but the bare narration
and my looks so alarmed this man, that he exclaimed, I
would not be
you
for the whole universe!
Within a few weeks, however, the deep impression of the
dream had passed, andoh! dear Charles,
can
it be
possible
?I
became again in some degree, a
derider!!
One
Sabbath afternoon I went to that very church in company
with that companion named in my dream, and a few others,
not to worship, but to triflealas! alas!to mock! A
stranger was in the pulpit. His text was, Remember thy
Creator in the days of thy youth. And most solemnly did
he warn and expostulate with the young; most tearfully did
he mourn over the reprobate, till suddenly my attention
became
irresistibly fixed. My gaze seemed riveted on his face
where, oh! where, had that solemn voice been heard, that
earnest face been seen? Charles, it was the face and the
voice of my dream!but my dream did not at that moment
occur to my mindyet it was that face, it was that voice!
His words, however, came like a sword of burning flame
into the depths of my soul. And when he told the
despairing
death of an infidel who had done a horrid act of impiety
like one I myself, my
diabolical self
, had donethen,
dearest Charles, then did the sharp arrows of the Almighty
enter and drink up my spirit! Then did the horrors of
hell get hold upon me! I
did understand
the terrors of
the Lord, and
felt
throughout my whole frame that it is a
fearful thing to fall into the hands of the living God!
That the dream had a moral influence I know. Never
did I wholly lose its impression; and never after was I so
careless and callous. Indeed, my subsequent behaviour was
to gain peace, by destroying conviction. It prepared me for
what followed, and it exerted a restraining force, in some
degree, till the hour when a voice should speak that would
be heard, and a power compel, that could not be overcome.
The preacher has gone to his rest and reward. His end
was that of the righteous. May God grant that your friend,
a penitent since that sermon, may be made to persevere, and
to embrace that beloved preacher in the better land! My
comradehe, too, is dead! But(I shudder as it is
written
)he
professed no change of opinions and practices!
He has stood before the Judge. We shall soon follow.
Yours ever,
R. Carlton
.
LETTER XX.
Dear Charles
,Some persons, and perhaps the
majority
of religious people, you say, would be at a loss to see
special providences in such things as I relate, who yet would
willingly attribute the impressions and restraints of my early
life to the Holy Spirit. Such, I presume, dear friend, class
all these matters under a term of their own
common
operations
of the Spirit. If by that term is meant that such
operations are shared by very many, be it so: but that many
are the objects of God's love is not a reason for denying a
special providence. As we have said, too many men, and
even among the professedly religious, can believe nothing to
be special and particular unless the interference be in great
matters and for great people. But why this perpetual
distrust
and secret infidelity? Will not the very arguments
that object to a special providence, overthrow all
providence
?
For myself, it is far more difficult to believe what most
call a general providence, than to admit a special, direct,
particular interference every hour and moment. I am
persuaded
that here, as in other religious things, the state of a
man's own heart influences his views. And pious persons
understand very differently at different times. To walk with
God in close and intimate communion, day and night, as ever
in his presence, admits us to many secret things never before
conjectured; and among others to a clearer perception of a
special providence.
* * * Nor are you mistaken: that people, that dear
people did receive me with open arms. Not a few did almost
literally hold me to their very heart; and with joyous eyes
streaming tears, they did look up to heaven and bless God
that the reviler was clothed, and in his right mind, at the
feet of Jesus Christ! And that reviler felt fulfilled the
promise, that he should, on deserting his sinful companions,
find brothers and sisters and fathers and mothers a
thousand-fold
.
Charles, be assured that is the meaning of the
promise. Are not all believers the sons of one Father, the
brethren of one Saviour, the loving and sanctified people
and family of one Holy Ghostwith one spirit, one faith,
one baptism? * * * * * And if the departed know
about repentant sinners, my own mother and those other
mothers
did rejoice over the returning prodigal.
The most affecting of all incidents pertaining to this period
of my second life, was the joy of my mother's African nurse,
now nearly one hundred years old. Charles, believe me that,
notwithstanding all we hear about the extreme cruelty of
slave-owners to their slaves, and the invincible hatred slaves
have for their masters, in many cases what is affirmed is a
slanderous and malicious lie
. The attachment between owners
and slaves is sometimes like the tie of a tender relationship.
Slaves may be found, who would almost die for a kind master
or mistress. There are negroes that will love the children
and the children's children, for several successive
generations
;
and who will fondle on the younger members of the
family as a mother fondles on her most beloved.
Many years ago, as I was on the point of leaving the
Island for the North, and while entering a boat, a very aged
negress, who had most carefully dressed herself for the
interview
in her gayest apparel and most gorgeous turban,
came near, and looking affectionately into my face, and
making
a low and graceful courtsey, said, Is this Miss Betsey's
son? Poor Charlotte, she had been my mother's playmate!
But when my mother, long years before, had left her native
Southto suffer, to die, in the North,Charlotte had taken
the last look of her youthful mistress, called, according to
the usage, Miss Betsey even after her marriage! And now
she looked upon her son! * * * * Charles!the
gushing
soul was in the look that came with her questionIs
this Miss Betsey's son? Was it wonderful, tears filled my
eyes? Could I have hurt or mistreated
that
woman? No!
I am not ashamed to say, tears are at this very moment
dropping
on my paper! This may provoke a sneer,that I can
stand; but I could not endure myself if there was no love in
my soul for that kind, tender, loving negro woman, who loved
my mother, and then loved her son!
Pre-eminent in attachment, however, was my mother's
nurse. At my mother's marriage, being set free, she
accompanied
her to the north, in the capacity of nurse and
housekeeper. She was a genuine African; and doubtless,
also, once a zealous idolater; for when brought to America
her face was gashed and scarred according to some pagan
superstition. Along the seams of that furrowed face how
often have I seen tears streaming! In my father's family
the faithful nurse remained till allfather, mother, children,
eight or nine in number, lay in the church-yard! Then the
great love, divided among the dead, was concentrated in her
heart, and came out in one living stream of tenderness
towards
the sole living remembrancer of the past!
They who became the second mothers of the orphan boy
then a mere infant of some three yearscould have told
how Maria clasped him to her heart; how she raved in the
very frenzy of sorrow; how she filled their dwelling with
the bitter wailing that melted all hearts; and how, in her
mistaken zeal, she interfered with necessary regulations, till
force was used to tear us apart!
Of all this I remember little. As years, however,
increased
I soon became sensible, that if the whole world
deserted
me, there was yet one heart that ever yearned over
me with a mother's strong loveone heart that could almost
have dropped its very blood to defend my lifeone heart that
would break if I had died!
How often, when she was seated at the corner of the
street selling to school children little parcels of confectionery,
have I, on approaching, seen that dim eye gleam with a
sudden
light of love!while tears ran down that seared face!
And how often, in despite of myself, have I been snatched
to that throbbing heart, amidst the wondering looks of the
passers! * * * * * * * * Oh! Charles, I
became
ashamed of this, then(my tears are often atoning
for it now)and in my far-off wanderings from God, I
partially
forgot,no, no, not
forgot
I partially and purposely
avoided her! And yet was that so surprisingshe was a
devoted Christian thenand I was a reprobate! Yes, blessed
be the Son of God, my mother's nurse was a Christian.
For more than thirty years she belonged to the Baptist Church
in ; and by repeating the texts and quotations from
the Scriptures as they were heard from the pulpit, a stranger,
to hear her use the word of God, would have supposed her
able to read.
Well, the change came. Again I went to see Maria;
and both now were happy. At one visit she said:
Dear Massa, won't you read the Bible and pray with
old Maria?
Most willingly, Maria, was my reply. And so, Charles,
I read in the Scriptures, and then, in her little dark and
humble back room, we both kneeled down togetherthe aged
saint and the repentant prodigalshe a converted idolater,
and weighed down with near an hundred years of deep and
abundant sorrow, and I a converted infidel, in the prime of
early manhood; and our souls were united in a prayer to the
same reconciled Father!
We arose from our knees. Charles,
can
I ever forget
what happened?
Never!
That dear saint of the Most High
clasped me in her aged arms, and with streaming eyes
looking
towards heaven, she exclaimed, God knows, dear
massa
,
I loved you for old massa's sake, but now I love you for
the Lord Jesus' sake!
Yours ever,
R. Carlton
.
LETTER XXI.
From Clarence to Carlton.
Dear Robert
,The history of your Maria reminds me
of an incident in my history, which perhaps may interest you.
Like most young clergymen, my first stock of written
sermons was exceedingly meagre. I commenced my
clerical
life with precisely four; which, as no opportunity offered
of writing others, were so frequently delivered and
re-delivered
,
that I really detested the sight of the articles. Still, being
on that southern journey you have elsewhere done me the
honor to celebrate, I was compelled to stick both to the texts
and the sermons. The places, it is true, where the
discourses
had to be repeated, were often two hundred miles
apart, and there was very fair chance of a bran-new
audience
every time; but I felt so satiated and disgusted myself,
it seemed even strange audiences must nauseate the
repetition
.
I have lived long enough to know that old sermons may
be occasionally used again, and with great profit, both to
speaker and hearer; but having more vanity then, and
morbid
sensitiveness, and perhaps less reliance on a higher
power
,
I felt as if my sermons were intrinsically good for nothing,
and that no good could, or even ought to be done, by
repreaching
them. I was, however, a minister of the Gospel,
and knew it was my duty always to preach when
opportunity
offered; and so I got over the
task
the best way
possible
.
I may not say how much blame may have been in all
this, nor how erroneous my estimate of the effect, but the
discourses, by the time I reached Georgia, were, to use a
westernism,
used up;
and so being importuned by some
relatives
to preach in a Baptist church some hundred miles to the
south of Charleston, I consented; stating, however, my
incapacity
of preaching without notes, and my fear that small
attention would be paid to a manuscript sermon.
Well, after being consoled with the assurance that due
allowance would be made for so young a preacher, and
complimented
on my
modesty!
I appeared with one of my
detestable
papers, and essayed to get through the affair as
comfortably
as possible. Never, dear Robert, was I more
uncomfortable
,
either in mind or body; for additional to the
cause already named, the meeting-house was an unchinked
log building, and the day (it was in the month of January)
was very cold, cloudy, and windy. There I stood, in a half
shiver, wrapped, not in a bishop's tasteful and reverend silk
gown, but in an old-fashioned worsted and striped plaid, and
read away in a trembling voice, husky from the raw and
chilly atmosphere. Indeed, Robert, I meant no irreverence,
yet I felt that so mean a service could not be acceptable, and
most certainly could not and ought not to benefit any one.
Such, I mean, were my feelings and sentiments at the time;
and perhaps might ever have been so, had I not some nine
years after been informed of one remarkable result.
After wandering in different parts of the Union for about
nine years, I again visited Philadelphia, and on going to see
a southern lady, one of my auditors on that day in the
Baptist
church, she surprised me by this exclamation:
Oh, Mr. Clarence! how glad I am to see you! Do you
remember preaching for us that time
Pray, Madam, do not name it. I am ashamed of the
little interest I felt that day in trying to do my duty
Ashamed! Why, sir, that sermon did more good than
you are aware.
Good! impossible. Such a sermon, and such a
delivery
!
Could these do good?
Yes, sir; and so will you think, when you hear my
story. A poor negro man had driven his master's carriage,
and during the service he sat out of doors, on the
carriage-box
,
and through the open chinks of the house he heard your
sermon. And what do you think, Mr. Clarence? Why, sir,
5*
he was awakened by that discourse, and he finally became,
as we all believe, a true convert! Yes, sir, he made a
profession
of religion in our church shortly after you left the
South; and for some years after he lived as a true Christian,
when he died, not only calmly but triumphantly, and is
doubtless
gone to heaven.
Dear Robert! I must say this gives me more pleasure than
to own a princely estate. If that poor African brother was
saved by my instrumentality, it was worth all my
toilsome
and hazardous journey. I am rebuked, too, and
corrected
.
But I am consoled also, with the hope that very
unworthy
services, and in which motives not wholly religious
doubtless existed, may have in other cases effected good,
without my knowledge. Possibly, some of your clerical
acquaintances would be glad to have this incident. If so,
read this letter to them.
Yours truly,
C. Clarence
.
LETTER XXII.
Dear Charles
,The mention of
your
African reminds
me of a providential deliverance Mrs. C. and myself
experienced
many years ago, in one of our journeys across the
Alleghany Mountains.
We were travelling from Kentucky to Philadelphia. We
rode in our own
carriage
(?), as my lady persisted in calling
the vehicle, to her fashionable friends. And yet, that
carriage
was a simple Yankee wagon. As we were
returning
,
however, to the lordly East, our women bodies had
persuaded me to do it up with flashy curtains and brass
nails, and with cords and tassels to match: the effect of which
fixins was to give the machine no faint likeness to a
clock-vender's
cart. And to that semblance was, in all
probability
,
owing our adventure.
One day, at the base of the Chestnut Ridge, we overtook
a very genteel negro man, who begged we would carry his
heavy saddle-bags some twenty miles; which request
obtained
,
he stepped off at a brisk pace and was soon out of
sight. But hereby hangs
not
the tale. It was the story of
your black friend which reminded me of this man, and he,
of course, brought to recollection the day and its incident.
When we overtook our dusky neighbor, the adventure was
over.
At two o'clock P. M. we began the ascent of Laurel
Hill. Our horse went up at the usual snail-pace; and
hence, as the sky was veiled with clouds, and a mist was
oozing out, our minds became gloomy and foreboding. And
that was not unnatural, as robberies, even on a large scale,
were then frequent; and a remnant of Lewes' gang lurked
yet among the mountains. We became in fact ominously
silent
.
I do not think it wrong to carry weapons for defence in
perilous journeys, although they often seem to be useless; and
for that and other reasons I had always travelled unarmed,
and was unarmed then.
About one mile of the ascent now remained, when, on
turning a sharp angle in the road, about one hundred paces
in front, as if our forebodings had become embodied, there
stood two ruffian-looking men; and each armed with a heavy
bludgeon! Our thoughts were, at the sight, simultaneously
uttered in suppressed tonesrobbers!
I had frequently tried to imagine what one's feelings
would be in such a crisis. My imaginings proved very
unlike
the reality. The first pang of fear, I do believe, was
even worse than the attack itself could have been: and it
seems possible, that men sometimes rush into real dangers to
escape the imaginary.
The fellows, after a brief conference between themselves,
came forward; the one a tall man with foul whiskers, the
other, short, robust, and with an expression of countenance
combined of cunning and recklessness. Towards our right
towered the mountain, the shadow of which concealed my
wife, so that the men doubtless mistook me for an itinerant
merchant and alone. The crisis approached. Engaging in
an intense mental prayer, I was suddenly inspired with some
courage. I resolved to make an effort, which, if it did not
save our lives, might leave a mark to aid in the discovery of
the assassins, in case of murder. In my pocket was a large
knife used to cut our provisions. This I opened in my
pocket, and grasping the handle firmly with my right hand,
I determined, if a demand was made for my money, to stab
the villain in the eye, instead of handing out my
pocketbook
.
I did not expect such a blow would actually kill him.
I expected the deep gash in his face would lead to his
subsequent
apprehension. This all was, as you will know, the
thought and act of a moment. The men were now only
a few yards distant. There seemed some hesitation in their
purpose; for they slackened their pace; and the small man,
in reply to some refusal on the part of the other, who shook
his head, replied, Well, I will then. Both then changed
their clubs into the left hands; and the tall fellow inclined
towards my horse's head; while the short one advanced
towards the side of the wagon. Lifting my soul, as I
believed
in my last prayer, I became nerved with a coward's
desperation; when, like a flash of inspiration, came into my
mind a story told by a college chum once in my room. His
uncle was startled by a negro, who sprang from the hedge
and seized his bridle; on which the gentleman bowed
politely
,
and said, Good morning, Csar! when the slave
relinquished
his hold, and bowing politely in return, leaped
back into the bushes. I resolved to do the same. Looking
steadily in the man's face as he approached, I said, How
do you do, sir?
Whether my
seeming
coolnessor the coward-like
desperation
in my manneror the discovery that I was not
alone, the nearer view having shown my wife on the next
seat behindI cannot tell whatbut the fellow instantly
changed his purpose, and with a bitter and snarling tone
returned
the salutation. The next moment both, turning away,
hurried down the mountain.
Mrs. C. may tell her part of the story; and how
heroically
I attempted to run over a suspicious looking chap at
the entrance of a dark bridge over a deep ravine at the foot
of the mountain; and how, a little beyond, we met
travellers
who said it was unsafe to be travelling so late, and
advised
us to stop at the next housebut I have told all that
seems sufficient to show a providential deliverance.
To confirm our opinion of the character of the men, our
host said that three men, such as I have described, had
passed his house that morning; that one returned, saying he
was afraid to travel with the others, who were armed with
deadly weapons. The landlord's son, too, had been recently
robbed on the mountain. And besides, some gentlemen in
central Pennsylvania, to whom our fright was told, said they
recognized in my description one, if not both the men, as
highwaymen belonging to Lewes' gang.
However, one thing is plain enough, that your humble
servant is not as brave a man as Julius Csar: and yet,
perhaps, if other heroes were equally honest, many would
acknowledge a little pat-pat of the heart in times of supposed
or real danger.
Yours ever,
R.
Carlton
.
LETTER XXIII.
Dear Charles
,You do deserve to have your knuckles
rapped for such skepticism about the reality of my danger,
and for daring to say I was more scared than hurt. I
understand your drift; you only aim to hear more of my
adventures. Very well. Some of these days I will get
hold of your buttons; and then will I inflict such a length
of tale as will make you more cautious in future of prying
into secret histories. Sir, it will be nearly as bad as
cowhiding
.
A poor scholar some time since craved my assistance.
In order to prevent his applying too soon again, I read him
one of your long yarnsby which he discovered I had read
Horace to some valuable purpose.
I say, sir, in reply, that you are as silly as Coolheady
himself
.
Have you so soon forgot what we wrote on this
very head? What if it be only by a suggestionor a word
or a featheror any other
little
matter; does that render
the interference and care of Providence less real or less
important
?
Would you have miracles at every turn? Must
an earthquake, and a storm or tempest be the means of
deliverance
in every danger? As to my not being important
enough to have any special deliverance wrought for me, I
do say, Charles, if any thing like that is your real opinion,
then my real opinion is, the sooner you quit preaching the
better. I suppose if I had been intended for a bishop, with a
gown, a big wig, and a big , your reverence would have
thought a
nodus
had existed worthy a divine interference!
But if I do not cease, I shall imitate your cloth in their
temperate
discussions, and become personal; and
Entirely, dear Charles, do I concur as to the extent in
meaning of the promises. I do think a lay homily or
sermon
could be written on that delightful passage, Seek first
the kingdom of Heaven, and all these things shall be added
unto you. There is a truth, a depth in those words few
appreciate properly. A literal interpretation in the widest
range of application approximates its meaning. The promise
means strictly just what it says. No figureno restriction
no spiritualizingis admissible. Any diluting here is
impiety. It contradicts from a sinful distrust; and this spirit
cannot see how such promises can be fulfilled, unless
windows
are made in heaven.
Doubtless a fulfillment often takes place in this promise,
even where men
seem
only to be good. The promise has a
very special, though not an exclusive reference, to the
sincerely
penitent and trustful. These can and do say to
others, Friends, make the experiment, and you too will
be filled with wonder at the literal truth of the promise.
Many persons are as well satisfied here, as in the existence of
the Holy One Himself.
Moderate things are particularly meant: not because all
things are not in the divine gift, but because our folly abuses
great things, and renders the withholding of them proper.
When good men, however, strive with an honest heart to do
good on a more extended seale with the greater bestowments,
it is seen again and again, that upon these persons are heaped
a thousand and a thousand gifts, beyond the competencies
and comforts of life. Our God is not envious of our
happiness
,
as the ancients supposed in regard to their divinities.
He is a wise and kind father, who bestows in accordance
with our use of his benefits.
This whole world strictly and literally, and without
hyperbole or figure of any sort, belongs to Jesus Christ. He
bought it with his blood; and be bought it for his people.
No man, either regenerate or unregenerate, saint or sinner,
can get or keep or use in any way one iota, without his
permission
.
Good and incontrovertible reasons may be assigned
why his enemies and despisers have certain portions; for
all such portions are of allowance, and not of right; while
truly penitent and pious men have, by their relationship to
the Redeemer, a right to the world, as well in the whole as
in the part. The whole no man needs; nor could he, even
if disposed, use the whole advantageously; but whosoever will,
utterly abandoning the world as a chief goodas an ultimate
endas of infinitely less importance than penitence and faith
and obediencewhosoever will humbly and reverently, and
yet boldly and fearlessly ask in that Name for such portions
as are right for him in his circumstances to receive, he shall
and will receive his share. In this is no mistake. Every
man who follows this course will sooner or later see for
himself
,
and feel within himself, the truth to be as we affirm.
Not a few, and even good men, resolve this promise into
necessary consequence! The increased caution, prudence,
industry and the like, say they,
naturally
insure success!
Indeed! It is true, no success without these qualities and
exertions ordinarily follows ours labors and wishes; but it is
not true that success
must
follow, even where all economical
qualities are properly exerted.
How comes it to pass, and that so very frequently, that
diligence, and care, and prudence, and activity, and the like,
are utterly abortive? Are not thousands witnesses that
unless the Lord keep the city the watchmen watch in vain?
And whence come the qualities, the mental and physical
powers, necessary as means to our success? Come not these
from God?
Charles, here is the very point at which a special
Providence
takes care of us. Men that observe these things, do
repeatedly see, that, just as they cease from all anxiety about
comfort, and happiness, and success, and, in a word, about
the world in all its senses; and just as they devote
themselves
to the duties of life in a pious spirit, and lean, in the
use of all means with a trustful heart upon God, just in that
degree do they find comfort and happiness, and, in short, all
success. On the other hand, with
good men
, devotedness to
the world, in the most laborious use of the best means,
and under the most favorable of circumstances, where they,
through the treachery of the heart, forget God, and begin to
say, Is not this great Babylon that
I
have built?with true,
but blacksliding good men, such devotedness prevents not
disquiet, disappointment, and usually the utter ruin of their
temporal affairs.
If regenerate men would have any of the world, the rule
for
such
is
abandon the world
. This appears paradoxical
and fanatical to many; and it is not fully understood unless
we give the promise a fair trial. Our religion is essentially
of Faith. If our religion be, however, founded on Faith, it
does not follow, as Hume sneeringly and insidiously says, that
it is not founded on reason. If he and his admirers cannot
understand how, in being built on Faith, it is pre-eminently
built on reason, that prevents not our understanding the
truth, any more than their being also physically without
eyes would hinder men from seeing who have their eyes.
Doubtless all blind persons of their sort may imagine
that religious and spiritual things
look
like the
sound
of a
trumpet!
Nor dare I, Charles, conceal experience on this point,
though at the hazard of inferences prejudicial to my intellect
and my modesty. If not a believer, I wish to be one; and
I do so value the things that were once bitterly and
malignantly
sneered at, that I will sell all and buy these pearls
of great price. It is not more wonderful that promises are
fulfilled in one man's case, than another's. Whatever I may
be, that have I been made; and therefore duty and gratitude
both incline me to add another testimony to those of myriads
of better Christians.
I
know
that to me the promise is literally and extensively
fulfilled. I
know
as are my endeavors after a better life, so
is my happiness and even worldly prosperity. I
know
all
cannot be attributed to mere care and industry and prudence;
for all these once availed me nothing. I discern many an
accident
, as we call it, which formerly rendered an untiring
industry and an indomitable perseverance unavailing; and
also many an
accident
that since renders these
instrumentalities
successful.
Should any doubt or disbelieve, I shall lament his
blindness
more than he can possibly lament mine. Much
self-righteousness
is at the bottom of this secret or avowed
skepticism
;
as if we ought to have more worthiness and be of
more importance, or have some price to buy such special
favor! It is, Charles,
because
we are mean, and worthless,
and powerless, and miserable, and blind, and naked, and have
need of all things, that God's special care is over us! A
price has been paid which buys for men
all things!
And
if God have given his Son, he may rationally enough give
any and all other gifts; for all singly or unitedly are
infinitely
less than the one bestowed; and that gift is for natural
enemies and profitless servants!
The good man does not exalt
himself
in believing himself
an object of particular care. He exalts
God's mercy
. He
exalts his Redeemer. The happy Christian, who heartily
believes himself under a special care, is, and must be, an
humble man. Others will discover pride and contempt
engendering opposite sentiments.
Yours ever,
R.
Carlton
.
LETTER XXIV.
Dear Charles
,I can furnish your reverence with
sermons
,
to be sure; but perhaps some persons would do better
to write their own, and not borrow so much from the living
and the dead. No offence: yet it
is
said, some of your
profession plagiarize by wholesale. (?)
As to originality, I cannot agree with you. In my
humble
opinion no man is wholly destitute of originality. If
all would work their own mines, and not rummage in their
neighbors' stores, all would bring out genuine ore: and that
would be more to their credit, even if the inferior metals
copper and iron came forth. Very often when we neglect
the home material, we get after all from our neighbors only
tinsel, or at best gold leaf beaten nearly thin as air. Even
apples of gold in frames of silver cease to delight if paraded
for ever; and many sermon-makers, and other writers,
do little else than show off their ancestral ware. Perhaps
(take courage, my metaphor is now spun out)copper and
iron metaphysically are, to the mass of men, more serviceable
than silver and gold.
Indolence and false modesty cause us to set up and
worship
intellectual popes. Most people tamely surrender good
thoughts and sentiments, unless like current coin they are
found stamped with the imprint of some autocrat in the
literary
world. A nearer connection than is seen at a
superficial
view exists between mental cowardice and slavery,
and spiritual thraldom. Indolence and submission of the
one kind prepare the way for the other. Freedom, in all
things, requires effort. Many who deem themselves
freemen
are indeed the veriest slaves and tools:in vulgar
parlance
,
they dare not say to the magnates of the world, My
soul's my own. One indubitable evidence of this cowardice
ever is, when this question is asked, What will the world
think? for usually the fear of man, and not of the truth,
is then before our eyes: and he that fears man is a slave.
The majority could not continue to live without Fathers and
Authority. Hence they remain children for ever; and they
cannot become Fathers and Authority themselves. They
are always in the bib-age.
No small amount of stereotype twaddle is current about
the nicety and elegance of a pulpit style. The ignoble
sentiment
is prevalent in certain quarters, that some parsons had
better read other men's compositions in the pulpit than preach
their own. To us it seems better that these honest
gentlemen
who are unable to write their own discourses, ought to
yield their office and salary to such
men
as can; for others
may be found who can cultivate nicety and elegance
sufficient
for all practical purposes, and yet manufacture their
own articles in the pulpit line. Shame! that any should
plead for clerical ninnyism.
Any pious man of ordinary understanding, who will
conscientiously
and diligently study, will bring forth
new
things
as well as
old
, and his own copper and iron will please more,
and indeed profit more, than if he piled before and on us all
the riches of the Fathers.
I repeat it, Charles, and that whether the thought occur
in the standard authors or not, I repeat that all men have a
native force,
an originality
. If every man will sedulously
cultivate his own intellectual powers; if he will court and
patiently endure criticism; if he will set his face like a flint
against the ridicule and scorn which this boldness will cause,
he will be vastly more useful and interesting than if he serve
as a mere conduit to convey water from other men's cisterns.
Nayand you may laugh awayI aver originality is an
improveable quality. Talents differ, and by consequence
originalities differ; but a man will ever find that he profits
and delights more by being himself, and not another. We
wish not all metals to be gold, nor all jewels diamonds, nor
all flowers roses; but each has a separate beauty and a
separate
use, and all the beauties and uses combined are of
surpassing
glory and advantage.
Part of our originality is our experience. And if we,
on fitting occasions, relate what we know and have felt, we
shall both please and profit. Others may have had the same
or analogous experience: still will there be a delightful
freshness in our narrations to stir the souls of others, and the
more, if their experience in any degree tallies with our own.
In us, men recognize themselves, and that delights. Giving
ourselves, is in all respects better than retailing or
wholesaling
the thoughts and words even of the geniuses.
Therefore
,
let every one that writes or speaks mind his
own
idiosyncracy
,
and let his neighbor's alone. And if praised or
blamed
,
let it be for natural offspring and not adopted.
This originality of mine will not furnish your leanness
with the promised sermon matter; and so the sheet shall be
finished with an illustrative incident or two.
Without immodesty, it may be said that like other
professed
Christian men, I have given to the poor, and like
others, with a deep and settled trust that it was literally
lending to the Lord. That trust has never been
disappointed
.
So uniformly and plainly has the loan been
returned
,
and with compound interest, that I have more than
once been alarmed lest my paltry donations should be made
to get gain! and for fear a reward in this life might be the
sole one! A profound feeling of satisfaction sometimes exists,
as if the money were deposited in a bank, and I am certain
to receive my dividends. Nay, without entering into the
discussion whether or not assurance companies may not be
the very means in the providence of God to secure
something
for one's family, I am nearly ready to bestow the
annual
instalment that is paid to an assurance corporation upon
the poor, and upon religious charities, and to trust for
suitable
returns from God.
I have several stories on this head, and intended to
narrate
them minutely, but I shall content myself with saying,
that on two occasions, when in great distress, letters have
suddenly and unexpectedly arrived with presents of large
sums! On other occasions, claims to lands, supposed to be
lost and therefore neglected, have been, without any
labor
of mine, acknowledged, and moneys paid me for the
transfer!
Beside these larger and actually startling returns of the
loans, innumerable small returns are continually making;
all which rivet the conviction of a special providence, and of a
literal fulfilment of its promises! I shall be chargeable with
great folly and base ingratitude, if, to the end of life, I
do not, according as God has prospered me, lay by and give
joyously to the poor.
Yours ever,
R.
Carlton
.
LETTER XXV.
Dear Charles
, * * * yes, but I must again
remind you that it is in the little things the hand of a special
providence is discerned. It is delusion and presumption to
look for extraordinary means even in uncommon deliverances,
and to regard nothing as a special providence except what
borders on the miraculous, is derogatory to God. Very
extraordinary
providences do show themselves, both in regard
to persons and communities; the special care may be
discerned
daily.
If some men's ideas of the divine government were true,
the great majority of us would be excluded from our heavenly
Father's care. It would be difficult to find any very
important
sense in such expressions as the steps of a good
man are ordered of the Lord; the Lord knoweth the way
of the righteous; take no thought for to-morrow, and
many similar ones.
Are not all these words for the encouragement of
every
Christian? And are the promises fulfilled only to great men,
or on great occasions, or according to our silly
apprehensions
of fitness and decorum and dignity? Is nothing
important
that cannot be discerned with the naked eye? Shall
all special interference be confined to the clergy, while the
poor, the humble, the illiterate laymen and their affairs are
too small for particular care?
Charles, if the poor have the gospel preached unto
them, then the poor are, in the sight of heaven, of more
value than many sparrows; and yet not one sparrow falls
without special permission. There is a perverse tendency,
even in sanctified men, to make God altogether such an
one as ourselves; and because we are respecters of
persons
,
we easily conclude God must be. Hence if a king,
or a bishop, or a general, or a magistrate, or a rich man
with an elegant town-house and also an enchanting country
residence, talks about a special providence, (and many such
persons have often just occasion to celebrate the divine care,)
why, oh! ah! he is somebody, and it does seem rather
natural
and proper that in his behalf there should be a special
interference
;
and above all, if he have built us a synagogue
and been kind to our nation.
But if a mechanic, who works at eight shillings per
diem
;
or a small retail merchant; or a small farmer on a
rented
farm, with a rather unfashionable wife and daughters;
and more especially if a shoe-black, or a servantif this
sort of folks talk with gratitude of a special providence
pshaw! it is preposterous! What! an interference for them!
No! such are governed by
general
(?) laws! If not content
with these laws, they may look in vain for others, unless
they can be levelled up!
Human dignity, thou art often a greatStrut! Thou
hast magnifying and keen eyes to discern when one in gay
clothes and gold rings cometh into the temple; and thou
dost, with marvellous grace, gallant the elegant, and
beauteous
,
and tasteful away up to the very altar to pray; and
with magnificent coldness dost turn up thy scornful nose at
plain apparel and pointwith such an air!to thy
footstool
!
Thy god is not the God of the Bible. Go it,
dignity
!
elevate thy offended brow! pucker thy mouth and draw
down the corners! pull in thy chin! and in all ways play off
thy littleness. All that will not stay special and particular
providences wherever men of any rank or no rank hope in
the divine mercy!
Charles, your clerical and official gravity(before the
world)makes you often rebuke me for these sallies;
as if silly things ought not to be laughed at! Now, sir, look
attentively at many showy matters that pass for bigness, and
solemnity, and grandeur, and wisdom; and like dissolving
views, they suddenly melt away into littleness, and grimace,
and puff, and foolery! Yes, sir, these vapor around like
active wiggle-tails in a drop of old vinegar magnified, and
sport with an indescribable activity and funniness, that
gravity itself, surprised, is betrayed into a rude
horselaugh
!
And these worldly things affect to look amazed when
one talks of a special providence! and a devotional spirit,
and an entire and childlike trust in divine promises! Were
it not for heaven-born Pity filling the eyes with tears, good
men could but smile at the magnificent antics Philosophy
often playsso grandly complacent!so majestically
self-satisfied
!
And then the awe-struck vulgar,
auribus arrectis!
while Philosophy, with great swelling words,
rationally
and on scientific principles explains the arcana of
Revelation
!shows
the rationale of its miracles! the lucky
accidents
and coincidences of its prophecies! and the necessity
of
nature's
general laws!a kind of fate superior to Divinity
itself! And then the Thing smiles so profoundly benevolent
at a fanaticism founded in faith and not in reason!
Charles, what a ferociously grand little worm! How
like an active skipper in a cheese, trying to prove to the
other mites, that their
habitation of curds
was an eternal
cheese, from which they, like the Athenians from the earth,
had sprung by the laws of nature! and would in due season
be absorbed into the bosom of the divinity, sparks of celestial
cream! That cheese itself was divinity! and the
pantheistic
lacticality was diffused through all their atomical
skipperality
!
To me, Charles, the intrinsic silliness of what opposes
true religion is apparent. I
feel
such Philosophy must
rise to shame and everlasting contempt. In that
well-deserved
contempt is the ingredient to embitter the cup of
fury and indignation to be poured on malignant adversaries;
a constituent of the worm that, undying, shall gnaw on the
conscience, and make the wounded spirit that cannot be
borne! If we carry with us beyond the grave an
intellectual
and moral nature, unsubdued to the belief and
practice
of truth, and have not become little children and
fools for Christ's sake, we carry hell with us! Truly
devotional men are now by many called, and by more
believed
,
to be fools; while such men, on the other hand, deem
mere worldly wisdom folly:this question Infinite Wisdom
in that Day, will, in the presence of a whole universe,
decide
.
That decision kindles the quenchless flame; and
whoever stands the scorn and contempt of the whole
universe
,
is then in hell!
Charles, there is at least a hint for a sermon; and here
is a text: The wicked shall rise to shame and everlasting
contempt!
Yours ever,
R.
Carlton
.
LETTER XXVI.
Dear Charles
,I acknowledge a forgotten promise.
Your story is not applicable to myself. I think special
providences often bringDisappointment. Your hero who
always celebrated the
goodness
of Providence, when
success
followed his labors; but who was puzzled at the
mysteries
of Providence, when disappointment occurred, was
only half-learned.
The plain scriptural teaching is, that
all
things work
together for
good
to Christ's people; that
chastisement
is a
good, a needful discipline contracted for and bought, as a
spiritual gift for his brethren; and that the Heavenly Father
is solemnly bound by his own covenant to bestow that very
gift when needed.
That there are mysteries, in the popular sense of the
term, in divine providence, no one with common sense
denies. Mystery, however, is as great when we receive
good at the hand of the Lord, as when we receive evil.
He is a weak and mistaken man who never discovers that
we need very often the evil, as well as the good. Still
weaker and more mistaken he that sees not that a failure
on the part of God to bestow evil at the proper time upon
his children, would be a very great and alarming mystery.
It would create a suspicion, either that the Holy One had
forgotten his covenant, or that we were bastards and not
sons.
I am aware that to the cold and lukewarm, and especially
to the skeptic and infidel, and to all the worldly-wise, this is
a wholly distasteful and unpalatable doctrine; and that it
makes all such actually
loathe
the spiritual meaning of the
Bible. Ought we not, Charles, distrust our
vital
Christianity
if we have not from the inmost soul
abandoned
ourselves,
unreservedly, entirely, to the revealed plan of gaining
heaven? And when this is done, do not good men begin
clearly to discern and cordially to love Providence
bestowing
affliction as well as prosperity? Blessed they that
hope in the mercy and trust in the faithfulness of God!
Oh! my dear friend! what is heaven? perfect love,
perfect
purity, perfect goodness, perfect confidenceperfection
itself, complete, boundless, endless! But where is the
Christian, even freely justified, and therefore entitled to
sanctification, who feels within himself a preparation
sufficient
to join that company in the New Jerusalem?
What sanctification yet is needed! and how devoutly is
offered the mental prayer, and continually, cleanse thou
me! A true Christian comes at last to dread
sin
more
than
chastisement
. And if his path to that Home
must
of
necessity wind away down into the obscurity of the humble
vale, or pass through dark and tangled forests, amidst
dangers
appalling, and difficulties seemingly invincible; or
through a furnace heated seven times more than was
wont;that man says, with pale lips, and trembling knees,
and quaking heart, and yet with some heaven-bestowed
firmness, Father! Father! if it be not possible otherwise,
thy will be done!lead on, thou kind and merciful one! in
thy strength I follow!
This
is
a hard saying; but they to whom power is given
do
try
honestly to receive and love it: and the more they
try, the more power is given; and, at length, they distinctly
see, in a light broad and intense as a noontide sun, a special
and kind Providence in bestowing evil.
But, Charles, looking no farther than the present life, and
narrowing our view to the contemplation of mere earthly
good, even yet in a thousand instances can it be plainly
seen, that
evil
leads to
good
. Some excellent men have
failed, indeed, to note this result in their individual cases:
while others have noted it for them, and have seen them
emerging from darkness into light; passing from weakness
to strength, from sorrow to joy, from perplexity to
certainty
;
in a word, from all affliction to all prosperity. And
good men, who before such discipline as belongs to God's
friends, were comparatively worldly, selfish, conceited, and
lifted up with pride, and ready to fall into the
condemnation
of the devil, have so altered, that all the world could
see these men had been in the school of wisdom whilst they
were in the suffering of sorrow.
Many religious persons, however, will tell you that their
worldly honor and prosperity is owing to the efficacy of
disappointments: and such, with adoring wonder, do often
in their hearts say, Oh! the mystery of Providence!
And this, Charles, not in the fretful and rather suspicious
spirit of your hero, but from the very depth of souls
pervaded
with love, gratitude, and veneration.
* * * * And I have had, in truth, my
disappointments
.
Yes, Charles, sentiments written in this
sheet are not mere words or theory. Whatever may be
thought or said, the sentiments are from experience. We
are ready to be ranked with the saints, even if by such
avowal we become the sport of the drunkard. Let
malicious revilers and hypocritical mockers at feasts
scorn us; but may the Infinite Mercy deliver us from the
holy and indignant scorn of the spirits of the just made
perfect
in that day! Oh! that we may stand in the
congregation
of the righteous, both here and hereafter, even if
hell now smile at such enthusiasm, and, in the invisible
state, rage at the loss of former dupes and friends.
Yours ever,
R.
Carlton
.
LETTER XXVII.
Dear Charles
,You think I stand committed to give
you some adverse incidents leading to good. I am not
6
aware of an express promise; still I am not unwilling to
allow such promise to have been somewhere or other
implied
.
My own experience is, that from early manhood I have
usually failed to get the stations which seemed desirable and
were earnestly coveted. All means were used and
instruments
set at work and plied, in the way prudence suggested;
and yet all was failure. Then on the next apparent
opening
,
were tried different, and even opposite means;as for
instance, now was given direct and personal attentionnow
indirect and with the agency of friends;and again, letters
were the mediumand again, all means were united;but
nevertheless all has been failure. Few persons have had
more influential, and disinterested, and active friends, who
have sometimes labored for me as for a brother:and these
I have obeyed, both when my judgment was different, and
when we thought alike; and for many years I have
endeavored
to qualify myself for the places in question; yet I am,
at this hour, farther away, and to human eye irremediably,
from those situations than ever; although I would here
remark that the desire for those places is gone too. At
present
,
hardly any inducement could be powerful enough to
make me enter situations, once so apparently agreeable and
valuable. Nos mutamur!
In all this, Charles, I have long discerned the hand of a
gracious Providence. For while I may not say that I deem
myself unfit for many places and modes of life, often
unsuccessfully sought; yet am I not ashamed to confess,
that for some such places and modes of life, I have
discovered
myself unfit. Hence reason and faith both say that some
evil to myself, to the community, to my friends, would have
arisen from the very situations for which fitness
seemed
to
exist.
Charles, many lessons not given at schools, are yet highly
important for us in this world, whether we would reach
heaven, or do good on the earth. And these lessons are not
to be learned by a man in every state of his spirit. Nay,
very often, should a valued friend in a tender and delicate
way hint certain subjects, he would be deemed officious,
perhaps
cruel and censorious. In this case, adverse providences
are the
only
instructors that can be tolerated: and happy he
that can listen to, and understand, the voice of the Rod.
All praise the know-thyself lesson; but, Charles, a
man cannot know himself by looking for ever into flattering
mirrors. These magnify and beautify our mental and moral
proportions, till we really imagine
ourselves
Large-Body;
and the
world
or
man
in general to be Little-Body. Naturally
then, we come to regard the world as a tolerably fair theatre
or arena for the display of our comely selves, in all the
versatility
of our amazing talent! Nay, we seriously think
there is need of us; that it will be a melancholy day to the
nations when
we
die; and thus we stand, in quite a jovian
magnificence of thought, balancing whether to bestow
ourselves
on this city or that village!hem!
Aye! we now are satisfied that we do know ourselves
if the world also
did
only know us! What a scrabble for
usthere would be! Of course, in this self-glorification
era, we do not condescend to men of low estate, nor mind
the day of small things:plenty of small talent for that
sort of things;we aim to help man in general and not to
do good in particular. Meanwhile the little opportunities for
doing good or showing off, are passed, hundreds in a week;
and the large ones, by an unaccountable fatality, all come
to
inferior
persons; and we stand perfectly amazed at the
stupidity and ingratitude of the world! Do tell!
True, some people did see us; and of these, a small part
pitied and would have helped; but the great majority of such
said, Let a fool pass on and be punished. In the mean
while arose in our hearts envy, not at the prosperity of
the wicked, but of the wise and good! Our peace was
ever disturbed; pride and self-consequence being at work in
the deep bosom, agitating its dark waters and turning up the
mire and dirt! Heaven saves all beings but himself, that
sighta naked human heart.
What, Charles, in such cases is wanting? Let me tell
youa certain operation vulgarly called, wiping the
conceit
out. For what can a man do with the conceit in him?
Whence come swellings, wraths, strifes, emulations,
jealousies
,
secret envyings,
cum multis alisi?
The conceit is
not wiped out.
Now, please your reverence, your friend has undergone
a
little
of this important swabbing. And when he looks into
the mirror, whether the mirror be altered, or his eye has
become
single, and has lost a portion of its beam, he
certainly does not appear quite so great and comely a
personage
as the said mirror used to reflect him. He is
moderately
well satisfied, that if he be never heard of, or die
tomorrow
,
no earthquake will follow;that scores of better
men do exist, competent for the grand situations once thought
to be mourning his absenceand that if he be not
remembered
before the Holy One, his departure(save in one little
circle,)will be no more noticed or felt than if a moth had
ceased! In that dear circle will be
lacrym rerum
none
elsewhere!
That friend has learned that whatever the Heavenly
Father, in the infinitude, not of his
justice
but of his
mercy
,
many think of him, he is as to the world an atom. And that
discovery of his essential littleness, is the grandest lesson ever
learned; and that, if no earthly advantage ever arose from
it. But the earthly advantages are neither few nor small.
Among these is the secret love and approbation of the wise,
who have seen us, in both the
empty eared
and the
full eared
state; and who smote us with words like an excellent oil,
healing as they wounded. There is also the better capacity
of being found faithful in a few and small thingsand the
peace, undisturbed by minding high things. Above all,
there is a calm and settled feeling that when we have passed
as we soon shallinto that better land, a voice of
condescending
love in infinite mercy will be heard, saying, Thou
hast
tried
to be faithful in a few things; enter into the joy of
thy Lord.
Yours ever,
R.
Carlton
.
LETTER XXVIII.
Dear Charles
,My false steps at Bellevue introduced
me to an intimate acquaintance with poverty; and an
apartment
in limbo
was before my eyes. But from this
deliverance
came, so marked that we all said, that surely is
providential
!
And yet was it fit that we should suffer more
* * * yes, in the midst of a city in the Old Purchase,
Charles, we endured what we had in the log cabins of the
New Purchasesometimes with not a dollar to buy food
threatened with prosecutions for unavoidable debtforced to
sell articles of furniture to pay rentsarrested by professedly
good men, and in the midst * * * *.
books rare and costly sold for a pittance
* * * and finally, my office taken from me without a
moment's warning! And when these afflictions could not be
concealed, they became the signal for some to push faster the
falling! Nor were cruel animadversions spared, as if I
had
not strained every nerve of abilityalthough
a deep anguish was gnawing into the core of my heart
and I was
trying
to say, It is thy hand, Father!
even so, if it seem good in thy sight!
Charles, my heart had nearly failed * * * years of
darkness and horror were the consequence of these mental
shocks; but in the midst, and when a wall to prevent all
escape seemed around, at that moment came into my mind,
Go, visit Dr. P. This gentleman I had not seen for more
than twenty years, and we never corresponded; nor had I
any special claim or intimacy * * * but in the despair
of my crushed soul something seemed to say, He perhaps
can help you!  I went the journey while she
and they stood on the bank  I unbosomed to
my former friend; and most tenderly did he sympathize and
encourage me to hope
A few days after my return home, came a letter from
this friend; and that letter contained the offer of an excellent
situation; and a request that I should draw on my friend for
funds necessary to visit the place * * * By his aid and
recommendation the situation was easily obtained; and that
led to a prosperity, and usefulness, and happiness unknown
for years!
Years, indeed, of blackness and darkness intervened
between
that period and this. In that furnace of raging fire,
has infinite mercy walked with us and brought us forth for
good. And similar, Charles, is also the experience of some
very excellent persons of my acquaintance; and doubtless
the experience of innumerable good men every where, if we
only knew their histories. And such, when they hear what
we can tell, believe all; for they too say, We have passed
through the same.
My friend P, it seems, had, shortly after my return
home,
accidentally
met a mutual friend; to whom he
accidentally
named me, and my melancholy state; on which, our
mutual friend said, The very thing! I have just received
a commission to look for such a person, as we believe
him to be;and so the place became mine.
I am not willing to go into detail, Charles, as you wish.
I know the
past
was necessary for the
present
. And that
furnace was kindled by divine wisdom and love. There
is
a sense in which the rod comforts and supports like the staff.
The full or adequate perception of that, as well as other
important scriptural truth, is worth the furnace. Never,
never, no
never
would we willingly pass through that fire
again;I shudder even to look backbut if it be
needful
,
and the Son of God
will
walk with us and sustain our hope
and faith and love;then be it so, if through that fire be
our
road to heaven! Yea! it would be compensated by the
occasional discoveries of truth and holiness!by inwrought
loathing of sin!by the unutterable peace in feeling and
knowing that one was
trying
in his deepest soul to be entirely
and cheerfully resigned to God!
Charles, our timid flesh cowers at the thoughts of a
torturing
martyrdom; we do fear lest shrinking nature
must
draw back from that test; but we have been where we did
see
what made it possible for
other Christians
to lie on the bed
of fire, as on a bed of down! There are visions, and
supports
,
and faith, and given strength, that
do
lift martyrs above
all that is moral! Welcome cross of Christ!
We are well aware to what the avowal of such belief
exposes us. The offence of the cross is not ceased. Yes,
there are yet mitred heads that, like Nero, would dress
Christians in the skins of wild beasts, because the
dogs
would
not hunt
men!
It is necessary to make good men look like
criminals, before the secular arm dare destroy them. So
sentiments like ours must be made seemingly fanatical; and
then will they be despised; and, if some had power, they
would be punished! But we may not trust our pen to say
all we think of the smooth villainy of that hypocrisy which
forms an alliance with the state, that it may have
executioners
to roast and wrench, whilst the Liar stands near, and
with such an air of
unearthly
meekness, and such a
frightfully
ludicrous snivelling, cries, Twist gently,burn him
carefully, O secular arm!we deliver him unwillingly,
and for the health of the souland the glory of God!
And men (?) of renown apologize for such things! And
they make light of conscience! and call it sanctimonious
scrupulosity! and enthusiastic obstinacy! and cry, Make
the dogs' beards!
Yours ever,
R.
Carlton
.
LETTER XXIX.
From Clarence to Carlton.
Dear Robert
,What is that Furnace named in your
last? Have you, too, endured such horror of thick
darkness
,
and encountered the fight of afflictions? And
have you been so down into the horrible pit and miry
clay?
On one occasion I asked a venerable man to write the
history of his life, whose mental sufferings had been great,
and of long continuance; but he declined, and my judgment
was, of course, then submitted to his. Robert, it occurs that
my opinion was not erroneous; and hence let me ask why
not write your history? At all events give me in several
letters a brief outline of your mournful and yet happy trial.
Some friends here, for I affect not to conceal that your letters
are no secrets, say they are really profited by the perusal.
One remarked the other day, What a pity we may not
so unbosom to the world in books, as in our letters! And
he contends that the unstudied effusions of the heart do often
more good, than the guarded, exact, and cold lessons of
clerical
wisdom in official essays and sermons. Perhaps I say
it, who ought not; but if man saw your heart as we see it in
your letters, they too must be affected kindly as we at
Somewhersburg
.
For my own letters I dare not say so much;
yet I do honestly mean all that is written in them: and
hence, if you deem them of any value, to your friend
Winterton
,
for instance, why let him read.
It is, indeed, true, that many matters in private letters are
thought unsuitable for the public taste. For instance, we
write unreservedly of Jesus Christas our Saviourour
kingour masterour all: whereas in public we speak in
a guarded and studied way, as though it were affectation to
speak tenderly of the Saviour! It would, to be sure, be
affectation
and pharisaism to go out of the way to do all this;
yet it is certainly something very criminal not to mention our
Lord, when the occasion plainly demands it.
Far from us to think that persons are ashamed of Christ,
who never directly name Him in essays and poems. But if
not for circumstances we should often be at a loss to know
what some admired writers in magazines and newspapers,
who profess friendship for Christianity, do truly believe about
its divine author. And especially is this defect noticeable in
many short poems, whose writers are said to be religious
people.
One plausible reason may exist for this caution:a
possibility
that cold and worldly hearts, and a sensual taste in
readers, would make such turn with disgust from writings
too full of Christ. Hence, instead of throwing pearls
before
swine, which would but turn and rend these
prudent
essayists and poets try to be crafty, and catch with
guile.
If we are known to be Christians, it is not contended that
we are always obliged to do what might seem like a parade
of our religious sentiments: still there is reason for the fear,
that some secret distaste of our own too often begets a
cowardice
,
which we term caution. And what is religion worth
without Christ? And what good and perfect gift from the
Father of Lights, but through the Redeemer? Is he not to
be honored as the Father? and when we receive the Son, do
we not receive the Father also? And when we meditate, as
all true Christians must do more or less at times, on all that
clusters around the cross, we can see for the time none but
Christ. Then how is it that professed Christians should so
scruple, on fitting occasions, in their letters, their essays,
their poems, their oral conversations, to speak of Jesus Christ
as their all in all? Is literature disgraced by the
introduction
of a Name, at which all things in heaven and earth
shall bow? Or shall good men tacitly allow the wide field
of letters to be mere neutral ground? After making every
allowance, and admitting every palliation, yet we fear this
studied omission of names, and words, and expressions in
compositions intended for the public, that savor of Jesus
Christ and true devotion, is traceable to false shame.
Robert, are we not forbidden to bring a railing
accusation
?
Ought we not to suffer without giving vent to
indignation
?
Blessed are good men when persecuted for right
eousness' sake; theirs is the kingdom of heaven. And what
will avail the lying apologies persecutors and their
apologists
throw like a veil of gauze around their faces? The
veriest tyro in history, and the merest child in philosophy,
sees through the pretence.
By the way, do you consider the sacrifice of your books
altogether a loss?
Yours truly,
C.
Clarence
.
LETTER XXX.
Dear Charles
,I shall not answer your letter from the
A
to the
Izzard
. I choose to begin at the latter, having a
fancy to attend to the last question first.
It would be hugeously heterodox to speak against
Alexandrine
Libraries; especially if a librariless fellow should
venture that way, he would hear sour grapes, from the
big book people. Buthem!to speak in general terms,
the loss of mine is not felt so much as was anticipated. For,
primo
, I somehow or other read not much more when I had
books; and when the books went for my nourishment in the
bodily sense, and were
eaten
in the ancient Greek's style, I
only thought what a dreadful thing to be without my library,
in case it is ever needed!
6*
I have a notion, Charles, that most books in a man's
library
are never opened. Books are usually, I apprehend,
little more than a cabinet of curiosities, whose use and
excellence
are in the outside. One may be a man of books,
and yet not a book-man. In the former case, but for the
name of the thing, books may as well be veritable boards, all
through, as to be bound merely in boards; and the extra gilt
and beauteous coloring might be put on the wooden
representatives
,
and not on the russia-leather or calf-skin of
genuine
tomes. Which way economy would be consulted, I am
at a loss to decide.
But
secundo
, Charles, when a man of active mind, like
your
humble
servant, for instance, has no observations cut
and dried on his library shelves, why, of course he begins in
self-defence to make observations for himself; and having no
authorities
, he becomes authority for himselfin other words,
he sets up a domestic manufactory. It may, indeed, be
somewhat
perilous to set up for an original; but pray, sir, if we
have no books to think for us, are we to be debarred the
privilege
of thinking for ourselves?
Have the authors any monopoly of air and sunshine? Is
man
for their sole study? And allowing thinkers the ordinary
capacities, may we not find in the present age materials, as
were found in the by-gone days? Too many books may be
a serious hinderance to thinking, and of course may destroy
the developmentyes, that is the approved termthe
development
of one's originality. Most books, in fact, are in
no striet sense original, whether of the past or the present
epoch; and you only meet with the same ideas in different
dresses. As to modern books, if they differ, it is mainly in
abridging and condensing the books of former days; or,
perhaps
,
in dividing some ponderous tome into some fifty
fashionable
volumes, being in most instances only cases of silver
for the apples of gold stolen by a pigmy Hercules from some
Hesperidal garden of ancient literature.
The present art and taste is to make frames for other
men's pictures; and so successful are the workmen as to
draw our attention almost exclusively to the frames: in other
words, gilding and engravings are prized more than thought
and style. The printer, the engraver and the bookbinder
make our books now; which, perhaps, answer well enough
for ladies and gentlemen constructed by the milliner and the
tailor. Perhaps your reverence may say that this militates
against our doctrine of originality; but please remember that
the artists who make our books and our ladies and
gentlemen
,
may be very original in their way: certainly they
sometimes make very odd-looking affairs!
One danger, however, to a thinker who has few or no
books, is that of supposing himself to have discovered what has
been found by no others: he may easily discover what is
vulgarly
called a mare's nest, or imagine his China to be the
centre of the world. But a deep thinker, of well-exercised
powers, sees things so naturally as to believe such must have
occurred to any other studious person. Hence he often hides
his discoveries, from a persuasion that they must have been
already seen and told. A man of originality, with a very
limited acquaintance with books, may also think meanly of
his own views, and be therefore slower to speak than the
man of books. In this case, a library would be useful in
several ways. It would teach him that other thinkers have
thought as he has, and that will prevent his supposing himself
any thing
specially
uncommon. It will also, on the other
hand, increase his confidence, by teaching him that thoughts
like his have been deemed worthy of record, and that he
need not fear to write or speak.
However, Charles, some books I have ever deemed a
serious
lossmy tool-books. I am now very often like a
respectable
carpenter or mason, that can contrive a building, and
according
to the laws of architecture, but he has no instruments
with which to work and give just form to his conceptions.
For this reason my drama Esau and Jacob is abandoned.
The outlines of the plan have for years been with me; but
my Commentators, my Antiquities, my Chronologies, my
sacred
Geographies,
et id omne genus
, are gone!
There is in my recollection a mass of needful facts, yet
all jumbled, indistinct, misty. What I do remember is of no
use, and only makes me lament my loss. Indeed, the very
conception of my piece must be incomplete without a
distinct
knowledge of some matters; and unless I could have
been buried a while in the ancient and oriental, my conception
would of necessity be too modern and occidental.
Upon the whole, I value comparatively little result-books.
Such, persons of cultivated talents and careful observation
can make for themselves; or, in other words, they can
think
them
. But tool-books (among which class are books of a
causative or impulsive character) are, in my very humble
opinion, the only ones thinkers need in a library.
Charles, I am not aware of having brought a railing
accusation against any body. A generous indignation is
often unavoidable, and one cannot refrain sometimes from
saying, Oh! full of malice and all subtlety! thou child of
the devil! Surely, the absolutely literal interpretation may
not be put, in all cases, upon the scriptural precepts about
forbearance and patience under injuries and insults. If so,
then half a dozen wicked assassins might in open day assault
and murder all the pious citizens of a single village.
It is often important that things get their proper names.
And when patriarchs, or popes, or bishops, or presbyters, do
forbid liberty of conscience, and finding no cause of crime
in
dissenters
, except in the matter of their God and religion,
and do begin to persecute under the pretence of maintaining
the law of the land, and do contrive to have the law of the
land spread as a strong net around good men, then may good
men stand up and say, Thou hypocrite! thou sittest to judge
me according to God's revealed law, and dost thou command
me to be beaten, and robbed and murdered, contrary to that
law?
Circumstances may require individuals to submit, and
take joyfully the spoiling of their goods; but if good men
are a nation, they may
defend
themselves against the
assaults
of persecutors as against ravening wild beasts, or any
other assassins. For, while offensive war for the
propagation
of religious opinions is of hell, yet is defensive war, in
protection of our rights, civil and religious, proper.
And that thesis we can maintain. But I shall add no more.
Yours ever,
R.
Carlton
.
LETTER XXXI.
Dear Charles
,You say that in my last I not only
began with Izzard, but ended there. True: but you
contrived
to raise on that izzardine epistle more questions than
can be answered in a dozen
letters
, with or without punning.
I shall not, however, intrust your reverence with the
outlines of what was to be a
chef-d'ouvre
of drama;
because, in the first place, the conception is too
lean
, or
perhaps
ethereal
in its consistency, to be seen fairly. The
effect would be the same as if I admitted you to the skeleton
of a most beauteous maiden that was to be painted or placed
as a statue; you would say with Lucian's underground
philosopher: Is that skeleton Helen?
And because, sir, some of your inquisitive club, from
whom none of my richly charged letters are concealed, might
steal my skeleton drama, and dress it according to his vitiated
taste; and thence would follow two inevitable evils: the
drama would be spoiled, and Mr. C. would not be able to
do it in his own way, when his ship-load of books comes in.
I do, indeed, agree with you, Charles, that the Bible
contains
subjects innumerable for poetry and the fine arts: and
yet moral lessons are not always taught by the finest
productions
of the pencil and the chisel. Nor is morality a
necessary
consequence of hearing or playing the most ethereal or
spirituel
music.
Refinement, elevation, and a certain indescribable
longing
after something more excellent than is found in the world,
may attend the beholding of paintings and statues, and the
hearing of music; and in some minds this sense of want
thus awakened, may possibly lead to seeking after things
more excellent and of good report. But most commonly,
the mind merely luxuriates in a misty and dreamy land of
playful and beauteous fancies, and returns with more of
distaste
to the monotonous drudgery of the tangible and visible
life. Far from us, in such remarks, is any intention of
discouraging
the labors of artists; yet we ought not to overrate
the effects of their work, or perhaps entirely mistake them:
a thing may be very proper, if it does not necessarily
preach a sermon or suggest a prayer.
I grant also, Charles, and freely, that by some persons,
and without counteracting efforts of mind, and by others,
with the aid of virtuous resistance,
nudities
in statuary and
painting may be contemplated and studied, with no present
evil. Doubtless many artists and connoisseurs may be so
absorbed
by the
creation
itself, as to be inattentive to the
incidentally
suggestive;
and in some
creations
the
suggestive
may
so far be in favor of innocence and childlike artlessness, as
to
blunt
the opposite impressions, or possibly nearly prevent
such: yet after all, as a general remark with rare
exceptions
,
nudities
should be confined to the garden of Paradise.
They seem not at home when they wander away down
among the sons and daughters of men in this evil generation.
We, indeed, blush not in beholding their innocence; but
they certainly must blush at being thus exposed to the gaze
of the fallen! Nudities pertain to a state of spotless
excellence
,
of entire purity, of generous disinterestedness; and
so small power has their exhibition to lift up and purify the
debased spirit of the world, that it is better to look on
Innocence
in silk or satin, especially when the pattern of the
garment
is not
la danseuse
.
It is not very improbable, Charles, that multitudes of
persons
who say they suffer no detriment to their morals, by the
exhibitions in question, may be rather deficient in delicate
moral sensibility. Many
mere
artists and connoisseursto
say nothing of the fashionable and gaydeem entire
perfection
of purity in thought not only an impracticability in
attainment
,
but all attempts towards even an approximation a
puritanical prudery. My friend, this puritanism is that of
the Scriptures; and it must be soiled more or less by an
ordinary contemplation of the nudities. It may have, it
does
have, a recuperative power beyond the impuritanism of
the worldly; yet does it feel in the faint stirrings of an
almost
dormant sensuality, the awakening of what, if not once
more resolutely mastered, will become again apostacy from
God! It therefore shudders, and where possible, avoids.
To such reasoning the world says, Pshaw!too refined!
affectation! But puritanism thinks, Blessed is he that
feareth
always.
Charles, good men have learned that the heart which
cannot be stormed by open assault of worldliness, may be
secretly and effectually sapped by insidious and winning
arts. The very refinements and polished beauteousness that
prevents us from being hurt by vulgarity or disgustful sin,
are often no barrier to the evil that will steal into the
unguarded
and relaxed spirit along with the welcomed entrance
of all that is admirable and innocent in the fine arts.
When you ask, whether all beholding of certain
paintings
and statues, is ever forbidden, and therefore sinful?
my reply is, that each person must answer that question for
himself. I now only express fear for myself. I dare not, if
allowed, dictate
ex cathedra
on such points. Many virtuous
persons of both sexes, both separately and in company with
one another, do contemplate and even criticise classic
nudities
;
and deference to their affirmation and judgment
seems to render unwarrantable the assertion that all this is
ever and uniformly wrong.
Grand ends of a political and literary nature are answered
by cultivating the fine arts. The fine arts are, indeed,
fraught with usefulness to individuals and to the world.
Hence here, as in other things, we may risk the incidental
evil that may or must attach to their cultivation. In
physiology
and anatomy we are compelled to see, and even study
some things, that must not ordinarily be thought about; yet
what sober man will say that these sciences must, for that
reason, be abandoned? If a science must exist, or an art
be practised, because of its many and allowable advantages,
the good so vastly preponderating, then does it seem that we
may incur the incidental evil.
I wish, however, to show that we puritans have something
to say in defence of our caution. And I wish to say that,
to all persons who look not on the nudities as artists, or
who perceive not the
sentiment
embodied, the sight is
perilous
.
Now how few can appreciate the design in these
creations
of art? Without intending a pun, we all know that a
nude figure is a species of metaphor: hence like words they
may have a double sensethe literal and the suggestive
meaning. The nude figure, if understood literally, will,
therefore, almost of necessity do harm; when in its
metaphorical
sense, it may really do good. But, Charles, men in
the grossas well as gross menare more prone to look to
the literal in these sights, than to the metaphorical. The
few only are enough refined to see the etherealness of the
idea, when incorporated and incarcerated in the voluptuous
and earthly form. And these forms may become a part of
the pride of life and lust of the eye, by which our souls
are taken captive.
In concluding this letter, I cannot forbear expressing my
surprise that no painter or statuary has ever taken the death
of Dido as a subject. My very limited acquaintance with
the history of the fine arts, will account for my ignorance, if
that subject have been presented: for certainly that cannot
have been overlooked! For myself, Charles, I never read
the Poet's description of that wonderfully moving scene,
without the deepest emotion, and sometimes even with tears.
So imbued is my spirit with its pathos, that were I master of
the pencil or chisel, oh! Charles, how I would entrance
you! That scene is before me now!the beauteous dying
queenwrongedbetrayeddeserted! her head pillowed
on Anna's bosom!her eyes searching for the light in the
horror of that darkness!the gaping wound!I hear the
stridet, but cannot express it! What moans of the
frantic
sister! See the court in all the regal shade and
magnificence
of the eastthe altarthe pilethe monumenta
virithe maidens in attendancetheir attitudestheir
despairing shrieks! All are before meand were I a
master
,
that scene should live on canvass or in marble!
Perhaps some one has immortalized himself with this
subjectif I have not heard it, attribute my ignorance partly
to my departed library.
Yours ever,
R.
Carlton
.
LETTER XXXII.
Dear Charles
,You say, let us turn from Dido to
the Temperance Reformation; and, that you are on the
point of withdrawing your name from the society at
Somewhersburg
,
because that society has forsaken the modesty
and simplicity of its first principles, &c.
Do not, my friend, be hasty in executing that resolve;
although clergymen have sometimes good reason for alarm
and indignation: and, therefore, while we regret the
withdrawal
of many sober and religious persons from us, yet
must it be conceded, that such were rather driven away, than
that they went voluntarily.
It is a grave question, however, whether these excellent
men have not thus lost the power and opportunity of
guiding
the reformation. To the blind they seem opposed to
temperance, and thus lose influence, when in truth and
honesty they are only opposed to abuses. Clergymen ought
not to commit themselves to mere forms or phases of morals:
but is there not a broad platform where such can stand, and
yet not be identified with clans or sects in reformations too
exclusive and often vituperative? While clergymen must
move very
gingerly
in attaching themselves to many moral
reform societies, yet, if possible, let them not do what may
seem to oppose a moral reform.
Would the clergy have been so severely basted,
lampooned
,
stigmatized and hooted at, by certain infidel lecturers,
both local and circuitous in Sabbath day meetings, as men
too lordly to be seen with renovated drunkards, if the
clergy had not too easily abandoned the cause? And does
not that abuse, fanatical and illiberal as it is, insensibly, for
a time at least, injure clerical influence? Who then is to
blame, the black coats that have deserted us?or our
rampant
speechifiers, who often seem glad to have a target for
their mud-balls?
Some lecturers, by the way, reap a goodly harvest of
small coins by administering to our love of fun and frolic,
and also to our vindictive propensities, by caricature and
malediction. Such would, perhaps, be sorry to find their
occupation gone, from the want of gin-shops, tavern-keepers,
and apostate deacons. A backsliding parson, with them, is
nuts and apples, and when handsomely belabored, for
the amusement of the profane, lines the pockets of the
lecturing
harlequin with coppers and shillings. This censure,
Charles, may seem harsh: but some fellows do rave in their
speeches, as if other foul spirits had taken possession of the
dispossessed as bad nearly as the alcoholic one lately ejected.
All Sunday lecturers are not quite so
sober
as the
sermonizers
of the Bible. They foam sometimes as if seated upon
a tripod, in place of the repudiated gin cask.
Now, good Mr. Minister, what if you would honor the
Sunday meetings with your presence, and to prevent profanity
suppose you open with prayer? And to preclude infidel
twaddle, suppose you let them have a word of exhortation;
and to hush down ribald songs and slang, suppose you try a
little psalmodywould not all that do good and prevent evil?
But I shall add no more. If you intend to answer, let
your reverence answer temperately.
Yours ever,
R.
Carlton
.
LETTER XXXIII.
From Clarence to Carlton.
Dear Robert
,Permit me very respectfully to ask, on
which side of this question does your squireship rank? Are
you writing at me or the temperance societies in your last?
Perhaps you aim at being a moderate, or a conservativea
very adroit and sensible sort of a fellow that sees faults on
both sides and none in himselfhey? However, I must try
and answer not only temperately, as you suggest, but
also seriously, lest I be led away by your levity.
I know, dear Robert, you think with me, when I call the
Temperance Reformation a noblea holy cause; a cause
worthy every good man's prayers and labors; a cause no
truly good man can really oppose, but which fills his heart
with joy at its success and sorrow for its defeat. Error in
judgment may induce such a man temporarily and seemingly
to oppose. Abuses in its administration, as an organized
government of opinion, may make him abandon certain forms
and schemes of the reformation; but the reformation itself,
fairly understood, no man, with the benevolence of Christ in
his heart, surely can either abuse or oppose. He must be
a very anomalous minister, or elder, or deacon, that can
seriously and habitually wish evil to the cause; and
opposition
in such men looks very like the folly and wickedness
of not entering into the kingdom of heaven ourselves and
preventing others from entering.
But in proportion as the cause of temperance is dear to
a good man, he will of necessity be more jealous of every
new movement in its behalf. He will scrutinize all such in
their principles and bearings, before he will admit or
advocate
them; and if deemed of pernicious tendency, he must
and will openly and fearlessly oppose. He will be suspicious
of all advocates and professed friends, who, from affected or
mistaken zeal for this good cause, shall slight or injure, or
oppose other
moralities
, or any plain law or ordinance of God.
He will not tolerate for a moment any specious reasoning
that shall tend to make one phase of morality superior to
the whole of morality, much less to the gospel. He will not,
he dares not, allow that all sacred and time-honored usages
shall become merely subservient to this incidental and
temporary
institution. For this is a temporary institution that
must of necessity end with the attainment of its object: but
the others are designed to be coeval with the life of man, and
will remain till the dissolution of the world.
A good man must regard the cause of temperance as one
of solemnity; hence he can but oppose all frivolity and levity
in all that aim to promote it, as inconsistent, and, indeed, as
subversive of the cause. But, Robert, is there no
temperance
,
save in a temperance society? May a good man never
be exemplary in the strict abstinence required by a pledge,
and yet for reasons withhold or even withdraw his name
from a society? And are there no good reasons for this
course? but must a man of necessity be a wine-bibber,
according
to the silly and malicious insinuations ultra advocates
for societies make respecting him?
Granted, all other things being equal, that it
may
be
obligatory or advisable to increase strength by union; yet
when other things are
not
equal, we may fight in this war at
our own chargesand certainly we may do good service as
partisans. Now, Robert, at Somewhersburg, is a state of
affairs rendering it proper and necessary for the clergy to
withdraw
not
from temperance, but from our local
temperance
society.
And, first, Robert, the tone assumed by our society in
their public lectures, and papers, and even daily conversation,
is vituperative and offensive. This we decidedly object to;
because it is vulgar and canting; shows profound ignorance
of all courtesy; is vindictive and provoking; and wholly
different from the style of rebuke authorized by the Bible.
It is, moreover, impolite, and hardens and emboldens
offenders
;
for they are so over-belabored as to excite sympathy
and create friends.
Again, our society has forgotten the modesty, simplicity
and gentleness of its original principles. We commenced
resolving to set no example of evil to men, and in no way to
tempt them unnecessarily to use intoxicating drinks.
In pursuance of this plain and simple resolution we put
away our bottles and decanters; and, on all befitting
occasions
,
we persuaded others to follow our example. We
began
not with the maker and the vender, but with the drinker.
If the drinker ceased, the makers and venders must cease.
But if the drinkers ceased not, they would find and create
the others, even if the others had previously no existence.
Drinkers will make and vend for themselves. By dealing
with the drinker, therefore, we thought was the way to lay
the axe at the root.
We gave, indeed, offence and created alarm; but as we
never abused makers and venders
en masse
, or threatened,
they had no fair pretext to attack us, and they only lamented
that we were going too far with our rigorous notions. Hence
they did not absent themselves from our churches; although
in the meanwhile the business of making and vending
decreased
as the drinkers diminished, and we had a fair
prospect
it might at last be wholly abandoned. Now, however,
we no longer aim to persuade, but to orderwe would not
minister, but rule. All whose names are not to the pledge are
said to be against us. Our entire effort seems not so much
for the advantage of the drinker as for the punishment of the
vender. We shut our eyes to a very obvious fact, that the
drinker as really creates the vender as the vender does the
drinker. Nayit is absolutely and necessarily true, if the
drinker stops, the vender ceases:the reverse is far from
being a necessary consequence. If a miracle were in a
moment to stop all makers and venders, and the drinkers
retained
their appetite and were in the majoritythe whole
machinery of making and selling would soon be again in
full force.
It is beyond a doubt important and right for communities
to remove, as far as possible, all
temptations
to idleness and
drunkenness, so that the thoughtless may not be drawn
away; but while all this is legally and judiciously doing, the
best and safest and most lasting cure for the evil is, to make
men every where sober on principle, and not by mere
expedient
.
Water cannot be long checked in its onward course.
Obstructed in one way, it will work for itself other channels;
if other channels are stopped, it will rise and run over the
dam. I am, therefore, willing and ready, Robert, to vote for
laws regulating and restraining the selling of intoxicating
drinks; partly that as many
temptations
as possible may be
removed, and partly as a mere experiment: but I should
still have my doubts as to the entire efficacy of legislative
enactments.
Further, out here our society aims at dictating to men in
many ways magisterially and looks after them inquisitorily.
By public resolves passed amid noise and uproar we say,
all men who profess to be temperance men are not
consistent
,
unless they deal, eat, travel, sojourn, employ, &c., on
exclusive temperance principles!! Mere abstinence from
drinks is with us the whole of virtue! And all professed
temperance
men and reformed drunkards are naturally and
necessarily
endowed with all honesty, liberality, suavity, skill,
promptitude, and, in short, all the other excellencies!! And
all other men are, of course, wholly destitute of all good
qualities, and shall be, as far as our society can disenfranchise
them, out off from all right of citizenship and claims of
humanity
!!!
The society out here has become
clannish. Figuratively
,
they do battle, and properly so, against king Alcohol; and
without a figure
, and that both directly and indirectly, they
do battle, not only against maker and vender, but against
moderates and conservatives. The defence is, that they
only roll public opinion along and allow the ball to crush
whatever opposes; yet a sly and secret and oblique shove
sends said ball maliciously, with its crushing momentum,
against some innocent and worthy people. In the
melee
,
rampant ultraists, with something like implacable hate,
purposely
mistake a friend for a foe, and roll this same
ponderous
weight over an unsuspecting neighbor. Public
opinion
depends for its value on the material from which it
is made, and is sometimes a ball that ought to be itself
broken into pieces, instead of being used to break other
things. Even when manufactured of the very best articles,
it may be so worked as to do some very injudicious and
harmful labor; and that the ultra and demagogue well
understand
.
Hence, when we are only opposing malice and
trick in these
movers
, many with great folly think we are
opposing the movement and the reformation itself!
I have other reasons for withdrawing from our society;
for we may not be identified with what is doing a needless
harm, although it is accomplishing some good. We cannot
merge our ministerial character and influence, and jeopardize
our reputation for candor, liberality, caution, charity; and
become
so
bound to the interest of one class of men or
sinners
,
as to forget or be indifferent about men or sinners of
other kinds and classes.
Adieu,
C.
Clarence
.
LETTER XXXIV.
Dear Charles
,Hem!pray are you not interested in
some manufactory of the
creature?
Or has not Deacon Giles
sent you a barrel of something nice? Are you quite certain
you did not write after dining out? Or is there no fear of
some spirit-selling church-officer before your eyes?
Why, please your reverence, what's the matter? Have
you gone back to the fathers and the dark ages? Look here,
sir: if some folks in the old purchase get hold of your
precious
document, if you do not smoke for it I am no prophet!
Seriously, Charles, some reformers would almost depose
you from the ministry for such a letterthey would
Grahamize
you. Besides, we have funny fellows in these
latitudes
that can take you off to a fraction! They would
act
you, calling your reverence Mr. Claret, making sermons and
prayers all to match the character bestowed upon you! * *
* * * * * They would roll, not merely public opinion
against your side, but they would, in western parlance, go
over you rough-shod, and handle your dignity without
gloves!
We thought matters at Woodville occasionally
tempestuous
;
why, sentiments like yours have power to raise a storm
in civilized places. Even a layman of eminence dares not
always
hint in public meeting at certain abuses, without
provoking
an audible whisper, Kick him out! So, sir, if you are not
partial to the argument
posteriori
, keep heterodoxy to
yourself
.
Why, Charles, in here we have, in addition to Sunday
lectures in many parts of our purchase, temperance and
negro
operas; temperance tableaux; temperance theatres;
temperance eating-houses, and temperance every thing, and
our whole population, in places, is soused head-over-ears in
temperance; and when a wearied chap emerges for an
occasional
sniffle of air, he drips like a water-spaniel that
swims out of a canal with a stick or apple in his mouth.
With many, temperance is here, as there, the whole of
virtue. A man not pledged is often suspected and deemed
void of all excellence; if pledged, he is equal to the best of
men, if not a
little
superior! Moderates and conservatives
are often worse than even rum-sellers; and rum-sellers are
occasionally called imps of hell! We have, too, itinerants,
who wander about in very eccentric orbits and narrate their
rum
days at so much
per diem
, as if
their
experience was
needed to enlighten the world as to the evils of drunkenness!
So once thought the Moral Reform Society, till their
disgustful
and corrupting books were presented as a nuisance.
Some folks are silly enough to imagine that the life and
death of the temperance reformation hang on these worthies!
Their lapses and relapses create a sensation, as if with their
almost
unavoidable
backslidings the cause itself of
temperance
had gone back for ever!
Charles, is it surprising that these men should play their
antics before the eyes of the world, and then fall away till
the last state is worse than the first? What clergyman, even,
who is well educated, and accustomed to good society, and to
moderate attention and respect, and who is a truly good man;
what clergyman but would be endangered by a popularity
and applause and adulation, so sudden and universal as often
surrounds an itinerant lecturer? Alas! how often have
excellent
clergymen fallen from a giddy pinnacle! What, then,
must be the result when a reformed inebriate, with moderate
education, never before known and not moving in what are
deemed the better circles, with no excellence except his bare
reformation from beastly drunkenness to mere sanity; what
the result, when such a man is raised on the shoulders of
better
mencarried in triumph from one end of a purchase to
anotherhis name in grand staring capitals of sixteen-lines
pica, at every corner, and in every mouththe Sabbath and
the church ceded to his nauseating history of debauchery and
cruelty, while ministers, and elders, and deacons, and
evangelists
are in his train, and who quote his words, retail his
anecdotes and line his pocketswhat must be the result?
Is it a wonder that this man is
intoxicated
with fame?
that he enlarges to his new sphere, filling it with himself?
Is it a wonder he deems all temperance to be embodied in
him, and when a treacherous calm arises in this
bewildering
tempest of popularity, that the man subsides into
ennui
and goes back to his cups? Believe me, Charles, it is always
perilous to elevate men suddenly above their former selves;
and great folly, when a wanderer returns simply to what he
was, to make that return the sole reason for manufacturing,
and from the
raw material
, a prince!
But, Charles, notwithstanding these and many other
very disagreeable and objectionable matters, I have been
a member of a temperance society; and unless I see
reasons stronger than you have advanced, I shall remain a
member.
Yours ever,
R.
Carlton
.
LETTER XXXV.
Dear Charles
,And so you have resolved to hold on to
your temperance society a little longer. Well done!
Charles, I do by no means condemn your clerical
brethren
for their withdrawment in some places and on some
occasions
.
It must be granted, that when rabid ultraists insist
on the paramount importance of a temperance principle, and,
invading the sanetity of the church, meddle with the wine
in the communion; or say that the Sabbath is as well, if not
better kept, by devoting it to temperance purposes, and run
a sort of opposition-line against the regularly ordained and
divinely authorized worship of the day; and when, in
irresponsible
conventions, they pass their impertinent resolutions
that churches shall admit or not admit whom the conventions
affirm are or are not suitable members, then may the clergy
well be alarmed and indignant, and if they cannot control
the fanaticism of the voluntary moral association, based on
one principle or phrase of a moral code, properly enough
withdraw their name and influence.
It is, indeed, exceedingly provoking that an assembly of
the most heterogeneous ingredientssome perfectionists
some very far from perfectionsome that go to church on
the Sabbath, and others that spend the Lord's day in
pleasures
deistsatheistsprofane
personsimpure(for this
medley is found in some conventions professedly moral)
that such a mass meeting should dictate a church discipline!
and prescribe the manner of the ordinances!!
I believe with you, Charles, that it is not demonstrable,
from either reason or Scripture, that the temperate use of
intoxicating
liquors, and especially wine, is wrong
per se;
and that, not as a medicine merely, but as an occasional
beverage. A state of the world may occasionally exist when
expediency demands an entire or very great abstinence from
what is lawful. The Rechabites were praised, not for
abstaining
from what is unlawful, but from what is lawful; in
obedience to the wish of their father, they neither bought
land, nor planted vineyards, nor used wine.
Be it remembered, we are to abstain from lawful things,
when
conscientious and docile
persons would be misled by
our use of such things, either to use the same unlawfully,
or to use analogous unlawful things. In this case, if eating
meat or drinking wine necessarily mislead a brotheri. e.
a conscientious Christian brother, as to belief or practice, we
must abstain till his knowledge is large as our own. But if
all around have knowledge, and do easily and necessarily
know what is sinful and what is not sinful; if they can
plainly enough distinguish between use and abuse; if, out of
mere petulance, or prejudice, or to harass, they affirm that
if we do what all know is
right
and
allowable
, they will do
what is
wrong
that is manifestly a case widely different
from the other. Hence, while on the first principle we yield
our rights and abstain from a lawful usage, we are not bound
to yield, on the latter principle.
Peculiarity of circumstances, as possibly in the
temperance
case, may render it advisable to abstain wholly, for the
7
time, from wines and alcoholic beverages: but this is not,
after all, on the conscientious ground. We are all bound to
set a good example to men, that they may know what to do
without hearing our logic; for the most efficacious logic for
the mass is our personal behavior. In temperance, owing
to accidental causes, the example might not be useful unless
it were a total abstinence.
I repeat that an essential distinction is to be seen here.
We are all bound to show, by our example, how lawful
things may be lawfully used; and need only then abstain from
the abuse. We are not to abstain from what is lawful and
right, except when truly
conscientious
and
weak
good men
must, of necessity, misinterpret our lawful conduct.
Apply this remark to temperance. We are bound to set
before all men, and at all times, an example how to use
drinks temperately
. If men see, or can easily be made to
see, the true distinction between the temperate and
intemperate
use; that is, between the lawful use and the unlawful
abuse; then is the sin their own, in case they affect to plead
our
proper
behavior as a good reason for their
improper
behavior
.
Deny this plain principle and its plain inferences,
and the door is wide open for every monstrous absurdity in
life and logic. An impudent fellow may then say, If you,
who can afford it, wear a fine coat, I, who cannot, will have
one also;or, You are rich, and eat mutton chops and
oysters moderately; and,
therefore
, I will eat cold beef
immoderately
;
and on you shall be the sin of
my
gluttony.
Another may say, If you recreate and I cannot, if you
have any joy beyond my means or situation, you are a bad
and selfish fellow; and,
therefore
, I will have and do the
same, if I perish. Yea, a man might say, You live in a
three-story brick edifice; and,
therefore
, I shall knock down
and rob the next man I meet: if you would prevent that
crime, go live in a one-story frame house. And so people
who do know what is sin and what is not, say, If you drink
a glass of wine once a day at your dinner, I intend, for that
reason, to drink a gin-sling or a cocktail before and after
every meal; and as often as I can buy, beg, or steal one.
Supposing, however, the example of the lawful use of a
dangerous thing cannot be seen or be understood without
entire disuse; then, for the time, and under the peculiarity
of the circumstances, the total abstinence is obligatory. In
this category is, in some places, perhaps, the Temperance
Reformation. Hence, if I abstain entirely from the
tabooed
drinks, it is on this principle, and not on the conscientious
principle. I make a grand distinction between causing a
conscientious man to sin, and innocently causing a petulant
man to get very angry.
I do, of course, deem total abstinence only temporary.
A time may come when it would be safe for the public, that
all who can temperately and moderately drink certain liquors,
may do so if they please. The use and abuse are, indeed,
very near one another; but while that is a reason for
uncommon
caution and watchfulness, it is not a conclusive
reason for entire abstinence. For, while thousands who
deemed themselves wary enough, have been conquered by
their appetite; yet it is also true, that very many have not
been thus overcome. These opposite results only show, that
some may, and others may not, drink even temperately.
This could be illustrated and enforced in many things
where use and abuse are very near neighbors. Our talents,
learning, appetites, propensities, all are liable to great abuse
and perversion; but who contends that all these things are
intrinsically wrong, and that for fear of evil we must
abstain
from all use of our natural faculties, powers,
endowments
?
Perhaps there is nothing very important to us
individually
that is not, just in proportion to that importance,
the more liable to abuse. If an instrumentality of great
power, it is of course a great temptation to use it, in any
way for our purposes; and if our purposes are bad, the
instrumentality
will become the means of great evil. The
present condition of man is one of endless warfare and
watchfulness
;
and evils arise, not from what natural or accessory
powers and means we may severally possess, but from our
intention to misuse and pervert. And this reaches to all the
good things intended for our benefit. The only safety is in
looking to God with an humble and honest prayerfulness to
give us right hearts and spirits. It is both foolish and wicked
to plead our easy liability to commit sin as any excuse for
carelessness and presumption.
Some drinks, dangerous in the excess, may be temperately
used during a long life, as has been seen in ten thousand
instances; although the persons thus using them have been
perpetually in danger of falling into ruinous habits. And
none need more watchfulness than those who live surrounded
with gunpowder. What degree of blame attaches to the
moderate use of dangerous things, where men are not of
necessity driven to use them at all, is a question nice and
intricate. If entire abstinence is imperative in all such
matters, I apprehend the sphere of our movement will
contract
to a hollow pointand then unexpectedly explode like
a schoolboy's torpedo.
All this may be deemed bold. But what is gained by
muzzling logic? I have no reverence for a morality bolstered
up by machinery and expedient; and whilst men may be
silenced by authority and intimidated by opinion, they will
not be convinced. And their long pent-up indignation will,
at the first fair opportunity, burst forth with a violence
commensurate
with the mere authoritative and mechanical screw
restraining it.
Charles, if any meats or drinks are poisonous, and
therefore not intended for use at all, of course neither
Scripture
nor reason allow us to meddle with these. But while
great thanks are due to the learned and excellent men who
have investigated the effects of certain meats and drinks
on the bodily system, and while possibly their modes of
exhibiting
these effects may be a kind of
in terrorem
for men
of
passion
, if not for men of
reason
, yet, after all, diversity
of opinion will prevail as to the fitness and unfitness of
certain
articles of food and drink for the refreshment or
nourishment
of the body.
Yours ever,
R.
Carlton
.
LETTER XXXVI.
Dear Charles
,You reason in your last on the manner
of intercourse with the world, in the main, judiciously;
although exceptions may be taken to some of your
inferences
.
For, beyond all doubt, if the practical working of a
principle lead us into absurdity, that principle is somewhere
defective or false; and that, whatever show of excellence it
may have. By the fruits, principles may be tested as well
as men.
Be it ever remembered, that we deal with men in this
mixed state in one or more relations, without dealing with
them in all; and provided we deal with any in what is
lawful
and good, we are not understood to deal with them in
what is of a different character, or thus to countenance them
in what is illegal and bad.
Men do have often some employment or office that is in
all respects proper and advantageous, and with that, some
other which is doubtful. But one coming into necessary
and regular contact at the lawful point, does by no means
touch them at the other; and even if they make use of
gains acquired by praiseworthy industry, in ways hurtful
and immoral, we do not give them money for such abuses,
but for their honest labor.
Supposing, as ultraists say and attempt occasionally to
act, we were to cease all dealings and intercourse as
citizens
of a mixed community with men whose whole life and
doings did not quadrate with the rules of strict virtue, then
may we at once go out of the world, and profess
ourselves
wiser than an inspired Apostle, who does not forbid
us as citizens of a community to act as such. Our
kingdom
is not of this world, that we should dare by these
self-righteous
and pharisaical ostentations, to frown and lash
men into virtue; let us allow Csar to chastise his own
subjects. Not only is it not good to be righteous over
much in this way, but it is an attempt fraught with
silliness
and abortion. Nay, it is of the essence of a most
odious despotism; and if not thwarted, would establish an
inquisition with all its satanic implements in every village,
hamlet, and neighborhood, throughout both Purchases. This
self-consequential spirit, affects the character of heaven; it
would, if it dare and could, cast men into hell.
It sometimes happens, that with a lawful business may
be so linked and blended an unlawful one, that it becomes
exceedingly difficult to know whether, in dealing with the
person at all, we are not encouraging him in his
wickedness
;
and whether he does not so understand and interpret
our course. Here all the rules that pertain to doubt in
morals apply; and no greater difficulty is found in
determining
our duty in this perplexing case than in a thousand
others. We act in cases almost innumerable only from the
greater probability. Absolute certainty in most moral
actions is rare. Of course, then, the ordinary probabilities
are to guide us here; and no new rules are necessary or
obligatory. In most cases, our established character and
well known opinions on moral and political questions, will
secure us from being unavoidably misunderstood; and in
others, a public or private protest, as the case may be, will
be sufficient to prevent evil. But if neither of these can
obviate the erroneous impression our conduct would produce,
then let us cease all intercourse with the man whose
complex
business leaves it doubtful whether he be acting more
against than for law and virtue.
Upon the whole, then, as citizens subject to the same
political rules, we may, in general, deal and have intercourse
with our fellow-citizens in whatever lawful and good
employments
and offices they may exercise or dischargeprovided
such employments and offices are not clearly in opposition
to the Bibleand we may leave to our fellow-citizens the
entire responsibility of using their honest gains as they please.
Adopt a contrary principle, Charles, and it becomes
reductio
ad absurdum:
and impracticability proves the falsity of a
moral as well as of a mathematical proposition.
The rules adopted by some moral reformers array
citizens
in clans, and keep the community in a perpetual state
of intestine waran evil greater than what they would
destroy
.
The most bitter, vindictive, and fiercely censorious
spirit, is generated and cultivated. The rabid reformer, on
the one hand, determining to hunt, prosecute, punish, and
destroy all not squaring with his perfect rule, and the
others
,
with clenched teeth and fixed jaws, determined to resist
intolerance, impudence, and bigotry.
We may enter the kingdom of heaven ourselves, and, in
addition to example, we may earnestly, and affectionately,
and logically, and perseveringly entreat others to come with
us; but we may not, and we
cannot
scourge men into it by
prosecutions or persecutions, whether by laws, or public
opinion, or combinations. Fish will not bite till they are
disposed to taste the bait, even if you swear at them.
And some rampant lecturers, on both sides of the Atlantic
and of opposite genders, do all but swear at existing systems
of what they deem political and moral evil.
In both Purchases, under semblance of encouraging
reformations
,
premiums are paid for new virtues. Hence, not
rarely do the Jonathanistical avail themselves of the offers,
and find ways, by a timely adhesion to the combination, of
making more money than in their former concerns. All this
is very well, in the general: for, if men have not faith, and
do not look for reward and approbation beyond this life,
and are not conscientiously in love with virtue for its own
sake, it may be right to let them
feel
the immediate reward
of goodness every time they thrust a hand into the
breechespocket
.
Society may defend itself even by the selfishness
of its citizens. But we pause and doubt and question when
the premium floods the country with lecturers who tell what
all know and yet find it profitablewith moral
play-actors
with
moral singerswith moral stages
moral
ferry boatswhile all the time these moralists are
often infidel in sentiment and sometimes licentious in
practice
!
Yes, Charles, some of these
new lights
, were it not for
one solitary virtue professed and practised for a
consideration
,
would be shunned by some truly good and pious people of both
sexes, because of the many vices they practise
without
consideration
.
You did right enough, Charles, when you renewed your
allegiance to the Temperance Society, to stand on the
reserved
rights. Yes, buy your groceries where you please
travel by what conveyance you choosestop where you
likeemploy what mechanics and laborers you think fit
give not up your liberty. All other things equal, occasions
may arise when it may be proper to give preferencesbut
if such preferences are in consequence of a systematized
plan, they are always a short-sighted policy, and not rarely
unjust and mean and sneaking.
What! are men who were only indifferent in any art
before their fall, are they by some legerdemain transformed
by a reform in their morals into the most skillful and
excellent
persons? Does one vice, even if persisted in, cut a
man off from all the ordinary expectations he has in
common
with the sober? And why shall we stop at one special
vicewhy, not insist men shall cease from all lying, and
swearing, and smoking, and demagogueism! as well as
drinking and Sabbath-breaking?
Do we not all incline enough to our own interests and
look sharp enough after number one, to desert readily poor
workmen and negligent storekeepers, and careless
coachmen
,
without being
commanded
to do so? And if drinking
make men negligent or fraudulent, we shall soon enough
take care of ourselves. Let us, then, be left to judge when
we are hurt or cheated; and not magisterially
forced
by a
combination to take away custom from our fellow-citizens
for fear of what may happen. Our fellow-citizens who are
wickedly and foolishly addicted to one or a dozen vices, will
naturally go to ruin; we need not do what is equivalent to
giving an accelerating shove.
In many cases, Charles, where a husband, or father, or
brother is an inebriate, or sells the forbidden liquors, there
the wife and children, the sisters, are among the very best
people on earth;and in any sense of the term you choose.
They are religious, well educated, polished, tasteful, liberal:
and will you dare to
ask
me to punish these for the sins of
the relative? Are they not bowed down sufficiently? Must
I be raised up, by the machinery of an irresponsible
combination
,
and dropped down upon their crushed heartsa dead
weight? Charles, these rectified spirits may use others
as opinion servesbut myself
never!
Charles, men very frequently deceive themselves in
thinking a benevolent regard for morals induces them to
these restrictive measures. Motives, upon a severe and
honest examination, will often be ferreted out of the dark
works of a deceitful heart, that we shall shudder to behold
a wish on our part to be
felt
in society as
masters
and a
determination to punish rather than reform. True it is,
power
steals from the
many
to the few; but no less true that
many
love power and will exercise power when they have
the opportunity. Easy, then, for such, if the cause in which
they aim at supreme power is a moral one, to keep the real
motive concealed from others and in a measure from
themselves
;
and naturally taking the Supreme Being as of their
party, they will soon learn to exercise his exclusive power,
and
punish
as well as reign.
From the times of our blessed Saviour till now, zealots
have ever been ready to call down fire to destroy the
Samaritans
;
and secular as well as sacred papists are willing to
roast any sort of a heretic either in a quick or a slow fire.
Most will not wait till the harvest, but are determiued to pull
up the cockle, even if they root out the wheat.
Pray, does your reverence intend to be witty, when you
dared to say in a late epistle, a conservative is a sensible
sort of a fellow that sees faults in both sides and none in
himself? Now let me enlighten your darkness: know,
that a conservative is neither a neutral like some folks, nor a
lukewarm like others.
A neutral is a chap that cares for no interest save his
own: a lukewarm is a once fiery hot ultraist that is become
sick of his cause, because he can neither rule nor punish, and
is ready tocascade; but a conservative is a noble fellow
that stands on the side of common sense and common
decency
a
man that, scorning the control of a party or a
clique, is for the rights of humanity, and in defence of such
rights he will dare to do battle single-handed against the
insolent zealot on the one hand, and the sneaking fagger on
the other. Far away from cowardice is the conservative;
and he needs all the excellent qualities that constitute the
true patriot and the true philanthropist; and all the
perspicacity
and logical coolness and acumen that characterize
the genuine philosopher.
Small mental calibre is needed to admit the little shot
fired by the one idea party, whether in politics or morals.
Half wit and half an eye are sufficient to discern the
superficial
bigness which they either assault or defend; for such
men see nothing but the most obvious matters; which,
however
,
they clamorously set forth as wondrous discoveries!
And as to courage, a very tiny amount serves to charge with
a crowd of zealots amidst noise, frenzy, and self-glorification
uponnothing; and especially if money or eclat is to be
had for the service. Shaking Quakerism lives only in
company
.
A single one would die.
I know these fellows boast of their big guns; but of
course they can mean only because of the noise which said
artillery makes in exploding, and the dense volume of stenchy
smoke that follows. We have heard the large artillery of
7*
ultraisms; but we were reminded, not of cannon, but of an
enormous bell with a dozen clappers ringing odd changes on
the veriest common places
ad dfendumdum
.
Ergo, conservatism is the bone and sinew and muscle of
truth; and temperance and all moral reformations are to
be advocated temperately. Quod erat demonstrandum.
Yours ever,
R.
Carlton
.
LETTER XXXVII.
Dear Charles
,It is well for the dignity of your
reverence
,
that your head was not within arm's length, when you
wrote your
ergo
a conservative is the most pugnacious
fellow on earth! We would have ascertained the length
and tenacity of your ears. Whereas, we are so little
pugnacious
that we
fight
tooth and nail against war, for instance,
almost to the very verge of a Quaker's yea and nay doctrine.
And on that topic, since you wish an opinion, my opinion
is that of all wise(hem!)and moderate persons; and of
course is, I presume, your opinion. I maintain that war in
pure self-defence is rightin all other cases wrong. I
maintain
,
moreover, that in the present state of the world defensive
preparations are a means of preventing war; and that any
contrary opinion, while it may seem to be very meek and
amiable, is preposterous and presumptuous. I maintain, still
further, that the deliverance of weak nations against the
tyranny and despotism of mighty ones, may be very
justifiable
cause of war; and provided the right and justice be
on our side, and a war of defence has become inevitable, it
seems not materially to alter the case whether we always
strike the first or the second blow. For, if the unrighteous
nation stands in the posture of an assailant, and merely
waiting
the most favorable opportunity to commence its assault,
if it can be crippled in the means and intruments of violence,
so as to render the meditated violence impracticable, there is
the same obvious reason for a preventive blow on our part
here, as in a private case where we, in a state of nature in
person, or in a civilized state by the agency of the magistrate,
cripple the threatening assassin or wrest away his weapons.
True, many errors, arising from prejudice, anger,
cowardice
,
jealousy, suspicion, may occur in the application of
this rule, or in acting according to any war or self-defensive
principles; but such possibilities only teach the necessity of
greater calmness, caution, forbearance, prudence,
benevolence
.
Possible or even probable evil is by no means a
conclusive argument against the practice or use of a grand
and important rule. If so, most rules are wholly
impracticable
.
And even granting that error always attaches to
action
on the self-defensive principle, the evils arising are vastly
less than would follow from our refusing to defend ourselves
or our country when assaulted with a murderous intention
on the part of the assailants. The very few instances in
which a refusal to defend ourselves has disarmed an assassin,
and preserved both our lives and property, can be easily
accounted
for, without supposing Heaven designed to teach
that men would always be providentially delivered, if they
should remain passive! There may be times and occasions
when circumstances prevent or forbid the use of the naturally
appointed means of defence; and then we may, without
presumption
,
look for special deliverance by unusual means.
But in instances almost innumerable, helpless innocents, who
not only made no defence, but were actually incapable of
defencenay, who were earnestly supplicating for mercy
have been brutally violated and then demoniacally murdered!
In such cases, we learn that passivity is not only unavailing
to preserve life, but is the very reason why life is destroyed.
Charles, I apprehend if Granddaddy Thompson, of Hoosier
memory, had been within rifle-shot when certain miscreants
were stealing towards their victims to violate and to murder,
jurors would have been saved the risk of perjury; and
the rescued victims, with their agonized parents and friends,
would have thought, as they clasped their deliverer to their
hearts, that no harm had been done.
But, Charles, while we say all this, and are willing and
ready to go far, when, with right and justice on our side,
either collectively or individually, we strike aggressive or
defensive blows to protect life or liberty, yet in all other
respects we belong to the peace society.
I cannot, Charles, see the truth, nor feel the force of any
arguments drawn from the mere love of national glory and
national honor. What is society, whether on a small or a
large scale, other than an aggregated individual? It may,
indeed, be conceived as consisting of a thousand hands; a
thousand heads; and, if you please, a thousand hearts; or
all these multiplied a thousand-fold more; but, while such a
political being may accomplish, in every conceivable way,
a thousand-thousand times beyond the natural and personal
individual, is there,
can
there be any other law for the
government
and guidance of that multiplied individual, than the
law that governs and guides the single individual?
The combined man, it is true, may in that capacity be a
sovereign; and since no adequate
earthly
tribunal exists to
which its rights and wrongs may be referred for
adjudication
,
it may redress its own wrongs and defend its own rights:
yet here regard must ever be paid to a moral law infinitely
superior to any combination of human beingsnay, if a
combination
were to comprise all the created individuals of the
universe!
The maxims, the rules, the obligations of eternal justice
bind, and with no possibility of the least exception, the
community
as stringently as the individual; and no mere might
or opportunity can confer right. Hence all must concede
that communities may not take advantage of weakness in a
neighbor to invade their possessions or wrest away their
land; and if one community be indebted in money or
produce
to another, it is no less base to elude or refuse
payment
,
than for a single debtor to defraud his personal
creditor
.
A community may, indeed, as the individual, become
insolvent; but that insolvency, without the creditor's
consent
,
can no more morally free in the one case than the
other. The doctrine that teaches contrary to this, under any
pretext whatever is sheer and hypocritical villany; an
eternal
stigma, through all coming ages of the world's history,
is indelibly branded on the shameless brow of mobocratical
demagogueismand the black scorchings of the stamp have
left there repudiation. All this is
felt
to be true. Logic
cannot and does not create that feeling, although sophistry
is often employed to weaken that feeling or to eradicate it.
Where, then, is exception in favor of national honor and
glory found? Wherein does the combined man differ from
the separate man, that what is puerile, weak, base, unholy,
in the latter, is not and ought not to be essentially so in the
former? By what transformation, plea, or veiling, or
coloring
,
do we so frequently, after discerning the ugliness of
temper that leads the duelist into the field in defence of
his honor at every paltry insult, real or imaginary, all at once
discern the glorious beauteousness of national grandeur
appealing
to arms to assert its dignity? How comes it to pass
that individual forbearance and gentleness are so amiable,
while national is so distasteful? We praise the man who,
rather than lose his time, embitter his temper, waste his
means, or injure his philanthrophy, forgoes a small and
righteous claim; but we vituperate and scorn and taunt a
grand community which, acting on the very same principles,
is ready, for the sake of peace, to give up an unimportant
right!
Will it be said that a nation, from what is called a
pusillanimous behaviour, would be exposed not only to the
contempt of the world, but to fresh insult and aggression?
I answer, first, that it is true of nations, and especially of
great and powerful and brave nations, what is sometimes
true of rich and generous mensuch can afford to wear an
old coat. Yes, Charles, our good old relative, Uncle Sam,
can afford to wear an old coat or even a shocking bad hat,
and to do some things as well as others without fear of
disgraceful
charges, or with a conviction that such charges will
be deemed a silly lie. The old gentleman can outlive them!
But is it so certain that appeals to the good sense and
religious
and moral principles of Christian nations, which the
example of a great nation's forbearance and patience would
set to the world, must, of necessity, be answered by scorn
and aggression? It is, indeed, almost certain that such a
people as ours, that could magnanimously and bravely
dare
to yield a comparatively small and undoubted right, rather
than wage a bloody and demoralizing war, would receive the
hearty applause of the world now and through all enduring
time. If forbearance and gentleness and humanity
disarmed
not an enemy, and that enemy misinterpreting our
conduct, and imputing it to cowardice or other base motives,
adventured to be unjust again, and, in common parlance,
having
got the inch, proceeded to take the ell, then might we
fight with a safe conscience, and with the very approval of
the Most High himself. We had retreated to the wall; and
if the enemy died in his unrighteous assault, his blood would
rest on his own head.
Without running the doctrines of ultra peace societies to
their full extent, I cannot but believe, however, that a special
Providence would be exerted in defence of virtuous and pious
nations as of similar individuals, who refused to take the
sword in aggressive wars, or for the mere avenging of
insulted
honor, or to gain a military reputation: and that such
communities, if defensive war became inevitable, would be
victorious.
In conclusion, dear Charles, I must express my belief
that sentiments like these, when they leak out, render my
chance for promotion in the army rather slim: but, perhaps,
this will prove no great loss, as we abound in here with
conscientious
and unconscientious fighting folks numerous as
you do out there; and who go for all Oregon and our
country
right
or
wrong!
Several of these benevolent heroes,
by the way, have drunk so much for the honor of their
country and the justice of her claims, as to have acquired
noses fiery enough to touch off a cannon!Bang!
Yours ever,
R.
Carlton
.
LETTER XXXVIII.
Dear Charles
,You are determined, then, that I shall
not touch off a cannon with a loco-foco, or lucifer-nose,
and retire from the contest
quasi
victorshouting
Io
triumphe
!
Very well, then,a national man, or the society man, is
very like the uncombined, separate person in almost any
point it may please your reverence to contemplate him. For
instance, the multiplied or aggregated man is as soulless
often as the other, and tries to shift his responsibilities upon
something else;hence the maxim by which he acts
corporations
have no souls. Again, he is very humble,
obsequious
and submissive when poor; very affable,
communicative
,
and generous, when he is in comfortable mediocrity;
and almost invariably very insolent, haughty, overbearing,
and inclined to injustice and oppression when he is rich and
increased
in goods. His greatness has now a dignity to keep,
and in grandiloquent phrases he spouts out his consequence,
and in majestic strides steps off his importance; all which
plainly declare that said dignity is estimated as worth a little
more than it comes to. Very quickly the combined man,
in addition to the swagger and strut and self-admiration,
becomes
like the individual great man, jealous of his honor;
and he can snuff up into his enlarged nostrils insult at a
distance
,
and is as brimful of spitefulness as a Fourth of July
cracker. In other words, domine, the fellow has waxed fat,
and kicks.
On the other hand, when small in our estimation, we say
to a
gentleman
that carelessly treads on our corns and then
raises his cane to chastise us for being in his way, Don't be
angry, master, I didn't mean to be in your road; but when
sufficiently enlarged we say, Take
that
, you rascal!
A grand nation is exceedingly like many a grand man,
in another respect: he is, in spite of all his self-consequence,
artfully managed by his parasites. Multitudes of cringing
demagogues and hangers-on offer incense to vanity and
foment
self-importance, for the gain of the service and the
opportunity
this affords of showing off themselves in being
instruments
of rewarding friends and punishing enemies.
Now, Charles, sorry am I to say that Uncle Sam
sometimes
exposes his weak side to the flatterer. In his saloons
are every now and then some very selfish and scrubby
fellows
,
who, for their own base purposes, play upon the old
gentleman's
vanity; and do unhappily sometimes succeed in
persuading him that his honor and dignity are so delicate in
texture as to be endangered by the slightest puncture, and
that if they were Uncle Sam, they would call 'em out and
have the satisfaction of a gentleman. These parasites teach
that because he is now become so big and grand, the ordinary
maxims and rules that answered in his earlier days, and
which are well enough for small folks and Christian
pilgrims
,
are small potatoes in his case; and that Uncle
Sam, like John Bull, should have a code of laws for his own
use. Religion, say they, is well enough for the rabble;
but philosophy and honor and dignity for him. These
knowing
ones, like a papal priest, are often willing to take the
responsibility
,
if he will only supply means and opportunities:
till at last the old gentleman, though a professed Christian,
is influenced by
carnal
reasonings, and goes to war, goaded
on and misled by skeptics, atheists, debauchees, broken-down
politicians, land-speculators, desperate gamblers and
honorable
gentlemen, that for the mere glory of the thing wish
epaulettes, and other military and naval trappings.
I know, indeed, that in public life are also some persons,
otherwise worthy and amiable, who are not sufficiently aware
that their notion of honor and dignity is not quite in
accordance
with the scriptural view of these matters; and hence
these men hesitate not to proclaim that nations, like
individuals
,
should try the duel, simply to maintain our honor.
And innumerable thoughtless people abound, that love and
praise war from its pomp and pride and circumstance;
and others, who are tired of peace, and wish war for a change
as they wish any show or amusement; and all such persons
are clamorous for a
just
war, if possiblebut an
honorable
war rather than no war. Indeed, most of these secretly desire
to provoke a war; just as a half-horse, half-alligator, rowdy
bully, who leaps into a crowd of people on an election or
muster-day
,
and exclaims, What! ten o'clock, and no fight yet!
Charles, believe me, public sentiment and public opinion
are, in a vast majority of cases, the private sentiment and
opinion of a few, who have most adroitly set these forth as
if the one thought of the nation; and then the nation,
finding
that a character has been read out for it in the high places
of the earth, like any individual fool or grandee, is silly enough,
forsooth, to think it must act up to that character! When I was
quite a lad I was so pre-eminently a fool, on a certain
occasion
,
as to mount a furious and most vicious young colt which
some negro men were trying to breaknot because I could
ride, or had any skill in horse-taming, but simply because
black Pete said in my hearing, Ay! here comes master
Carlton; he'll git on, I know! Well, master Carlton did
get on, to be sure; but, of course, he got off again in an
incredibly
short space of time, and lay awhile on the earth,
half senseless and groaning.
It is really, Charles, uncommonly provoking that a few
menand these in no sense the best men, and some of them
inferior in talents and acquirementsthat a few men should
so rule the many, and that the many should appoint the few a
kind of thinking committee for the whole, and for that sole
reason
allow themselves to be led like bullocks to a
slaughter-house
or
jackasses to a mill! That the few, for a mere
point of honor, should ever involve us in war, is absolutely
intolerable!
Appeals are often made by
sages
who go for the whole
Oregon, whether our national
honor
is not worth
any price
to maintain it? I answer, for one of the million, no! I have
felt the influence of a martial paradeyea! momentarily, I
have thought I
could
charge at the sound of the clarion;
but, in my sober senses, (and I say it, Charles, without
blushing
,)
I say, if all Oregon could be mine, that rather than to
get or retain it at the price of my children's blood,
poured
out on the battle-field, I would sell the whole for a farthing,
or give it for the asking. In defence of our homestead or
hearth, we would all die; but to keep or get a possession for
glory, I would not spill, if I could help myself, a drop of
blood!
Moral cowardice may prevent the avowal, but are there
not millions of fathers and mothers whose hearts beat here
in unison with mine? What, therefore, we would all do
separately and individually, and what we feel to be natural
and praiseworthy in parents, why may not that be done by
us all in our combined capacity? What strange infatuation
is thisthat all
must
be otherwise in a nation, for a mere
abstractiona figmenta conventional idea? It is the law
of
nations
, and therefore must be obeyed! But I tell you it
is
not
the law of
God
, and therefore should be disobeyed!
But, say the demagogues whose hearts are burdened with
philanthropy for the dear people, we must war to defend
our fellow-citizens away out there! Pray, what took these
worthy citizens away out there? Is all Indiana, and Illinois,
and Michigan, and Iowa, and Wisconsin full? Did these
worthy citizens go out there for the honor of the nation, or
its special advantage? Are they a new edition of Pilgrim
Fathers, fleeing from persecution to find a lodge in some
vast wilderness, where to erect the altar and temple of God?
or have these persons absconded from
prosecution?
and do
they seek a refuge from the sheriff and his
posse comatatus?
Have they gone to cheat the poor houseless Indian of his furs,
and to introduce among them drunkenness and small-pox?
In a word, have they not, out of restlessness, and idleness,
and a distaste of arts and sciences and religion, and an
impatience
of all legal and moral restraints, thrown themselves
out of the pale of a civilized life? Better, by far, that Uncle
Sam order these scapegraces home, and set them at some good,
honest, profitable employment, and not force the best of men
to pour out their blood for these fellows! I might be willing
to die for my country, in a just war; but such men are not
my country!some are a disgrace to any land!
We happen to know something of the very estimable
folks who, when we were in the Purchase, ran away from
the progressive civilization of the Far West, to the wild
barbarism
of the Farthest West; and without meaning any
thing disparaging to these worthies, or any thing personally
disrespectful to a lady, it would be well for the United States,
and would in no way tend to our detriment, to allow these
people to pass quietly under the sway of the Queen's most
gracious majesty. The land, perhaps, might be worth
litigation
;
but it would certainly be worth more without the
incumbrance
.
Why should we buy a Botany Baysave for
a prison-house?
Yes, yes! all that may be true enough about
endangering
popularity, and I am aware of what you will say on
reading this letter. But, Charles, I am safe enough in here,
and, like some red-hot abolitionists, I choose to show off my
valorous sentiments at a safe distance. No, no; your
rabble-rousing
Congressman, who vapors with such virtuous
indignation
against these Tory-like opinions, will not catch me on
a stump in his neighborhood. And in case he should say,
Come out here, sir, and I'll give you a cow-hide, my
reply
is, in the words of Judge Brackenridge, Thank you,
sir; I would not come for two of them!
Yours ever,
R.
Carlton
.
LETTER XXXIX.
Dear Charles
,I do not wince under your rebuke, for
my conscience acquits me of all intentional irreverence
towards
our rulers. I cannot conceive how animadversion on
logical and moral principles in regard to the spirit and
actions
of legislators, especially where it is in the abstract, and
none are named, comes under the prohibition you mention,
that we must not speak evil of the rulers of the people.
The scriptural prohibition certainly forbids all
malevolent
railing and false accusation, and all studied insult and
purposed disobedience to laws properly enacted. It forbids
any endeavor to defeat or embarrass an administration on
mere party grounds, and every thing done to make measures
miscarry in order to prove ourselves right in prediction of
disastrous results. But surely we may point out errors, and
rebuke folly and impiety. Our very allegiance to heaven
renders this not only allowable, but imperative.
The pulpit and the press are altogether blameworthy,
if on suitable occasions they fail to admonish legislators of
their duty; to rebuke them sharply for their sins; and to
warn them most seriously of the weighty responsibility
attending
the administration of the government.
Charles, if a man to whom we confidently intrust our
best earthly interestsour propertyour lifeour sacred
honorand the lives of our sons and daughtersyea, and
the morals of the community,if that man shall disregard
his high trust, and, obeying the clamorous voice of passion
or interest, shall jeopardize allthat man deserves to be
branded Traitor!
Men eagerly aspire after the honor of becoming
legislators
;
Charles, could they only see the far-reaching
consequences
of their public conduct, it would seem impossible to
take a seat in the public halls of legislation without a deep
and solemn awe upon the spirit. There, to speak
paradoxically
,
one's own interest would make him abhor all selfishness.
But how little solemnity and disinterestedness there! The
hall of legislation is regarded as a mere theatre for the
display
of talents; an arena for contests of jealousy and
ambition
;
often an elevated platform for political harlequins
to play off grotesque antics in the sight of the world! And
where folly and malevolence do not appear, how very often
does the sectional partisan, spouting his grandiloquence for
Bunkum, mistake himself for the patriot!rattling only,
when he thinks he thunders!
The mere man of partythe man of a cliquefilled to
the extent of his tiny capacity with one little idea with a
big namechosen simply for his pre-eminent impudence
and unserupulous soul, with small reading, no reflection,
and without talentwould pass for a statesman and
patriot
!
What buffoonery, Charles, can equal that? And
the higher the elevation whence he exhibits, the more
ridiculous
,
the more pitiable the sight! But when the man
there essays to spout forth gall and venomlike a new
candidate
on the stump, with a wallet full of certificates
testifying
to his own excellency and his opponent's demerits
all in the style of a political bully, and really mistakes his
great swelling words of vanity for arguments and
patriotism
the
whole strut and inflation are essentially
funny
!
Such a man cannot be a good man, and, therefore,
neither a good citizen nor a patriot.
Can he be a patriot, Charles, who, under pretext of
listening
to the voice of the people, advocates measures which
he knows are adverse to the best interests of the country?
Can he be a wise man who mistakes the clamors of party
for the voice of reason? Can he be a good man who has
ever or mainly in view, a seat in the house; and,
therefore
,
votes such measures as shall secure that seat?
Fully do I believe that in all political parties, are men of
sterling integrity, who most conscientiously advocate the
measures of their several parties; and fully aware am I
that many grave questions involving most important interests
are so complicated, that men of the keenest acumen see
only darkly, and are forced to enter on something like mere
experiment, intending thus to test principles by their
results
;
and yet it is also very certain that some senators and
legislators care little for the merits of a cause, and ever look
at the popularity, and the popularity only, of a measure,
affecting to believe that what is the voice of the people must
of necessity be right. With them the sole inquiry is,
What do the people say? What do the people want?
And when that question is satisfactorily answered, all
trouble
of thought, and labor of reasoning, and regard for
consequences
are at an end. The people for everand the
people right or wrong! and that whether the people order
them as sovereigns, or cry unto them with the squallings
of a rickety child or spoiled pet, resolving to have the
moon and the eleven stars.
Doubtless a
vox populi
exists that may not be safely
disregarded
by lawgivers and administrators;a
vox populi
in
which is heard the tones of wise and good men, sounding
from one end of the union to the other. For, while it may
be barely possible that one man may be right on some
questions
,
and
all
other men wrong, it is so highly improbable,
that a conscientious man might, without sin, step aside or
yield to the many. But he who affects to hear the
vox dei
in the artificially excited clamors of ignorance and
prejudice
and party, and then dares to act contrary to his own
deliberate judgment in yielding to and not resisting such a
vox populi
, isa base traitor! And if that man, in
obedience
to that senseless outcry of folly, shall, either by
voting
directly in its favor, or by a cowardly
dodging
,
withdraw
the barrier of his name from resisting the evil, if that
base traitor shall in either way involve our country in
unnecessary
warupon his accursed head will rest the blood
of the land!
He may find it hard now to stand single-handed against
his party, and to bear their scoffs and sneers: he will find
it harder to endure the remorse of a dying hour. The
blood of slain men, and the cries of orphans, and the
crushed
hearts of widowed mothers, and the despairing groans of
the battle-field, and the ruin of moral and domestic
happiness
whatever
passion and revenge and the love of unholy
glory and ambition may now, in the excitement of health and
prosperity, say to the contrary, will all rise up and cry in
that hour, the price of honor
is
too great! There is
a voice of blood that shall come stealing into the silence of
that darkened chamber, and a form of terror that shall pass
before the glazing eyes of the traitor, unheard and unseen
by the attendants, but loud as pealing thunder, and
appalling
,
as the ghosts of the murdered to the dying!
In the strange light that shall then shine to the mental
eyeclearer and stronger as the light of this life is
quenched
in
that light shall the smiles of his partisans look like
the distortions of scowling demons, and the applause of the
thoughtless and revengeful shall burst like howlings of
the lost! And in that hour of unspeakable and unavailing
anguish, how will the man, now a reckless, selfish advocate
of war, curse, even with gnashing of teeth, the folly and
madness that stood impiously forth in the halls of legislation,
and in the sight of the world cried out, Nothing is too
dear for honor!
Charles, let them, in the pride of statesmanship and
worldly wisdom, lay my honor in the dustand let all the
lordly train of earth's sons pass by in the mighty pomp and
glorious pageantry of life, deeming me too base for their
contempt
let
them all show their deep loathing and disgust as
they turn from what is deemed the offscouring of this
world,yea! let all this pass by mebut oh! Charles! let
me not lie down in the death-struggle amidst the appalling
shrieks and terrific visions that ring out, and start from the
gory battle-fields, that were made by my thirst of power, or
mere heartless love of glory!
May the infinite mercy deliver me from the alarm of
William the Conqueror when he stood aghast on the very
verge of the eternal state:Laden with many and
grievous
sins, said he, I tremble; and being ready to be taken
soon into the terrible examination of God, I am ignorant
what I should do. I have been brought up in feats of arms
from my childhood; I am greatly polluted with the effusion
of much blood; I can by no means number the evils I have
done these sixty years, for which I am now constrained,
without
stay, to render an account to the just Judge.
It is a solemn thing to stand in a high station: and it is
a solemn thing to be an American Senator or Congressman.
Yours ever,
R.
Carlton
.
LETTER XL.
Dear Charles
,Granting that your argument is true in
part, it surely is not so in all respects.
Are we so to interpret the right of instruction as to
narrow
it down to an obligation to obey that small body of the
people who are a legislator's immediate constituents; and
shall the legislator study
their
interest to an utter disregard of
the interests of the
people at large?
Can any right of
instruction
free the representative from moral responsibility?
Must he obey his constituents when that obedience is clearly
seen to conflict with their real and the ultimate good?
Is the hall of legislation a mere court of justice, with its
judges and jury, where the representative appears in behalf
of his constituents to make the best of their cause as if his
clients; and does he hold his station as a fee for services?
Is his sole and paramount duty to strive that these shall be
victorious; while others are to watch whether law or equity
be saved or violated? It can be this, and nothing more nor
less, if we admit the doctrine of representative instruction in
all the latitude for which most contend.
Why the long and thorough debates in congress, and
elsewhere, if not to ascertain where the truth lies? And if
the truth be discovered, is it not to be obeyed? But how
can it be obeyed if the representative has yet no liberty to
vote except for what he is pledged, and to please an
exceedingly
small part comparatively of the common countrythose
who are separately each man's constituents?
A pack-horse or a donkey might serve to carry up a vote
as well as a representative, provided he had equal intelligence,
honesty and obstinacyi. e. provided he knew his duty was
most perseveringly to kick at all reasoning, and at the end
of a month's discussion, shutting his ears resolutely against
the voice of truth, to deliver very solemnly and with the air
of a patriot his constituents' vote. And then he might go
back and claim his reward.
A thousand local matters doubtless there are, in no way
affecting the public at large, in which a reciprocal kindness
and good will are felt by all sections of the common country.
Here representatives may and must adhere to the letter of
their instructionsthe whole country allows this and is
mutually
benefited by it. In these separate and mutually
permitted
sectional interests, the representatives are rather
agents than representativesthey come to ask of the whole
a favor for a partand pledge that part as willing in its
turn to help the whole or any other part. But if he be mainly
a legislator of the people as well as the agent of a part in
some things, he
must
follow the truth when rendered plain
by the discussion. If that truth accords with the wishes of
his immediate constituents (for
all
are indirectly his
constituents
),
well; if not, then ought he utterly to disregard
his neighborhood or mere party instructions.
As far as the representative is an
agent
to do the business
of his locality, and that business conflicts with no common
interest, he may and must do that business; and, where the
local interest can be regarded when it is involved in some
common interest, he may, by the expressed or implied
assent
of the whole, honorably strive to save or guard that
special interest. The whole brotherhood may be rendered
willing to sacrifice part of a common good, and in some cases
entirely to forego that good, if a part of the brotherhood be
seriously damaged or entirely ruined. But the
representative
in his legislative character ought not to act with local
views; and if the good of the whole imperatively demand
of him to vote contrary to the wishes of his neighborhood or
party, he is bound to obey the whole people in preference to
a part. And that is patriotismand requires a
representative
other than a pack-horse or a donkey; and yet is it a
patriotism that shall become the signal for a braying loud
and discordanta patriotism, that shall save, indeed, the
country, but shall utterly ruin itself. A patriotism that
swims with the tide is cheap and plentiful; a patriotism that
resists a current dashing onward to a deep fall, and bearing
to ruin all that is great and good, is rare and godlike.
It is granted, that parties and their representatives may
often be so honestly confident that the truth is with them, as
to believe that the more thorough the discussion, the plainer
will their side appear. Very well; and if that, upon a
thorough discussion, prove the case, let the representative
vote with a safe conscience:
not
, however, because it is a
party view, and he is instructed so to vote, or is threatened
if he vote not thus, but simply because it is in itself
right
the truth demands it. But if the discussion show truth to be
on the other side, then to the other side let him passhe has
no option, nor may he either dodge or resign; he was sent
thither to obey the truth, and at the peril of displeasing God
let him in no way desert, or be coaxed or threatened to resign
his power. His party will call him traitor, possibly, if he
now obeys the truth;but what is that, compared with the
judgment of God and the approbation of all coming ages in
the world's history?
I am aware that it is said, let the representative in the
case supposed resign; and let him make way for one who
will carry out the party views. What does that mean,
Charles? Shall the man basely resign, and desert his
country
at the very moment she needs his service? Shall he
refuse to obey the truth, neglect his opportunity, and give
room to another who he knows
will do wrong?
He cannot
throw off the responsibility of injuring the country by
resigning
:
the Providence of God has placed him where he
must act even if it ruin his political prospects, and he must
not despise that Providence. After having heard a
discussion
for months, at an enormous expense to his countrya
discussion held for his very aid, in discovering the right
pathand after a laborious and diligent search, shall he be
bid, at the moment he finds that path, to turn away from it?
Oh! folly most preposterous! Oh! most lame and impotent
conclusion!
But it may be said the representative is elected with an
understanding, expressed or implied, that if he change his
views after or during the discussion, he shall resign and
give way to another, who cannot be converted by the truth,
or who has a tougher conscience! There is, however, a
more important anterior question here: has any party a right
to expect or demand such a thing? Has any man a right
to allow such expectation or demand? To me the answer
is plainly negative, and for the very and similar reasons
already urgedno society or party can have a right to do
other than the representative does, who, after full and fair
discussion, follows the truth whithersoever she leads. Any
doctrine the contrary of this, is evidently preposterous, and
fraught with evil, and evil only.
The contrary doctrine makes a hall of legislation a mere
market-house, where the agents of parties buy for their
employers
as cheap as they can, and strive, in every possible
way,
legally
moral, to defraud the other parties. It creates
cliques and clans, arraying the South against the North and
8
the West against the East; allowing nothing to be done for
the whole Republic, but teazing the representatives to
consider
all universal benevolence and good will as
subordinate
to the interests of his party or neighborhood; and even
where the good of other parties and sections and
neighborhoods
is consulted, it is mainly on the principle of
quid pro
quo
. It tempts to obstinacy and falsehood, and provokes to
anger and revenge. It renders discussion a solemn farce;
wasting time and money to discover the truth to men sworn
to obey her, but secretly pledged, if needs be, against her;
and to make plain a path which only they whose interest it
is previously, are expected to follow. It dispenses with all
intelligence, conscience and free agency in a representative,
making him little better than a mercenary and slave.
And what moral cowardice it generates in public men!
Hence the tendency, and every hour becoming stronger, to
throw back upon the people, assembled in disorderly
mass-meetings
of different sorts, questions which ought to be
decided
by the legislatures. The sole anxiety is to ascertain
the will of the people, as it is called; and that will shall be
obeyed, right or wrong. For instance, we beg the
legislature
to decide for us by law, some question affecting the sale
of spirituous liquors. Oh!aye!yes!hem!Well,
what do the people down your way think should be done?
Why, gentlemen, the sober set say you ought to abate the
nuisance. Oh!yes!hem!of course; buthem!
the majority
eh? Why, please your excellencies, the
majority down our way are topers; and they say if you do
not let them alone, you shall see what the people will do next
election!
And then, of course, as it is the will of the people, and
the evident
vox dei
, (i. e.
Bacchi
,) the legislature, created
for the
good
of the people, decides that the
evil
shall
continue
!
And yet, amiable patriots! if the majority are for
the
good
, so are they, too! These gentlemen go for the people,
if the people have a majority of only
one
and that one a
drunken beast, who deposits his ticket with an oath! Some
infidel legislators would vote for bawdy-houses, if their
constituents
were in their favor. Good souls! kind souls!
The doctrine is every day becoming more and more
settled
,
that laws are to be made such as the people will bear;
and we have a thousand Solons willing, not to make the best
laws and compel the wicked to live according to justice and
virtue, but the best the Athenians will endure; although
our modern peoples cannot be entreated or bought to swear
obedience for even ten years, to any system of laws that
can be devised. We desire new laws, new constitutions,
new names, new customs, new antiquities, every year!
Tell me, Charles, is this liberty or licentiousness? Has not
all this a tendency to agrarianism and its cognates? and will it
not destroy representative democracy, and give us virtually
now, and in form hereafter, primary assemblies in lieu of
legislatures
and councils? Is a representative any longer a ruler?
or is he a slave? Ought sovereignty, or such portion as is
delegated to our legislators and magistrates by the laws and
the constitution, to be tamely cast back upon the people?
And if power is somewhere, and must be somewhere, pray
where is it, on this pendulum principle?ever vibrating back
and forth, between people and representative!
Yours ever,
R.
Carlton
.
LETTER XLI.
Dear Charles
,You think I must lately have been
ingratiating
myself with the lawyers, as formerly with the
doctors. Well, suppose that to be the case; is it a sin?
Your reverence might easily find worse company, both out
there and in here. An intelligent, honorable, gentlemanly
lawyer, (and more especially when a true Christian,) is the
best and most improving companion imaginable. All things
else being equal, I am ready to prefer a lawyer for my
representative
to almost any other class of men.
You ask, (rather sneeringly, domine,) when I am to
become
a candidate for Congress. I answer: about the time
your reverence adds a cockade and sword to a black gown,
and marches at the head of a pious congregation to shoot
Mexicans for the good of the country.
However, my party is too small for the indulgence of this
lofty notion. I have no special liking for what might await
a candidate of my stampgroans and hisses, surely; and
in favorable circumstances, tar and feathers. When the
largest liberty party is swelled into immensity by the scum
of foreign jails and poor-houses, a representative will be only
the head of a grand boil, through which head its pus and
feculence will run. In other words, representation will be
a mere scab. This is acknowledged as a very mangy
metaphor
;
still it expresses a truth: for if true, like people,
like priest, it is equally true, like party, like
representative
.
Infidel demagogues and atheistic reformers affect to sneer
at the priest; yet, a more soulless hypocrite exists not, than
a pseudo-patriot and pseudo-philanthropist. And, what
self-conceit
can match the insufferable people's-man, (as,
par
excellence
,
he styles himself,) who is like the people's-line, or
people's steamboat or stage, running his opposition against
Bible-truths and customs, for the glory and frolic and profit
of the service! Why, these men, for the station of an hour,
or to please the restless and captious, and to gratify the
feelings
of ignorance and spite and prejudice, will at any time,
as far as they can do it, rudely throw down every barrier
the wisdom and experience of ages may have erected against
presumption, insolence, and quackery!
If, Charles, it be true, as some say, that the literature and
habits of a people make the laws, then may we regard
law-makers
as indices, pointing to the degree in the moral and
mental
barometer and thermometer of the folk. And, although
many representatives are mere gasometers, letting off the
people's steam in the vapors of cant and prejudice, yet, if
the people themselves are in this to blame, it seems a waste
of time to defeat the election of the Hon. Mr. Timpkins, as
lie would only give place to the Hon. Mr. Simpkins. Let
us cure the people, and the days of canting and traitorous
demagogues are past; and the halls and councils of the nation
will be adorned with men of wisdom, gravity, dignity,
benevolence
,
Christianity.
Freely is it granted that wise and good men differ now,
and perhaps must ever differ, as to the
policy
of certain
restrictions
,
placed by the laws on the different fooleries and
quackeries of their day, while they yet entirely agree in
despising and condemning these evils; indeed, some
excellent
and intelligent persons do honestly think that all sorts of
humbuggery
should have an unimpeded way, an ample scope,
as the best method of staying their progress.
Other intelligent, but certainly not benevolent men, are
indifferent who suffers, provided themselves escape; and
others take a kind of malicious delight in seeing the fools
gulled, satisfied that their own skill and caution must ever
secure themselves from trickery. Public men of these kinds
we may love and honor or respect, in different degrees;
but who can respect, in any degree, the public man who
deliberately
avows and urges with an abuse of good logic, as
the
reason for repealing all laws against acknowledged
quackeries, that science itself is little better than quackery!
Are we in the nineteenth century (and the politicians
who run the people's-line use that term as a catch-word) to
be soberly told that there is no science? Shall we be told
that wisdom, and goodness, and learning, after years of
toilsome
study and experiment, and deep and patient
investigation
,
can discover no laws of nature! and that laws of
nature
,
when discovered, operate no better than chance! or
that in some thingsmedicine, for instancethere is no
nature
,
no laws to discover, no rules to apply! that health and
sickness is chance, and may be left to chance! Credat
Jud
us,
&c.
Men of science may, indeed, fall into errors; they may
have various, and even opposite hypotheses, to account for
the causes of facts; but does that prove that they have no
truth, and that they cannot avail themselves of facts, even
where they fail to assign just causes for them? It is a very
easy matter to collect all the errors in any art or science
all the difficulties; all the admissions of fallacy; all the
petulant murmurs of scientific men, uttered in moments of
disappointment and chagrinand then we can, if disposed
to make jackasses stand
auribus erectis
, aggravate, and
distort
,
and misinterpret, and sneer, till the shallow and the
mischievous
,
and the sly chaps of medicated candy, honied pills
and the like, shall all, chuckling, exclaim, Hurrah!
quackery
for ever! And then we can vote down all noble edifices
of science and overthrow all her bulwarks, and send, with
legislative sanction, humbuggery to peddle its guzzles with
becoming dignity throughout all Alleghania. But all this
malicious and solemn farce cannot alter our immovable and
confident belief, that industry is better than indolence
knowledge than ignorancemodesty than impudencetruth
than lying, and science than chance!
What moves me, Charles, to this little tirade against some
of our sapient rulers, is a small pamphlet on my table, sent
by a friend; which pamphlet contains some virulent and
official
speeches against the regular doctors, at a time when a
bill was introduced in favor of the irregulars.
As far as the Hon. Dux-gregis sticks to mere policy and
expedient, I can respect him, while, on those points, my
views may differ, perchance, from his; but when I find him
spouting forth the vulgar cant against the science of
medicine
and its learned professors, I stand amazed! Why,
Charles, he deliberately places quackery and science on a
par! and he tosses about the names of Hippocrates, and
Boerhaave, and Rush, as if they were Lobelia, or
Hydropath
,
or Smokimdri, or Swetumthro'!!
The gentlemen of the Faculty, it seems, complained of the
speeches as an insult; but they should have recollected that
a body politic must have its pustules, like the body natural,
and that such, of necessity, must occasionally break and run.
Indeed, according to the mode of the speeches, one might
easily show the futility of divinity, or music, or even law
and politics, as a science. As to the latter, who could not
collect all the sayings about the glorious uncertainty of
law? and all the petulant expressions of learned lawyers
and statesmen themselves, such as a fig for the trial by
jury, and then go on to show that every man shall be his
own lawyer and statesman? Doubtless, before the close of
the nineteenth, every man that lives in a republic will,
like Horace's wise man, be both a king and a cobbler, with
a touch of the snapping-turtle.
It is said by some that every man has a right to make a
fool of himself, (especially, I suppose, in a free country,)
but then, Charles, there is certainly a choice in the places.
Yours ever,
R.
Carlton
.
LETTER XLII.
Dear Charles
,No, I am not surprised that your mind
should be disturbed by certain affirmations in the numerous
papers, circulars and pamphlets, rained down so incessantly
on you through the medium of the post-office, and which so
ferociously advocate the abolition of the death-penalty. The
execution of the murderer out in your district lately,
accounts
for the fresh inundation of those blathering articles,
deemed by their authors of consequence enough to subject
the whole world to a forced tax, in the way of postage. I
should feel myself mean, if I were never willing to pay
postage for circulars and pamphlets, and the like; indeed, I
often pay it willingly, and sometimes thankfully, for some
such are sent by my friends and acquaintance; and others
are intrinsically valuable. But it vexes me to pay for
quackery
,
whether in the shape of advice or pills. Now itinerant
quacks
do
give the advice gratis, even where they fail in
selling nostrums at a thousand per cent. above cost; but the
pseudo-philanthropic quack makes you pay for the advice
itself; and even where such go about lecturing, collections
are taken to pay for heating the poker.
I have in my turn reciprocated the favors of my
personal
friends, and sent them my circulars as they have sent me
theirs; but I have often forborne sending, from
unwillingness
to make folks pay for
my
business. Once I adopted
this expedient: I directed a circular, of great importance
to myself, to Mr. Smith; and on the circular I
pre-paid
the
postage
, that Uncle Sam should receive no detriment, and
the local postmasters might not be vexed. A circular, thus
directed and pre-paid, was sent, unsealed, to several cities
and large towns; with the hope that all the Smiths would
read it in each place, and then make known my proposals
to their friends and relatives. But sorry am I to say, the
expedient did not answer the purpose designed: the
honesty
,
perhaps, being so uncommon, was suspicious! Where
all are crazy it is not safe for one to be sane.
But we must not forget the hang of the thing. I
think, then, Charles, we need not be disturbed if it is not
in our power to show from documents, whether crime have
decreased or increased, in some communities and states,
where it is alleged capital punishment has been abolished.
For many incidental circumstances, separate from all laws,
may, for short periods, either diminish or increase crime.
Doubtless, many political, economical, literary and
moral
changes in communities, affect for times the frequency
and the nature of vices and crimes. Even
a good road
, it
is said, has diminished highway robbery! But these very
changes, if they accompany the passage of certain laws, are
overlooked; and the infrequency of vice and crime is
unjustly
attributed to the law; while other things are the true
cause.
Again, Charles, it is a remarkable fact that great crimes,
like diseases and plagues, are every now and then
epidemical
or endemical, being suddenly increased both in number
and intensity, periodically. Singular accidents sometimes
occur simultaneously for weeks together. The tempter is
always busy with us; but there are occasions, when his
agency is
so
marked, that by way of eminence it is said,
the very devil seems to have got into men! and this has
a true and special sense, although it be rudely expressed.
It is not our intention to look for the causes of these facts;
but we remark in passing that the very books men read,
have a strong efficiency, often, in engendering the moral
diseases; and, by consequence, in bringing forth enormous
crimes.
As for myself, Charles, I have learned that very little
confidence is ever to be placed in
ex parte
testimony. Nor
are the Anti-Suspenders any more careful in collecting and
arranging facts, than other fierce reformers; whilst they
are equally obstinate in
adhering
to what they once affirm.
And yet, by their own showing, the favorable testimony for
abolition is for very short periods; and short periods are
not conclusive in support of an argument which, if worth
any thing, must show that the abolition would be
permanently
and
for ever
beneficial. It is
not
in morals, as in
mathematics
what
is true of a small triangle drawn upon your
slate, is true of a similar triangle which should be as large
as the worldbut in morals, what is true at one time is
always
modified by circumstances at another; and in some
circumstances it may fail entirely.
In morals, therefore, we are happily not left to
experiment
nor to popular opinion. These methods may do in
sciences, but not in virtues and vices, in rewards and
punishments
.
Matters here are too sacred, too vital, too
immediately
necessary, to be rested on inductions. We need here
eternal and imperative laws, authoritatively and explicitly set
forth; and by these we may and must go boldly and safely,
satisfied that whatever seeming evils may temporarily arise
from obedience, and seeming advantages from disobedience,
the laws are yet right. We may not, at our peril, for
political
expediency, or to gratify an erroneous public opinion,
depart from such laws.
If we have recourse here to experimental methods, such
as are adopted by radical reformers and foul-mouthed
abolitionists
,
we learn very soon to judge of revelations from God
as right or wrong from the immediate results; and, from the
very spirit of induction, we are soon
induced
to believe,
and often both directly and indirectly to affirm that, in the
nineteenth century, the wisdom of man is a little better
than the wisdom God! Hence many, in defending and
propagating
modern abolitionisms, do, without scruple, teach that
any Book which commands the death penalty, or defensive
war; or allows, under circumstances, a temporary and
modified
slavery; or a temperate use of wineis not from God,
and cannot be!
It cannot be concealed that, throughout the world, the
spirit of liberty is aroused; but, like all other blessings, this
state of the human mind is connected with some evils. The
obvious and natural extreme of liberty is licentiousness and
lawlessness; and if men have been for ages enslaved and
chained down to a base thraldom by lordly masters,
professedly
Christian, and affecting to plead a divine warrant for
their gross intolerance and tyranny, it is next to impossible
that when
men
burst those shackles, they should not express
dislike, and often hatred for a Book which vile priests and
kings have ever hypocritically quoted, and
falsely
, against
men's natural rights.
Hence, the many attempts to do without laws, divine or
human. And hence, while endeavoring to do thus without
law, by trusting to human nature, and believing in its
perfectibility
in an unrenewed state, it is natural to show, first,
8*
if possible, that the Bible is obsolete, having had its use in
former days of darkness and despotism; and then, that, if
not wholly obsolete, it is of no authority, but must be classed
with other good and mistaken books. That a state will yet
be when the gallows (i. e. the death penalty) shall cease, is
highly probable;not that the death penalty, when deserved,
is wrong or inhuman, or not refined enough for the age, but,
that murders will cease. Christianity, it is believed, is to
be universal; not as a mere nominal form, but vital
Christianity
.
Now, Charles, the Bible-men are
the
very men that are
diligently laboring to bring on that epoch; and they will be
instrumental in abolishing the gallows, by removing its cause.
Religious society is, every hour, endeavoring to reform the
vicious and to prevent crime; and that in ten thousand ways
overlooked not only by the World, but by Radicals and
Abolitionists
themselves. And yet many of these self-styled
Philanthropists choose maliciously to insinuate, and
sometimes
to affirm, that the Bible and its friends and advocates
are the cause of crime and punishment! There is, indeed,
a nominal, outside society, who may be purposely confounded
with the Christian society, and who are engaged in their
schemes of pleasure and ambition, careless who hangs,
provided
themselves escape. If
that
society be meant, no
severity
of language can exceed the blackness of its guilt; if the
true
Christian society be meant, no language can set forth
the black villainy and the base hypocrisy of radical
abolitionists
in confounding the two together, and in thus vilifying
the true.
The prisoner's friend, and assassin's nurse society,
according
to some of their impudent publications, represent
punishment as revenge! Then, the Divine Being must be
unrighteous, who taketh vengeance, or who orders it to be
inflicted! For, if the Divine Being does take vengeance
both in this life and in the other, as must be admitted by all
who study providence or read the Bible, whence, then, arises
the presumption
a priori
that his commands, blood for
blood, life for life, are not to be understood in any sense
approximating the literal?or that circumstances justify a
substitution of perpetual imprisonment? Is the moral in
our nature so unlike the moral in other parts of the universe,
or in the disembodied state, as to raise the presumption, that
a punishment ordered by God, and sanctioned by his own
action as a temporal judge in ancient Jewish timesthe
times of the theocracyis too severe; and, therefore, must
be otherwise interpreted or wholly abolished?
Thou shalt not kill, says the learned and astute
Doctor
Daniel, is imperative and absolute, and, therefore, thou
shalt not hang the murderers!I quote from one of the
pamphlets, Charles. And yet God himself(unless some of
your gordian knot-cutters affirm it was only Moses)as the
political governor and king of that very people, to whom the
law was first formally given, did order Achan to be stoned
to death, and appointed cities of refuge that accidental
man-slayers
might be preserved from the legal and appointed
doom of the malicious murderer! Imprisonment, till the
death of the High-Priest, was, in those cities, allotted to the
accidental homicide; but death, and without commutation of
punishment, was the doom of the wilful murderer.
Doctor Daniel thinks also the command in Genesis was
a mere prediction, that men would kill a murderer!
Why?because it would be wrong in the Most High to
give such a command? Show that punishment is revenge,
in a bad sense of the term; or that divine vengeance is
essentially
wrong, and then these attempts to fritter away plain
English will seem less puerile and impious. But why even
a prediction, if it were not certain that the voice of reason
and nature, in all coming ages, must of necessity, like the
very voice of the Supreme himself, cry out, blood for
blood? No cobbler beyond his last, Charles; and
hence, without intending an affront to the artisan, or wishing
an undue increase of second-rate leather conveniences, the
learned doctor had better confine himself to making pegged
boots and shoes.
But, please your reverence, is not imprisonment a
punishment
?
and is that not also revenge? No, verily,
imprisonment
is mere reformation! and a benevolent return of
good for evil!! Verily, these anti-hangers are the cream
and milksops of humanity; and they have discovered, by
induction, or reduction, or the rule of three direct, or some
other scientific process, that perpetual incarceration changes
the soul; and that, hereafter, the surest way to heaven will
be through a dungeon! Aye, this is a moral persuader,
efficacious
as the flames of Tophet to renovate the spirit, and
purify
a demon into an angel! Purgatory principles, Charles,
are not confined to the papists.
One learned divine across the water, and he no dissenter,
has discovered and announced that the murderer was put
to death under the law, only as a type! that now the
anti-type
being come, the typical sacrifice of the murderer, as of
all other animals, ceases of necessity!!A murderer offered
as typical of the innocent One! I hope we have
misunderstood
the quotation from his dissertation, and that the
anti-gallows
paper has (and perhaps) accidentally said of the
English dignitary what is not true; but if not  .
I dare not trust my pen any further here. As typical of
what, however, shall Rome hereafter, when fully
rein-stated
,
offer her bloody sacrifices of roasted heretics for a
sweet-smelling savor, if this doctor has given a
probable
opinion?
Several of your pamphleteers contend that the fear of
death
never
deters from murder. This cannot be proved;
but if that does not, does the fear of perpetual imprisonment?
If you answer, no; then how can that punishment diminish
crime? If you say, yes; then must perpetual
imprisonment
be either equal to, or greater than, death. But if
equal, it can be no more efficacious than the death penalty;
and if a greater punishment, pray where is the boasted
mercy and justice and benevolence that inflict on murderers
a punishment severer than that of the Bible?
Another assassin's friend, in answering the argument
drawn from our natural right to destroy what is about to
destroy us, contends, that if any man could hold immovable
a person threatening the other's life, he ought so to hold him;
and, therefore, says the reasoner, society ought only to hold
the murderer fast! Well, society has always done this.
We hold in prison, or by bail, as fast as we can, the man
that
threatens
our lives:and we destroy the man that
takes
our lives. We prevent as long as possible, and then we
punish. But it does not balance exactly in logic or common
sense to say, that, as we would individually and mercifully
hold fast one that
threatens and intends
a crime, and thus
prevent the crime, so the community ought to hold fast one
that has actually
committed
the crime.
Every man that has committed murder might justly
have been, in self-defence, slain by his victim, had that
victim
been aware of the murderer's intention or been able to
defend himself; and why may not that murderer be with
equal justice slain by the community, the avenger of blood,
representing the weak and helpless victim of assassination?
All who take the sword to assassinate for malice or
money, may righteously perish by the sword: and thus
to defend and punish the magistrate holds not the sword in
vain, but, he is God's minister for that purpose. And
cursed
be he that holdeth back his sword then from the
stroke of justice and of mercy:he is false to his God and
to his neighbor.
Charles, I believe all the points are now gone over,
contained
in the magazines and circulars lately sent, with a
modest and polite request that you would preach at
Somewhersburg a sermon in behalf of the Benevolent and
Humane Fraternity of the No Chokes: but if any qualms
remain I will try and quiet them in another epistle.
Yours ever,
R.
Carlton
.
LETTER XLIII.
Dear Charles
,And why should I guard my words and
speak more reverently of mock philanthropy and of
pseudo-patriots
?
Do you clergy always weigh your words, and
grease your phrases, and pucker up your sentences, in a
free conversation, around a host's table, or at his fireside,
at your clerical conventions, during recesses? Does a
burning indignation there, sometimes vent itself in homely
and unpremeditated termsand wonder why some one does
not dare to speak openly about such things, and call them
by appropriate names? And then, when some one boldly
looks humbug in the face, and honestly tells him he is a fool
and a liaryou all at once grow gravefrown upon your
brotherand wonder at his rashness and levity! I tell you,
Charles, this is very ungenerous and not a little hypocritical.
Some connected with ultraists and radicals are doubtless
worthy, pious, and honest men. But very many abolitionists,
and especially among the anti-gallows men, are sheer infidels
persons who dexterously avail themselves of peculiar
states of the public, to bring the divine revelation into
discredit
.
Besides, these milkmen do themselves speak very
sneeringly of justice and of a solemn punishment authorized
by the Most High, and call itchoking, strangling,
throtling
,
stretching, and the like.
And is not the chief ding-dong of their contemptible
whine, addressed to the prejudices and the passions and evil
principles of men? Is not their whole clatter an appeal to
democratical principlesas if democracy were the Judge
and the Ruler from whose decision and action ought to be,
and could be, no appeal? Most rampant fellows would
willingly
decide moral and scientific questions by the vote of a
mass meeting, as they decide questions of politics and
economy
!
Their hired agentslike borers, or drill sergeants
would cry up and drum up voters to settle points of eternal
moment by the ballot-box! All such are willing to
number
arguments and not to
weigh
them.
What an argument, domine, is that ever reiterated story
which tells of the difficulty in empannelling a jury to try a
man for murder when death is the penalty! Is it meant by
this, that the majority of men every where have true
opinions
,
and therefore will not be accessory to what is called
legal murder? Then we utterly deny that their opinions are
right; and affirm that many jurors are thus guilty of great
sin who refuse to obey a law of eternal obligation. It may
be the fashion to laud such persons; but they are utterly
unworthy of being themselves protected by law, who
disregard
the nature of justice, and, whilst under oath,
deliberately
throw down the grand barriers against crime.
It is meant, however, that the moral sense of the age is
so debased, and men think so lightly of crime and so badly
of severe punishment, that we must lower the laws to their
level. This doctrine of expediency is a great favorite with
many who take part with false philanthropists in their
measures
,
and who yet affect to say that the death penalty is
doubtless right
per se
. It seems, then, that an age extolled
to the heavens for advancement in all sorts of good things
and refinements, is yet gone backward in the love of justice
and of stern morality! Well, if the age is so utterly and
hopelessly lost as to debar the best laws, we must be content
with the worse or the less good; if in an evil and adulterous
generation we cannot have a natural and divine law, which
demands the death of the murderer, we must of necessity
be content with man's law, which orders him to be caged for
a pet! While, however, we are compelled by numbers to
yield to necessity, let our solitary voices ever be heard in
decided protest against impiety and presumption. A near
inspection will convince you, Charles, that very many who
affect to deplore it, are yet secretly pleased with this
rebellious
state of the age; and while they prate about expediency
and policy, which require the relaxed law, these fellows are
inwardly delighted that eternal law cannot prevail.
Besides, these very persons do themselves in many ways
produce, and cherish, this relaxed and sickly public opinion:
and then they plead that very state as the main reason for
an accommodated law! In this way, all important laws
may be assailed, and all virtue in certain communities
annihilated
.
Depend on it, Charles, this world is at
invincible
enmity with solemn, sacred, and eternal truthit is high,
we cannot attain unto it! The human heart will not, if it
can under any pretext avoid it, yield to a divine authority; it
will devise endless schemes and seize every opportunity to
throw off that authority. An accommodating Christianity
will be received and praisedbut a Christianity that pleads
for justice as well as mercy is ever scornfully rejected and
bitterly hated; and the advocates of such a religion will be
deemed the enemies of the world, and would be destroyed if
that world had its wish or the power. There is a more
immediate
and intimate connection between theological creeds
and public opinion and action, than some would suppose.
Belief and doctrine in regard to original and total
depravity
;the
native enmity of man towards the law of God;
the wilful powerlessness of our nature as to good;
the justice of God, and the necessity of an atonement;
belief and doctrine on such points affect the people, the
law-maker
,
the judge, the juror, the governor; and these do act
accordingly, in their several capacities.
In all the abolition movements, however mildly and
plausibly
and benevolently they may really, or in appearance,
begin, there does very soon follow a species of reasoning
striking at the root of some eternal truth; and more
especially
at the inflexible justice of God; which reasoning, if
extended legitimately, must overthrow the government of the
Most High, and would forbid all future doom of the wicked.
Some reasoning, if such it may be denominated, makes
us distrust the divine benevolence. For instance, is it a good
argument against
the choking
of a murderer, that he is
shockingly convulsed by it and evidentally in great pain?
an argument I find in some pamphlets and newspapers. What
then is the similar argument when we suffer by sickness, or
by a natural dissolution? If conclusive against benevolence
in one case, why not in another?
What means all the parading of the circumstances, the
dwelling upon the pathos of the tragedy, as it is called,
but to beget a hatred of the punishment and the justice?
Can no melancholy be found at the death of an infant? And
why is not
that
a tragedy too? YesI well know the
wincing such application of false or anti-gallows doctrines
may make in some minds; yet, Charles, believe me, some
hypocritical pseudo-philanthropists secretly
design
that such
application shall be made, and inwardly chuckle at their
successful adroitness!
The spirit of mawkish sentimentality prevails; and the
spirit of infidelity combines with it, endeavoring, in the guise
of an angel of light, to muster forces for a fierce conflict
with revealed truth. And the spirit of infidelity does
beguile
in this way the unstable and unlearned. But,
Charles, when the voice of a brother's blood cries to men in
vain from the earth, that blood shall be required at their
hands, who have, with soft and silken tones of sickly and
sentimental philanthropy, said to the murdered, crying thus
from the bloody grave;Peace, peace,cry not thus
for vengeance, thou unholy one! Be forgivingand stay
that unrighteous brawling! Know, this enlightened and
virtuous community will never minister to thy unchristian
thirst for vengeance! We
feed
thy enemywe
clothe
him
we return him
good
for
evil!
Rest quiet in thy gory grave,
thou unchristian one!
Thus
they
lay the ghost of the murdered, and with meek
and saintly faces, look around for applause, while they
tread down the crimson earth upon the gashed bosom of the
dead. Aye! that voice will cry again; and that despised
and mocked one shall stand accusing at a throne where
justice
will be done! and there the democratic mass
meeting
of innumerable worlds dare not sayNo!
Oh! ye truckling politiciansye vile and false
demagogues
ye
betrayers of men, in not administering justice
where then your sophisms, and adroitness, and onion-created
tears of crocodile hypocrisy, and your honors and greetings
from human applause? Will these be veil enough in that
day? The withering scorn of an everlasting contempt shall
then begin, like a quenchless fire and undying worm, to prey
on your conscience! To sport with the blood of your
murdered
brother is no small crime, and you will find then
how
you were a brother's keeper; and the gaping of his
gory wounds will haunt you for ever; while the grinning
assassin, an unholy apostate that trampled, in devilish
malice
,
on his Maker's image, will dance around, and striking
you with his bloody hand, thank you for benevolence and
mercy!
No, I cannot say that I am surprised at the course of
that Legislature. I knew its former constituents; many
of them
personally
, and all of them by character. This last
act is only another exemplification of their moral cowardice
and want of
stamina
. They always
did
maintain that the
sovereignty intrusted to them by the people, should ever be
thrown back to the people; and were ready to do what
people
or party wished,
right
or
wrong!
Now they have only
essayed to please sovereigns of opposite sentiments, and, on
the principle of the honest fellow who prayed both ways at
once, being, as he said, uncertain into whose hands he
might fall. Public opinion is their god; and hence, if a
jury say
hang
, then
hanging
is justice; but if they say
imprison
,
then
imprisonment
is justice! Yes, they have given
the world the highest lesson of adroit and irresponsible and
all-pleasing legislation! and yet no wonder, for they have
practised long enough to be perfect.
But tell me, dominie, if hereafter crime diminish out
there, to what will it be owing? Will it be to the fear of
imprisonment, or of death? How is a doubtful sentence to
serve as the experiment? And will the difficulty in
empannelling
a jury to try a murderer be increased or
diminished
,
by allowing the jury to say, in addition to guilty or
not guilty, whether the criminal shall die, or be
incarcerated
?
And will juries of opposite conscientious views be
any more likely to agree than before?
Other anti-chokers are the milk, and cream too, of all
humanity; but these backwoods sages are the blue milk
philanthropistssickly moralists, who live on the fetid
breath of mere opinion, and to whom nothing is so important
as a seat in the House. If legislators always represent
the independence and patriotism and wisdom of our country
alas for the scant patterns!
Yours ever,
R.
Carlton
.
LETTER XLIV.
Dear Charles
,You wrong me every way. I
do not
say that no good and pious men can be found in extreme
abolitionisms
,
and among the anti-death penalty advocates.
Good men are often mistaken, and may frequently be found
in bad company. But if a crane be entrapped with the
geese or snared in their net, it must of necesity get now
and then a rough handling around the neck.
Nor do I expect to be elected grand hang-master
general
,
any more than the meek Burleigh expects to be made
grand soup-master of the murderer's pap-house; where
Ethiopians shed their old coats and soon sport a new skin:
in other words, where all bloody villains are made into
saints by virtue of modern doctrines, and the sweet and
gentle moral suasion of imprisonment for life! If such do
shed an old hide, it is after the manner of venomous serpents,
which come forth in early summer, new on the outside, but
with the old nature within.
I am not moved by your appeal about the dreadful
consequences
of death to a murderer. For, if the life of a
wilful and malicious murderer is forfeited by a divine
command
,
and if the instinctive voice of unsophisticated nature
cries blood for blood, the consequences of that
murderer's
death belong to himself. If he perish beyond the
grave, it is his own act. But show, sir, if you can, why a
man may not, and cannot, make his peace with God, in six
weeks, as well as in six or sixty years?
Be it, first, as most of the anti-gallows men will probably
affirm, that the whole power of changing our hearts is our
own: then, why should not a man who knows assuredly that
he must die within a given number of months, why should
he not immediately change his heart and be ready? Or
put it, in the second place, on our ground, that a man needs
the divine aid to repent and believe; will not sincere and
earnest prayer gain that aid as well now as at any
subsequent
period? For my part, I have very little confidence
in the thorough evangelical penitence of pardoned
murderers
;
yet whatever their penitence be, it need not be delayed
a single hour.
It is more than probable, however, that many persons
are deluded, and secretly believe that, if a murderer shall
externally reform by the pressure of outward circumstances,
he will become somewhat entitled to the grace of penitence
and of faith; and, that many more believe that, when the
enormity of his crime is diminished by length of time, and
the
world
has in a measure forgotten that crime, all this
takes place in the
Divine mind
. There is a perpetual and
almost irresistible tendency in us, to make God altogether
such an one as ourselves; and we do, in spite of our
reason
and judgment, often detect our hearts thus feeling and
prompting our words and actions: thence, we are in danger
of supposing that with God virtue and vice, and praise and
blame, and reward and punishment, are matters of time,
and place, and circumstances, and that He is moved by
impulses
as we are. Because we, in length of time forget or
palliate the crime of the murderer, we suppose all is thus
measurably forgotten before God.
Why is it, however, that under the most favorable
circumstances
,
so very few criminals, after being years in
prison, ever become true Christians? How rarely even
honest men! I have had personal acquaintance with
several
such men, and they all were just as had, to say the
least, after their imprisonment as before. One that I
employed
in my family robbed me of whatever he could;
although
I treated him with great kindness, and appealed
continually
to his
honor
, and reminded him repeatedly of the
importance of redeeming his character from the stigma of
the jail. Is there any special reason for thinking that
murderers
shall of necessity be exceptions? Is there any thing
in the enormity of their crime so potent, that thought about
it, above all other crimes, shall change the assassin's heart?
that he shall go into prison a ferocious, blood-thirsty tiger,
and come out, or there be made, a meek and innocent lamb?
Is the villain, who has done one murder, for that special
reason, less likely to do another? Or if the power is not
resident in the nature of the crime to awaken the
repentance
of the soul, and to change its moral nature, is God so
moved by the baseness and enormity of the murderer that
He prefers (I speak most reverently) to convert that kind
of criminal rather than any other?
No! no! The wretch who has done one wilful murder,
either for hate or gold,
will
for that reason do a thousand.
He has tasted blood; and a strange taste for blood awakes
in his heart! he has deliberately cast out all of heaven that
may have remained in his heart, and all of hell has
entered
!
He may be unhappy, but he loves and cherishes the
hellish principle; it is his food! And when he is liberated,
or escapes from his dungeon, he comes forth a malignant
fiend, and like Freeman, the negro-demon, he will wash his
very soul in blood, and dance in triumph, flourishing his
accursed knife, amidst the gashed and gory victims of his
infernal hate!
It is more than probableit is certainthat
pseudo-philanthropy
,
in carrying out its absurd schemes, must end in
inflicting on the imprisoned the most inhuman and atrocious
tortures. Its tender mercy will become cruelty. Will a
murderer, in all coming ages, never again murder a keeper
a fellow prisoner? If so, then will meek and saintly
and sickly false philanthropy begin with its disgustful
twattle
:
Oh! you naughty man! do
reflect
on what you have
done! Goodness alive! how could you be so thoughtless as
to commit this second crimeand in the very sanctuary of
your penitence and reformation? What! in this
enlightened
age! the schoolmaster abroad in the land! locomotives
going at the rate of a mile a minute! and magnetic
telegraphs
in all directions!in spite of all, kill your keeper!
For shame! And then, like a certain naval officer in some
of Marryat's books, pseudo-philanthropy, warming itself
into a natural indignation, by indulging in rebuke, ends at
last with: You infernal rascal and most blood-thirsty
villain
,
if it were not contrary to our Christian principles, we
would hang you up like a dog! but, any how, take
that!
and
that!
I repeat again and again, Charles, that I do entirely
absolve
some ultra folks from all evil intention; but the cool
impertinence of many, and their very modest assumption of
all the benevolence, and philanthropy, and virtue, and
common
sense of the world, is enough to provoke a saint; and,
hence, we ordinary good men cannot be wholly unmoved.
It is often said that death has no terrors for very bad
men; that when bent on murder they will commit the
crime whatever be the penalty. Perhaps in sudden
quarrels
,
where persons are slain, it may be that homicide
occurs
without thought of consequences; and that neither
jails nor gallows can prevent such unpremeditated murders.
But it is not true that the fear of death will not prevent
cool and premeditated murder. It is the hope of escape by
flight, by concealment, by bribery, by want of testimony,
by breaking from jail, and in an hundred other modes,
which emboldens the assassin. If the death penalty was in
every case speedy and inevitable, deliberate and wilful
murder, from hate or avarice, or revenge of wounded honor
and pride, would be exceedingly rare.
Beauty, helplessness, innocence, remonstrance, and all
such things deter not the highwayman from robbery and
murder. Boldly rush upon him with a deadly weapon, and
the fear of death often puts him to flight in a moment.
Such men would infinitely rather be living dogs than dead
lions. And why this intense desire on the part of
condemned
criminals, and their nearest friends, to have the
punishment of death commuted for banishment or perpetual
imprisonment? And why do such criminals, when a
change of punishment is announced, why do they leap
almost
frantic with joy, and seem ready to lick the very dust
at your feet? Common sense understands whybut the
refined sense of sophistry can doubtless account for these
things on principles diametrically opposite.
Charles, granting that neither the fear of death, nor of
perpetual imprisonment, is any bar to the commission of
murder, where men's moral feelings, sensibilities, and
principles
are wholly blunted and lost by long habits of
wickedness
,
is there not remaining a great mass of society to be
affected by good laws and wholesome examples of severity?
It may be granted, that some men are beyond the reach of
all human means of prevention and cure; shall it be
concluded
that all men are in that state?and that because the
execution of one murderer deters not anotherwho is a
murderer already by the want of proper training, and
malicious
temper,the execution will have no salutary and
preventive influence on the better, or the less bad?
Judging from my own feelings and reflections at an
execution
,
and from what I observed of other spectators at the
time, and from the remarks afterwards made in my
hearing
,
I must ever believeunless human nature suddenly
and wholly changesthat executions,
even in public
, do awe
down the soul, and make one shudder at the possibility of
committing such a crime as would make his life a just
forfeit
to the laws. Never was I so impressed with the value
of human life, as when I saw in the solemnity of that
execution
for a wilful murder, how high God and Nature
estimate
our blood, in thus requiring it at our brother's hand.
If the awful nature of that unnatural crime was
constantly
inculcated by prompt visitations of blood for blood,
on the head of the wilful murderer, the moral sense of the
community would not become so debased that we come at
length to think with David Hume, that suicide or murder
merely diverts a little red fluid from its ordinary channel!
No!we should, on the contrary, feel that the wilful and
deliberate murderer is an unholy apostate that most
impiously
dares put his accursed foot on the image of his Maker!
and, therefore, that he ought to die! We should feel that
any other punishment was a presumptuous insult to the
Governor of the world, who allows no expediency to
palliate
,
much less excuse, a departure from his clearly expressed
and positive laws.
That punishment is sometimes disciplinary and
corrective
,
is admitted; but that it is often intended to be utterly
destructive, is evident. The Bible is full on this point. The
daily and hourly providence of God in the government of the
world is full. And even corrective punishment derives its
efficacy from the premonition thus given, of a punishment
that is final, destructive, and not disciplinaryit is always
a foretaste of what irremediable evil must come, unless we
reform. When a man is past reform, or when he commits
certain crimes, marking, as an index point, the state of moral
turpitude, that almost uniformly precludes his honest
repentance
,
then comes the doom, of which previous chastisement
was the type. As to this life, deliberate and wilful murder
is a crime, which God says is beyond the efficacy of
ordinary
corrective inflictions (and all experience corroborates
this fact)and, therefore, such murder merits a destructive
punishment; and that punishment is death.
The instinctive voice of nature will arm every man with
deadly weapons, when the government of a country basely
abandons his defence, and endeavors vainly to reform those
that it should destroy. When and how communities may
and should throw themselves back upon natural rights, and
redress their own wrongs, is a nice question; but certain is
it, that all falsely merciful principles, if pseudo-philanthropy
shall prevail, must tend to provoke revolutionary movements.
Nor does it matter under what pretexts legislators and
judges and juries habitually acquit criminals; or change
the death penalty for imprisonment; or pardon entirely;
a state of insane affections, will at length arise in the
community, and violent fits of madness coming upon the
avengers of blood, homicides and wilful murderers all alike,
without the mockery of trial, will instantly paylife for
life.
I know mawkish and effeminate and affected mildness
says, Oh, I
guess
not! Butwhy, Charles, we feel
indignation
now!and after all the contemptible flummery,
with which some would soothe and coax, and whine us into
their
mercywe feel there might be times when we might
become members of a lynch-law-club!
Charles!and mark it!justice is not mercy, nor is it
love. It is separately and distinctly Justice, and nothing
more nor less, nor any thing else. It
may
, indeed, be
merciful
to be just, but it can
never
be merciful to be unjust.
Justice has its own peculiar and appropriate claims; and
these claims must ever be regarded and met, or justice is
outraged. Any other view will destroy the perfection of
God; and He cannot then have the love and adoration of
the universe. Error here lays of necessity the foundation
for all false schemes of punishment, present or future; and
hence Universalists, and every cognate infidelity, cry from
their hundred mouths, away with the death penalty!
Still we hold on, and sing back,
Justitia fiat!
Let us, then, Charles, with the old fashioned
philanthropists
,
uphold the gallows; whether the oily tongues of
puling smoothfacedness say, we are fit for hangmenor
even, as is likely meant,fit to be hanged.
Yours ever,
R.
Carlton
.
LETTER XLV.
Dear Charles
,Yes I am, indeed, grieved; but I am
not surprised to hear that our old acquaintance, Selden, has
become an inebriate!
You think it passing strange this should be, in
circumstances
like his;at the head of his profession;with an
easy fortune;in the midst of a lovely family;and after
having been for long years a model of sobriety and virtue;
and his sudden inebriety without seeming temptation!
Some of your townsmen suppose his fall arose from
refusal to take the pledge. No, no! Charles, his fall
belonged
to his new view. He had reached that most terrific
point in life, whence the world, in its essential nothingness,
its colorless nakedness, its insipid staleness, is clearly
perceived
,
as if one saw into its intrinsic emptiness with the
eyes of his very soul:an hour fraught with infinite peril
to a certain class of intellectual men!
Occasional glimpses of the world's vanity are caught
through various loopholes and slight rendings in the screen
of hope and fancy; but, in early manhood we can shut our
eyes, and, retiring to a more secure part of the gauzy and
brilliant and magnificent concealment, can hug ourselves
into comfort, as one does in his cushioned seat, near the
winter hearth, while tempestuous winds are raging without.
As we advance towards the middle life, however, the
curtain lifts itself by degrees from around us, and, sooner or
later, suddenly vanishes for ever! Woe,
then
, to the man
who has built an eternity of hope and joy on the baseless
vision! That moment is the crisis of his destiny!
To such a man are but few alternatives; all of them
desperate
,
save one,and that only alternative the natural
heart hates. The man must contrive to become wholly
absorbed
again in what is seen and felt to be essential vanity
and hideous deformity; or he must betake himself to
drunkenness
and dissipation; or he must commit suicide; or he
must honestly repent of his sins, and at once and for ever and
totally abandon the world as a chief good, trample it under
his feet, and set his affections on things above.
Charles, I repeat,that to some men of certain
intellectual
habits and peculiar tempers, the hour of full and clear
perception of the absolute and essential emptiness in life, is
an hour on which hangs heaven or hell! If such men will
not then choose heaven, they
must
either stifle reflection and
deaden conscience, or
die
die, either the lingering death of
drunkenness, or the instant death of what is commonly called
suicide! Most prefer,and it is a
choice
and not an
accident
,most
prefer the lingering death; not a few, the
immediate
suicide! Hence, Charles, the headlong, reckless
worldliness and dissipation of thesehence the sudden and
hopeless intemperancehence the alarming and seemingly
unaccountable self-murder!
Only the short-sighted and the inexperienced stand
amazed
,
however, and say, Why all this? such and such
persons
were in the midst of honors, and wealth, and
usefulness
,
and happinessfor, these very circumstances, so far
from staying the crisis, only brought it on. It is the
hopeless
,
irremediable, essential and disgustful vanity of these
very things, that sickens the deep soul even unto death!
They can no more rejoice in them than we can long after, and
kiss, and eagerly swallow a hateful and loathsome medicine!
They can no more draw near, than we can to the picture of
food, or of fire, when we are perishing with hunger and cold!
We inwardly curse all as demoniacal insults and mockeries!
9
And
would
you say to the tempted and wounded spirit,
Sign the Pledge? Gopoint your finger, earth-worm,
against the tempest, and say to the warring elements, Peace,
be still! Gobid the angry waves of the wrathful ocean
to be calm! Charlesdear Charles!I tell you(and it is
the word of one that
has a right
to speak)I solemnly tell
you, that, to the anguished, melancholy soul, weighed down,
oh! by what mountain pressure of unspeakable woe, and
tossed by its frightful tumults, and raging with the fires of
an inward hellI solemnly tell you, that this advice, well
meant as it may be, is
a most pitiful mockery!
Listen to me,
Charles:our poor friend Selden must either
drink
or die;
or he
must
, in all the religious sense of the term, choose God
for his portion.
Charles, waste not
his
precious time by pointing our dear
friend to the temperance pledge. Does
he
, do you think,
need information about the fatal consequences of drinking?
Is
he
to be affected by the common-place about the force of
example, and the comeliness of sobriety? I tell you,
he is
drinking to prevent suicide!
Take from Selden, just now, his
intoxicating cupand unless you can almost instantly give
him the Christian's hope and joyhe will die by his own
hand! He is now committing the crimeslowly indeed
but knowingly and deliberately!he has seen the frightful
vision of blank nothingness in all the things of earth, and
with a terrified soul he is hiding away!
Oh! my friend, point him to the cross! Urge him to
prayer! Pour upon his tumultuating and deeply-wounded
spirit the oil and wine of our heavenly religion! Throw
upon his sight the ineffable beauties, and unchanging
excellence
,
of that immortality which the Son of God revealed!
Show him that city whose foundation is eternal and whose
maker and builder is God! Ifoh!
if
you can!help him
to be reconciled to our Heavenly Father!and in that
moment
he will dash to the earth the maddening, accursed,
damning bowl! Let him be pervaded with the ravishments
of
that
lifeand
this
will fade away!will vanish for ever!
he will heed it nothe will know it not!
Without this, you may have, possibly, a temporary success.
As long as his mind is diverted from reflectionand his eyes
shut from seeingand his ears from hearing,Vanity
of vanitiesvanity of vanitiesall is vanity,stamped
indelibly upon all the lying forms of earthly glory and
beauty
,
and crying out in all pervading tones of darkest
melancholy
with every passing breeze,Selden may refrain. But,
Charles, when, like the horrible fits of hydrophobia returning
after the short calm produced by medicines having power to
retard but not to cure; when the unutterable reality comes
again and again, as it will to the sober;then Selden, as
many others, if unreconciled to God,
must
drink or die!
Alas! how often the calm ones pass some inebriate of
this sort and say, Wretched man, why did he not sign the
pledge? Could he not sit down and think of his talents
and honorsand wealthand familyand happinessand
exampleand do as we have donerefrain from drinking?
Hear me, ye inexperienced and untempted;  the man
did
think of all these things!and at the thought, and with
the thought, and
because
of the thought, sprung up that
howling and demon tempest!and that hell-flame was
kindled
,
which could not be hushed and quenched at your
bidding
nor at his! But one voice only in the universe can
then speak peace!and if he
will not
hear that voice,and
distinct enough it is amidst that raging hell,the man must
drink or die!
Pass not such scornfully, worldly wise manchild of
pleasureson of ambitionstrong now in resolution never
so assailedfull of the pride of life and the buoyancy of hope
and freshness of fancyO thou, who boastest of honor,
and adherest to the pledge!for, when that hour of
unimaginable
and indescribable horror of darkness comesfaith
in Jesus Christ will save thee from the drunkard's grave, but
the pledgenever!
Charles, I do know, that this philosophy of intemperance
and madness and suicide, as to many noble and generous and
honorable persons,
is
true. I know it from observation, and
if you must have itfrom experience. Oh! friend!I
have stood, and suddenly as if carried by the spirit, upon
a high point, naked, bleak, cheerless, and isolated from all
beings but God and my soul;and thence have I, with
strangely increased power of sight, looked forth upon the
whole world revealed!and, I do declare unto you, its whole
glory and grandeur and power and wealth were as
intrinsically
worthless as the dust of a balance! All had no more
force to move the desires of my soul than the veriest straw
of vanity or bubble of emptiness that floats in the air or on
the water!yes! and, oh! the concentrated bitterness of that
hour!I felt,
if this is my all
, then be it all
accursed!
I
renounce it!I abhor it!I shudder at it!I flee from it!
Oh! my God! be reconciled to mereconcile my soul
to thee! Give me a
good!
Give me thyself! Let me
see and understand and value thy glory! Let me, by
grace, come into some lowest and humblest place in
that
cityor I
must
even now
die!
Death is preferable to this
nature
cannot
CANNOT endure this!
Charles, had not some faint hope of winning Christ and
heaven arisen!had not some sweet dawn of that world
been cast into my horror-stricken soul!had not a thrill of a
secret and strange emotion stirred, like the thrill of a
heavenly
music in my heart!had not something akin to the
ravishment of the ineffable come!I must have died, or my
intellect must have been wrecked for ever!
Mourn for those inebriates, Charlesthrow your arms
around their necks, and pour tears of piteous compassion on
their cheeksthey have seen that sight! Tell them, there
is hope and happiness and joy and peace and honor and
wealth, and all infinitely transcending what, in that sudden
revelation, vanished for ever!but tell them all this belongs to
that
life, and not to
this!
Tell, them, it is God's Spirit that
has made this revelation to their secret souls, to drive them
into Heaven! It is a revelation of mercy, and not of wrath.
Charles, I
do
know why some comparatively virtuous
persons become on a sudden inebriates; why some die by
their own hands; and why others become the inmates of a
mad-house! And I
do
know that such must be pointed by
devout
Christians, not to the Temperance pledge, but to the
Cross!
Yours ever,
R. Carlton
.
LETTER XLVI.
Dear Charles
,It may be that some true Christians,
in fits of insanity, have died by their own act. We know
that often devout and excellent persons have departed this
life with melancholy and yet unfounded forebodings of evil
to come; but I am altogether sure that so far from religion
causing melancholy, it is the best, and with some men, the
only cure of melancholy.
There is a melancholy mainly owing to physical causes,
and which may be removed by removing its natural cause,
by medicine or regimen. This species of melancholy,
whether regarded as the primary or secondary disease,
inclines
,
nay, indeed, forces us to look at religion, as at all
other things, through colored and distorted mediums. Hence
many will perversely extract fresh misery from what, if
rightly understood, would even for disordered nerves become
the greatest alleviation, if not entire cure.
Unlike the bee, which extracts honey from deadly plants,
physical melancholy draws poison and bitterness from
health-giving
sweetness.
But, Charles, there is a melancholy arising from moral
causes. That melancholy in some cases cannot be healed
or eradicated except by moral means,except the mind
can be satisfied that it has a peace and quietude based upon
a rock.
This kind of melancholy tends, indeed, to produce
physical
disorder, and that disorder will induce physical
melancholy
.
The evil is continually aggravated, unless the
originating
cause be removed. It is wholly in vain often to use
medicines, or take journeys, or seek pleasant company, or to
try any modified dissipation, or frequent scenes of mere
amusement; by these very medicines and alleviations, moral
melancholy will be rapidly increased, and become at length
so insupportable as to end in madness or suicide, or more
frequently in drunkenness. All such cures are a mockery.
The sick and wounded soul, stretched night and day on a
rack of indescribable torture, is relieved by such matters, as
a poor victim would be amused and soothed by witnessing
a game of jack-straws, as he writhed upon a cross!
My own deep and abiding conviction is, that the moral
melancholyif so we may distinguish it from melancholy
arising solely from mere physical causesthe moral
melancholy
,
in all its many degrees of intensity, is one of the
ordinary
means which the Divine Spirit employs to convert our
souls from earth to heaven. It ought, therefore, ever to be
regarded as a visitation of great mercy. So it would prove,
if men would go whither that melancholy is sent to drive
themto the religion of Jesus Christ.
That, Charles, is the rock, and the only rock, in this wide
universe, on which the agitated and gloomy sould can
securely
standthere and there only can the melancholy rest.
And if the melancholy man once gets there, he will assuredly
find a peace the world
cannot
give, and which it cannot
no, most truly and emphatically
cannot
take away!
Standing
there, cloud after cloud will disperse and pass away;
and the very world, which before seemed so unspeakably
frightful, will become invested with strange beauty and glory.
And now with his selfishness removed, and with a new
motive and desire implanted, the renovated man will
cheerfully
descend to his worldly duties; not for the purpose of
enjoying pleasure, or indulging ambition, or getting wealth
and power;not to make himself the centre and to
aggregate
all of possible earthly good around his person and seat,
and to become a god to himself and to fit up the earth as a
heaven;but simply and mainly to please a Heavenly
Father, as a loving and revereful son to do a father's will!
This miraculously renovated man will exemplify in the best
and highest possible sense, the change beautifully figured in
the tablet of Cebes; and he will have a most wonderful and
joyous perception of that promise, even fulfilled to the very
letter, when we believe it and obediently act according to it,
Seek first the kingdom of heaven, and all these things shall
be added unto you! Yes, yes, the man feels that he now
has
the worldand riches, and fathers, and mothers, and
brothers, and sisters, a thousand-fold! By throwing away
the world he has found itby resolutely turning
heavenward
,
he has got heaven, and with it the universe!
Nor shall the
moral
melancholy return, except so far as
the man approximates again his former thoughts and ways,
and forgets God. This man shall be every day and every hour
more and more satisfied that it is not religion, but the want
of religion, which makes men wretched and melancholy.
The gay worldit is, alas! too truewill make light of all
this; the worldly wise will smile with contemptuous pity;
the infidel will hug himself into self-complacent and falsely
philosophic thought of exemption from cynical priestcraft
and puritanism and superstitions; the epicurean will
flourish
his glass and cry, Let us eat and drink, for to-morrow
we die:but, oh! ye dear brothers! whose souls are
dark and joyless, and who choose strangling and death rather
than life, let one who has been far down into the abyss of the
dark waters; who has struggled in the deep pit and its miry
clay; who cared not to live, and yet feared to die; oh!
brothers, let that one, with the arms of a true pity around
your neck, and with a soul of profoundest sympathy
clinging
to yours, let him, with streaming eyes and voice of
tenderest
love, exhort you to try
this
remedy for the wounded
spirit!
Brothers!brothers!for your sakes, and for Christ's
sake, let me be called a fool and a fanaticbut I
do
know
there is balm in Gilead, to heal and soothe, and a
peace the Son of God can give, and does give; and that
the change in the inmost spirit is as the change from the
woes of damnation to the joys of paradise! And all these
are words of truth and soberness; and with the gushings
of a full and honest soul the redeemed one would thus win
you from melancholy to joy!
But know, brothers, that this special mercy of God in
moving upon the dark and troubled waters, by sending this
moral melancholy into our bosoms, is very near to a special
and remediless danger! I shudderbut it is the last appeal!
To those that hear, it is the voice of thunder! To those
that see, it is the flash of keenest lightning! As came a
voice to the Apostle Paul, unheard by the attendants, who
were struck down by that terrifying brightness above the
light of the sun, so is the voice of the Lord God Almighty
loud, clear, articulate, awful in our melancholy souls, saying,
not
in wrath, but in infinite tenderness and love, Son, give
me
thine heart!
Beware!oh! by all that is measureless in the weal or
woe of eternity!by that agony and bloody sweat of the
Lamb of God who taketh away the sin of the world!by that
wrath of the Holy One that when kindled burneth to the
lowest hell!Beware! If we heed not this last invitation
and rebuke!if we deliberately refuse Him
so
speaking to
us from heaven!if in the midst of a joyless, rayless,
hopeless
melancholy, we yet despise His blood-bought hope
and joy and peace!
that
, oh! brothers, is akin to a wilful
and deliberate rejection of mercy!a trampling that blood!
* * * * * * * And is it wonderful if
then
we
should be rejected?or given over to believe a lie?or
abandoned to Satan?or left to drunkenness?or to die by
our own act?
Melancholy ones!
you
shall never!no! never! find
peace again but with the Son of God! The crisis of
your
changeless destiny is comeheaven or hell!
In this way, dear Charles, would I exhort and weep over
Selden and all others in his alarming state. Read him my
letters, and read with tears in your eyes.
Yours ever,
R. Charlton
.
LETTER XLVII.
Dear Charles
,What that unpardonable sin mentioned
by our Saviour is, may be difficult, perhaps, to ascertain.
And it is not my present intention to inquire; but there is
reason to fear that in some cases (it may be in all) a crisis
occurs when our eternal destiny is fixed irretrievably.
A time comes when the long-grieved and wilfully insulted
God says, Let him alone! And I do mean, Charles, to
express by these remarks, my own conviction that men do
often, with a peculiar wilfulness and deliberation,
choose
to
turn away from God, from hope, from heaven!
There is a class of persons learned, tasteful, refined, free
from gross and presumptuous external sin, and encompassed
by all circumstances combining to make this a terrestrial
paradise, who, by the very gifts of God showered around in
exuberant abundance, instead of being won to penitence,
gratitude and devotion, are unhappily led to the worship of
the creature and not of the Creator. To them, vain all
ordinary
argument to convict of folly, impiety and danger;
for while the coloring of beauty and glory and the form of
excellence cover and invest life, these persons
will
love the
world and the things of the world.
To these comes, in mercy, God's last voicethe voice of
the rod. He speaks in a severe afflictionthe severest ever
sent; the severest that can be endured in this lifethe moral
melancholy! If that failsand it may!there comes no
more His voice in lovethe next voice is that of doom!
Combined with the moral melancholy, either preceding
as partial cause or following as effect, is usually found
physical
or nervous melancholy. Hence, with the moral means
of cure, let the best physical remedies and alleviations be
promptly and perseveringly tried; but, Charles, the
moral
melancholy cannot be eradicated except by spiritual means
. It
is a divine messenger sent in special mercy to drive men to
the cross! And the blood of its sacrifice is the only remedy
appointed for that healing. And that spiritual remedy will,
almost in an instant, banish the melancholy attributable to
moral causes, and greatly alleviate and aid in the entire cure
of what may be referred to physical causes. The causes of
many bodily ailings is a morbid mind; and many a wise
and benevolent physician has healed the body by
administering
to the spirit.
A physical melancholy is not unfrequently aggravated by
mistake and misconception of religion and its duties,
especially
when penances, and ceremonies, and forms are
recommended
,
or are, by previous education, deemed religion; but
if these errors are detected or avoided, and the true interior
nature of spiritual religion is clearly perceived and honestly
approved, religion is to melancholy persons the surest cure,
the sweetest cordial, and most soothing and invigorating
restorative
.
Moral melancholy arises from the distinct perception of
the world's ineffable vanity, contemplated as the summum
bonum, and while yet the carnal heart utterly hates holiness!
To
feel
that joy in this life, in the things of earth, can
never
be in the heart againand to
feel
no taste for the joys
of that other life!to awake from delusion and be keenly
sensible to the dark emptiness!to taste the wormwood and
the gall in the drained cup!to hunger and thirst, and yet to
know these appetites shall never be satisfied!to
wish
to love,
and still feel the object to be worthless and base; and amidst
all this disappointment to turn with shuddering dread and
death-like apathy, aye, and secret hate, from the spiritual
9*
and heavenly now offering itself to our watchful, sensitive
soul, as the only good in the universe!that, Charles,
creates
the moral melancholy, and renders the soul dark as the
very shades of death!
Here is the crisis! And as men now voluntarily disregard
or obey this special, merciful, and final voice of the Holy
Ghost, so is their eternal state!
Of infinite moment, then, that persons
thus
melancholy
betake themselves to immediate, persevering, fervent,
effectual
prayera prayer for such change in the inmost core
of the carnal heart, as that the only remedy for its sadness
may be willingly and instantly received. If these persons
will
not, woe is almost inevitable; and if abandoned, it is
not to me the least wonderful that drunkenness, madness,
suicide
follow!
To myself, Charles, the morally melancholy man is an
object of intense interest; for, having been in that furnace,
I
see
in his spirit an awful battle between light and
darkness
!
His soul is an arena, where heaven and hell are
struggling for victory! And he, at times, is as keenly pierced
as if he felt a burning arrow, a fiery dart in his breast!
I well know if this man
will
, in his utter and hopeless
despair
,
cry to the Mighty OneI well know that war of
indescribable
horror and great fight of afflictions shall
cease!the tumultuating waves of the turbid and bitter
waters shall subside into calm!the harsh winds of the
howling
tempest die away into the hush of peace; and the
sereneness
of an almost cloudless sky smile so as to thrill the
whole soul with sweet and ineffable joys!
Son of God! to the world thou art as a root out of the
dry ground, and without form and comeliness! But to the
melancholy soul, turning to thy cross for healing, thou art,
O Christ! in very deed, the chief among ten thousand, and
one altogether lovely! Saviour! that man believes not
onlyhe
experiences
that thou art the Lamb of God that
takest away the sins of the world! and
knows
, in his soul,
that thou didst come down from the Father, and didst thence
bring life and immortality to light! He may fail to convince
others; but he is a witness unto himself! Elder Brother!
first born among many brethren! the ransomed one would
fain, like the Magdalene, weep tears of penitence and love
upon thy sacred feet! He understands how soul, body and
spirit, are all thine; and he humbly prays for power to lay
all on thy altara reasonable sacrificea joyous service!
He knows there
is
meaning in the song of the blood-bought,
Worthy the Lamb!
Yours ever,
R. Charlton
.
LETTER XLVIII.
Dear Charles
,You are pleased to say that such
thoughts ought to be preached. Were the sacred desk my
station, as it is yours, Charles, then would I strive to preach
as I write; but why may not private Christians
write
and
talk
preaching, while the clergy
preach
preaching?
Our informal words might not have the dignity and
stateliness
of set-discourses; yet, for that very reason, they
might, perhaps, attract and rivet attention to solemn thought,
in many cases, where men would listen to a sermon as a
matter of mere taste and custom, or merely to pass the hour.
It is indeed, and beyond all doubt, by the foolishness of
preaching good is generally done morally and spiritually;
but preaching is too commonly regarded by the worldly
sort as a species of
trade;
and the good accomplished by it
comes to be blended in their thoughts with a profession and a
day. Could men, however, be caused to see and to feel that
goodness is a principle and not a mere result, and that, like a
living stream, it should ever flow from a perennial fountain;
and hence that all true believers love to be bound, and feel
that obligation a precious privilege, in every possible way to
do good, then would much erroneous sentiment and much
prejudice be removed from men's bosoms.
Were it in my power, Charles, (but it is in no human
power,)were it in my power, by any art or contrivance,
to show our neighbors the full meaning, or the meaning
as far as careful Christians do often perceive, and which is
conveyed to their minds in such scriptural sayings as these,
the Lord's freemen, the glorious liberty of the sons of
God; oh! my friend, it could not fail so to captivate and
delight them. If it did not make them converts, it would
make them cease wondering why true Christians should
joyfully do, in the week, what the preacher shows on the
Sabbath to be their duty.
Why, Charles, it is, strictly, an honor, a privilege, a
liberty, a delight, a favor to serve God! Duty, indeed, it
is; and good men too often sink down to the mere
dutypoint
in their feelings; yet often do they rise so far above
that point, as to forget the obligation, and to glory and
rejoice
in the privilege. And well may one, enriched and
blessed with such a feeling, rejoice with joy unspeakable
and full of glory! He then has the deep assurance, and
the rich foretaste of heaven. He feels and knows that
power
is given him to be a son of God! All the glowing words
of devout men on this topic, and what usually passes for
extravagance, and not infrequently for raging fanaticism, are,
after all, really tame and spiritless compared with the truth!
It is wholly impossible here for words to show the truth: that
truth is a revelation to each man's spiritual perception.
When any one, even in a small degree, appreciates that
truth, he exclaims in his wondering soul: What manner
of love is this, that
we
should be called the
sons
of God!
I am well aware the following remark cannot be
appreciated
by worldly men, and that it may provoke a sneer,
yet it is soberly and truly said now: a genuine Christian
is intrinsically (by a divine birth) a person of great value
and dignity. And this is said not figuratively, not by way
of contrast and comparison, not to make the most of the
case, but simply because the remark is truth. A real
Christian is in a special sense a son of God. Thus
constituted
,
he is transformed from baseness to excellence; and
that in very many points of view. He is as truly a new
creature as if formed again, and coming into life by a new
birth. He differs from his former self as really and as
widely as opposites on the two sides of an impassable gulf!
Here is a most amazing difference: he
does
habitually, and
with heartfelt delight, strive in all his thoughts and words
and actions to please God! He feels that his imperfect
love and obedience are an acceptable sacrifice of sweet
savor
,
which he offers by the Spirit, through the Son, to the
Father. This is part of his present heaven, and not to do
it, would be part of his present hell.
Worldly men do, indeed, affect independence. They are
comparatively more and less moral, in a loose sense of the
term; but so long as they serve not God, they are
intrinsically
worthless and base. This is not improper language,
nor to be compared in strength with Scriptural language,
which represents men, when unrenewed, as slaves of sin
as children of Satan.
All argument evincive of this truth, even if believed,
cannot make men love the truth. Indeed, the natural heart
so rises in proud and scornful and bitter hatred, that a man,
just in proportion to his logical success in this argument,
becomes the object of a deep and intense contempt. Here is
the precise place where the carnal heart is enmity against
God; is not reconciled to his law, and neither indeed
can
be.
Usually, however, all effort to
prove
here is regarded
as sophistry; and he that reasons of righteousness, and
temperance, and a judgment to come, is commonly deemed
a narrow-minded philosopher, filled with one strange idea!
He is thought to be a setter forth of strange gods! At all
events, he is esteemed a mere partisan, who for pay or for
friendship is doing all he can for his sect or party. And
from these things no talents, nor learning, nor suavity, nor
benevolence, nor personal nor official dignity
can
secure
him. He must deliberately make up his mind always to be
thought, and not rarely called, for Christ's sake, a fool!
Charles, while our most holy religion is
not
as
Hume to the contrary sneeringly affirmsis
not
founded
on faith in opposition to reason, still a spiritual capacity is
indispensable to the perception, and a spiritual taste to the
enjoyment of spiritual truths. And this perception is
accompanied
by feelings and emotions new, distinct, real. In
all this is felt that internal conviction of the truth, which
cannot, by mere argument, be wrought in the carnal or
worldly mind.
Hence the genuine Christian knows and feels that the
service of the regenerate is freedom, and that of the
unregenerate
,
slavery. This
feeling
is in nothing more
unnatural
or unphilosophic than any other feeling consequent
upon true perceptions. Good men do, therefore,
unaffectedly
and naturally loathe and abominate and stand amazed
at their former life; and they rejoice in, and prefer, their
new course. At times these persons do also feel so happy
in the service of God, as to find all expressions of the most
fervid minds inadequate to state the truth.
In every respect there is difference, and in most, direct
opposition between the men of earth and the men of heaven:
the one are slaves, the other freemen. Should a person say
I
know
I live to please and serve God, and
do
have delight
in his service, that man, if his views are intelligent of the
nature and requirement of that service, that man is a
Christian
.
Should he further ask what is the service required,
I answer, in the words of holy writ:
Whatsoever
you do,
do all for the glory of God. For I do most stoutly
maintain
that in all our thoughts, and words, and actions, in all
our business throughout the day, there ever is, in a good
man's spirit, some reference, direct or indirect, to God:
God
is
in
all
his thoughts. And I further maintain, that
a good man perceives such entire devotion and
self-consecration
to be a most reasonable service, while a bad man
secretly abhors it as an intolerable burden.
If such hints in any of my letters, Charles, can aid in
constructing your sermons, use them; it will not be
plagiarism
.
Yours ever,
R.
Carlton
.
LETTER XLIX.
Dear Charles
,It is, indeed, a mistake made by many
good men, and especially by young men, that God can be
served only in religious ways. Hence the tendency
towards
the pulpit, and towards the life of a missionary.
Beyond all doubt, God is served, and specially served in
these ways; and happy are they who are chosen by Him
for such special duties. But it seems not only an error, it
is a great and
pernicious
error, to undervalue or overlook
our secular duties. Many, and it is to be feared very
many, think, for they act as if they so thought, that God
cannot be glorified except we do it in religious and saered
acts. How a minister of the gospel, or a missionary, or a
Sabbath
school teacher, can do all for the glory of God, is,
they imagine, plain enough; but they do not see how we
can glorify God in our secular pursuits. In some minds,
therefore, if services are not directly sacred and officially
religious, there are strong tendencies towards the cloister
or the hermitage. They think all secular things are more
or less inconsistent with a life of piety, and with the glory
of God; and hence, if they cannot have a sacred
employment
,
they will invent one for themselves.
It is the case with some, that mere mistake disaffects
them towards secular duties; with not a few there is
also
positive discontent, and they are really too proud and
ambitious to glorify God in subordinate stations. Rather
than be diligent in business and fervent in spirit, loving
God, and doing good unto all men as they have
opportunity
,
if they cannot be preachers and missionaries, they
will be pillar saints, and stand idle for half a century on
the top of a post.
And not a few prefer being sacred clams or oysters,
encased
in some monastic shell, and lying dormant in
inglorious
and stupid sanctity.
Charles, it is possible, however, to glorify God in all we
do, and to walk closely with God in all the lawful duties of
a secular life. If this point be truly perceived, ordinary
Christians may have a daily happiness and peace, infinitely
transcending any to be found in deserting our civil and
domestic
duties, under a silly pretence of perpetual prayer,
with or without beads.
According to the theory of some, the immense majority
of men are shut out from all possibility of serving God every
hour. The mass may, indeed, serve him at their hours of
devotion; or when bestowing alms, or building a church, or
supporting the ministry; but to serve Him all the time, and
in every act and work, is deemed possible only for selected
classes, whose sole employment is religion.
This is a very narrow and mistaken, and, indeed, a very
mischievous view of the case.
Here, be assured, is the truth. Good men are the sons
of God. And, in this world, the Heavenly Father has
appointed
each child his duties. To some, are subordinate
stations
;
to some, inferior ones, and to others, intermediate.
These have secular employments; those, sacred ones.
Among the ordinary secular employments are all
mechanical
trades, merchandise, farming, and all the professions.
Here, also, may be ranked the fine arts; for, it is a very
prejudiced mind that would deny the lawfulness and utility
of the fine arts, whether as a recreation or an employment.
In short, here belong all and every art, pursuit, profession,
employment and enterprise, that is honest and of good
report
.
Now, let a man realize that he is bought with a price,
and is one of the peculiar people zealous of good works;
and let him feel that he belongs to Christ, soul, body and
spirit; and let him be in the daily, or rather hourly and
uninterrupted habit of trying to please God, and he shall
soon discover a secret. He shall find how easy and
delightful
it is to do
every
thing for the glory of God. These
words are often in our mouth, Charles, when not in our
hearts; but the secret of the Lord, in this, as well as in
all other spiritual matters, is with those that fear Him.
A man will come to learn that God, as a Father, is present
with him; that every action is under His inspectionis,
indeed
,
done directly to God and not to men; and that it is
done for God, not as to a task-master, an austere man, but
to a wise, benevolent, kind, indulgent, loving Father. He
will come to feel that there are no
accidents
in his life or
business
.
He will know that his business prospers or declines,
increases or diminishes, as God pleases. He will be wholly
satisfied that customers, and payments, and salaries, and all
and every thing pertaining to his business, depend on God.
All this is entirely consistent with a man's industry, and
choice of means, and use of instruments, and with his
forethought
,
prudence, calmness, deliberation; and with a wise
watchfulness over changing circumstancesfor God has
taught the man of faith that while means have no intrinsic
efficiencythey have an appointed, a positive use; and the
man of faith joyfully and willingly uses the means, because
God says they
must
be used, and because thus God is pleased
and glorified. The good man, therefore, actually learns to
be content in any situation or employment. He is
comparatively
little affected and influenced by the
mere honor
and
re
spectability
of his employment. It is said, sometimes, that
an angel would be equally willing, at the command of the
Most High, to sweep a street or destroy a kingdom. This
is doubtless true. A good man does come to be very happy
and cheerful, in the lowest as well as the highest situation in
life.
The child of God regards men as his brethren. He
learns a very great secret here, too. He learns, in his
employment
,
to do them good; he takes lessons in loving his
neighbor as himself. He sees how all need the services of
the others, and that the services mutually and reciprocally
done, increase the comfort, and intelligence, and
improvement
,
and happiness of his fellows. How deplorable the
state of the world, if all arts, and sciences, and manufactures,
and commerce, and merchandise, and learning, suddenly
ceased! The child of God has learned the delightful secret
of exercising his art and using his employment, not for
self-aggrandizement
,
but for his neighbor's welfare. He would
continue in it, often, simply because it is a mite contributed
to the world's happiness.
Dear Charles! there is a nobility, a grandeur in a true
Christian's secret character, which this low and grovelling
world cannot understand, and at which, in its base
selfishness
,
it cannot but sneer.
Number One
, is their motto
and a very Satanic motto it is; a fit badge to be worn by his
slaves. God and my neighbor, is the Christian motto,
and none but the Lord's freemen can wear it, can wish
to wear it; it is high, we cannot attain unto it!
Let us apply these general remarks, Charles, to a special
case; and although such an illustration may make you
smile, perhaps it may notwithstanding do you good. I select
puposely from the inferior trades, lest reverence and dignity
might mistake me, and suppose that I deemed the Most High
a God of the Jews only, and not of the Gentiles also.
I select then, a shoemaker, or a tailor, or a butcher.
These Christian brethren may say, My heavenly Father
wishes me to aid in clothing and feeding men. Well, I am
determined to do it most faithfully and with benevolence.
He will give me my wages in the prices paid for my work.
True, I have not many customers, because God does not
design
I shall take care of any more of my neighbors. How
I do rejoice that there are larger tradesmen, who act on a
more extensive scale! Still, if I am faithful in the least,
perhaps my business will increase: and yet, if it does not, I
shall please and glorify God to the extent He designs.
The merchant may reason and believe and act in the
same way; and so may the farmer; and, in short, every one
engaged in employments that arise not to the dignity of the
purely intellectual. And how does this view of the case
still more highly exalt the profession of law, of medicine, of
teaching, of preaching! And what a preventive and a cure
for all jealousy, and envy, and slander, and ill-will! And
how would every member of Christ's spiritual body thus be
content with his station, if each considered himself as in his
allotted place! And how would all, acting from love to God
and love to man, constitute a grand, harmonious, beautiful
whole!
Yours ever,
R.
Carlton
.
LETTER L.
Dear Charles
,Of course I rejoice with you at the
completion of your New Church; but, alas! dominie!
what a narrow-minded Puritan I am becoming! I cannot
cordially approve your contemplated Fair.
Not that I am always wise; for, like the good old vicar
of Goldsmith, I do swim now and then with the flood. I
have eaten pound-cake, and swallowed oysters, and peeped
into funny little show-boxes filled with wax dolls, for the
good of poor orphans and weak churches; but still, I have
never, in imitation of the London alderman, who imbibed
turtle-soup by the ladle and danced at a charity-ballI have
neverat the religio-politico squeezes and jams, rubbed my
hands in the fatness of my worldly heart and thanked God
there were so many poor!
Friend Charles! expedients are hateful, where there is a
path of duty straight, open, plain. It is humiliating either
to take a bribe ourselves or offer one to others to do
justice
and love mercy! Piety is, forsooth, laced tight enough,
when she requires a piece of ginger-bread, or a stick of taffy,
or some saccharine confection, to relax her sympathies and
coax out her niggardly sixpences and coppers. Alas! there
is a fashionable piety, which after having thus doled out its
pittances, will, at the completion of its herculean labors of
benevolence, turn in and treat itself to a more special
jollification
,
and eat and drink, if not to the glory of God, yet
with a proud satisfaction that its former labors that way built
a church or bought an organ. However, this is the era of
great inventions. If we have machinery for praying, why
not a labor-saving method of eating and drinking to the
glory of God!
Eating goodies is not, indeed, always the fashionable
road; but buying trinkets and gewgaws, and making noisy
and gabbling bazars and places of rendezvous, do not hush
my qualms, and do away my secret scruples and misgivings.
Nay, even if all was strictly
honest
at a fairbut all is not
fair
even at a fairthere is no small quantum of whitish
mendacityhem!and not a little very clever humbugging
and usurial screwing! Yes, yes; the end, the
understanding
,
and all that! But lying is lying, all the world over, and
cheating is cheating. A holy cause needs no such ally, even
in fun.
A large number of folks, and very clever folks too, care
no more for the sacred or charitable object, than they do for
your humble servant, Charles. They crack it up as a
favorable
pretext or occasion for a little frolic, and good
fellowship
extra. Not a few tolerably good sort of people will
also uphold, in this way, doubtful men, places, and doings
why yes, they will fiddle and dance in a Sabbath concert,
for the benefit of a half-orphan society! Numbers will raffle
and draw lots for holy purposes, calling down an occasional
thunder from the
religious
press; as if an abuse of a trick,
however, and not as if the whole trick itself were an abuse!
Far from me any double-refined morality, such as
refusing
voluntary gifts from our worldly friends, generously
bestowed
for religious uses: but, Charles, I do most earnestly
contend that such gifts ought to be wholly voluntarythey
must not be
wormed
out by tortuous and torturing
expedients
.
On the other hand, let our worldly friends be
explicitly
and honestly told that money spent for our own sensual
gratification, although a
part
may find its way into a charity
box, is, in no good and legitimate sense, Charity.
A facetious, and, perhaps, rather malicious writer, once
sent forth an essay on milking the goats: now, it does seem
to me as much like that felicitous manipulation as possible,
when we, by trick and expedient, get at the cash snugly
hoarded in unwilling purses. At least it is akin to
udder-greasing
;
which, before the era of chemical agriculture
and scientific milking, was found promotive of more easy
flowing lacteal streams from obstinate dugs.
Many most excellent reasons of a worldly nature may
be urged in behalf of any moral or religious object for which
we desire donations; why, therefore, may not men be asked
and exhorted to give on these grounds, supposing spiritual
reasons are kept out of view? Neutral ground does not,
indeed, exist; but there is undoubtedly a
common
ground
where all may meet. And while worldly persons may give
for one proper reason, heavenly persons may give for that
and the spiritual reason also. Separate action is in few
things possible, and, indeed, not even benevolent, politic, or
desirable.
Why not appeal, therefore, to men's good judgment and
conscience, and, if you please, interest and policy? If our
spiritual schemes aid their temporal ones, why should they
not know the fact, and be asked to avail themselves, at a
small cost, of the advantage? Are worldly men necessarily
fools or children? Must they be tickled, and coaxed, and
flattered, and gulled? Charles, it cannot be that worldly
men think any the better of Christianity by these indirections
in the accomplishment of religious purposes: although many
may like sufficiently well the opportunity of a church fair,
for buying one sort of kisses and stealing others.
Come, dominie, try a charity-mart, and leave out the
girls!and write me, if you scraped together enough to pay
for your pulpit trimmings and new organ. Even oysters
done in three different styles, with the aid of chicken-salad,
charlotte-ruse, and all the other ruses, will not always open
Charity's knotted purses, unless all the luxuries and dainties
are administered by a rounded arm and jewelled fingers.
Bah!good easy man!the beaux care precious little for
your crimson and scarlet cushions, and grand choral organs
they come, you green-horn, to see the girls! Why I can
cushion every pulpit in the nation, and furnish organs, and
bass-viols for every choir, if you will place at my order all
the interesting young ladies of the country! Perhaps your
politic reverence may design to promote matrimony in your
congregationwell, that is legitimate; but then, why do you
not honestly say so?
Where an object for donations is not a moral or religious
one, but simply patriotic, for instance, I am comparatively
indifferent whether the money be raised by a tax direct or
indirect. Other things may be had in view besides the
ostensible
design; and gatherings at a fair for that purpose,
may be no more sinful or evil, than any other mere worldly
assembly. I cannot see, indeed, what praise is due to men
for patriotism or public spirit, who aid in erecting monuments
and the like, by what is left after their appetites and tastes
are gratified. It is admitted that here may mingle good and
bad motives and feelings, and that often men
must
have
attention
fixed to a noble purpose conceived by noble minds.
This speaks little, however, for a patriotism so dormant, and
a generosity so sluggish as to need the awakening expedient.
Could the names of the unselfish women who really build
certain monuments, be indestructibly wreathed around the
pinuacles,
that
would be right!but
never
, the names of men
who gave a penny and devoured a dollar!
Classic Greece and Imperial Rome would have scorned
our pitiful expedients.
Men
, in those days, asked not
women
to build temples and triumphal arches, by the avails of
embroidery
and confectioneryby the needle and the
patty-pan
!
That sublime invention belongs to Alleghania, and
shall immortalize the patriotism of Yankeedoonia for ever!
Yankee-doodle keep it up!Yankee-doodle-dandy!
I anticipate a
Caudling
from your reverence's wife, for
this scurrilous epistle; but I shall imitate the first Mrs.
Caudle's
husband, and snore in spite of it.
Yours ever,
R.
Carlton
.
LETTER LI.
Dear Charles
,You pretend I ridicule for the want of
better argument! Now, in the first place, my worthy sir,
I do not ridicule; in the next place, folks do not
always
ridicule
for the want of a better logic; and in the third and last
place, ridicule is often a legitimate weapon, and in some
respects a test of truth.
A trifling and ill-natured man may, indeed, even in the
most serious and solemn matters, see something which may
be so exhibited as to excite laughter; or a malicious man
may wilfully distort sober truth into a laughable caricature:
but then why do we laugh? Simply because we see, or
think we see, for the moment, what is intrinsically
ludicrous
.
If any thing be, however, essentially silly, and some
things are unquestionably of that stamp, then let it be
laughed
at; that it deserves, and that will sooner or later destroy
its existence. Here then I hold, that provided any affair be
truly
narrated, or in any way
truly
represented, the
essential
character of such affair is to be known by its effects
on us. Narrate or represent what is agreeable, it will
awaken pleasant emotions; narrate or represent what is
essentially sober, or ludicrous, and corresponding serious
reflections, or laughter and scorn ensue: legitimate effects
follow, and none other can. If indignation, and laughter,
and scorn are wrong, so also are pleasant emotions, and
serious reflections.
Only tell the truth, therefore, about any folly, and
laughter is legitimate and inevitable. To insist that the
writer who makes a fair representation of an essentially
ridiculous subject or practice ridicules it, is eminently
preposterous
.
He barely shows a true picture, and we are
affected not by the writer, but by what we see. He does
for his subject no more than what a writer, or painter, or
sculptor, does with a serious and solemn subject: he simply
shows it. There is intrinsic folly and wickedness and fraud
in some matters, and the competent artist or author reveals
it by the pencil, the chisel, or the pen. This is not, in the
popular and improper sense, to ridicule.
To ridicule is to make a false representation of truth;
to place sobriety and decency and fitness in a wrong light,
or to invest them in fool's garments, in a harlequin's dress.
But because this is sometimes improperly done, to affirm
that we may not put folly, and fraud, and cant, and
wickedness
in their true light, or exhibit a ridiculous matter
as such, is too absurd to be tolerated.
Sobriety, decency, fitness, religion
cannot
be overthrown
by ridicule; for there is nothing in them essentially foolish.
They may be misrepresented, but that misrepresentation
will soon be detected, and the violent doings of the
caricaturist
will come down upon his own pate.
Wicked
men do indeed resort to ridiculing truth, because they
have no sober argument against it; but wise and good men
avail themselves of a legitimate weapon against folly, when
they exhibit folly in its true light.
It is, therefore, very silly to affirm that a thing
essentially
ridiculous is laughed at, because there is no logic against
it: for the best logic against such a thing is itself, and the
inevitable laughter its true exhibition creates.
But do tell Mrs. C. that I aim not to show up your
intended
fair, as if silly in all its parts. Yet somehow, in
spite of all my urbanity, it stirs my risibility, (inward I
mean, for we have to do in this world a good deal of
internal
laughter,) to enter a large room, furnished with
temporary
stalls and counters, attended by fascinating young
ladies
wrethed in the most bewitching smiles, and find a
gay and sportive assembly of bucks anddoes?(yes, that
is the correlative,) and of beaux and belles, ogling and
bowing, and saying all sorts of complimentary nihilities,
and selling and buying gewgaws and ginger-bread, and even
wax and wooden dolls of various sizes and colors, and
eating
fruit cake and ices, sipping lemonade, and doing up
oystersnot for pleasure, nor for the gratification of
appetite
,
nor even the fun of the thing; but for what? yes,
for what? Oh! glorious nineteenth! for the relief of the
poor! for a whole-and-half orphan society!! for the
education
of colored missionaries for Africa!!! for the Bunker
Hill Monument!!!! or the Reverend Charles Clarence,
A. M.'s red pulpit-cushion, and his new organ!!!!!
Will your reverence's wife call this caricature? Or is
there something in the thing itself virtually
laughter-provoking
?
Or will the lady say, the peevish old codger of a
puritan has no taste, and is wicked enough to ridicule a
very
solemn
means of doing much good?
How would it read, if the apostle Paul in his advice to
Timothy had directed him to hold a modern fair for the
advantage of the congregations? Would it have comported
with all that sobriety and gravity and good report from
those without, so largely insisted on in those pastoral
letters
?
And what if the Church at Corinth, instead of being
directed to lay by in store as God had prospered them,
so that no gatherings for the poor would be necessary
when he came, had been taught to use an
indirection
for that
purpose?
Feasts were indeed made in those daysbut here was
the differencethe poor used to eat such feasts in propria
personanow they eat by representatives! Money now is
sent to the poor, but,
after
all expenses of the entertainment
are paid! The latter is the way
we
find pleasure in doing
good; the simple and unlearned believers of primitive days
found pleasure in the
act
itself! Intellect is improved, and
morals is riz, and peace comes now to men of
good
will
, according to the Catholic version.
You insist, however, and so does Mrs. C. and all the
pious ladies of your charge, on a serious refutation!
Then most seriously do I ask, Should a Christian regulate
his charities by system or by accident? Shall he honestly
and joyously tax his income, or give only when coaxed or
flattered, or trapped or sneered at?
For myself, I cannot approve any art or contrivance or
management to catch a person in public, when the fear of
man is before his eyes; when he is influenced by mere love
of show and popularity; or when time is denied him for all
examination and thought, and a natural timidity forbids him
to question the character of what is lauded by set orators,
and their clap-trappery figures. As well place the person
in a
screw
, and squeeze till he bleeds out in a paroxysm of
seeming benevolence, more than he is soberly willing to
bestow, and not rarely, more than he ought to bestow.
That
,
I repeat, is much like milking goats and silly sheep too.
Charles, like ambition, Christian charity should be
made of sterner stuff; in other words, it must be a
principle
.
Good men, who have any well-grounded reason for
believing themselves bought with a price, must feel that
all, yes, all, absolutely ALL, belongs to Christ. He has
bought them, and in no sense are they their own. And in
this is no figure, no extravagance, no special pleading, no
making the most of the case for effect; but it is strictly
and literally true, that genuine Christians belong wholly to
Christ. Hence they ought, at stated periods, on system, to
lay by whatever is possible for benevolent purposes.
To this there is no exceptionthere can be no exception
there should be no exception.
He that wishes an exception
in his own favor cannot be a Christian
. What sum each
one is to lay by, depends on many circumstances; but it is
a much larger sum than most do lay by: for in proportion
to our obligation and our ability the best of us do too little.
If, however, we only approximated our
lowest
amount, all
expedients for raising moneys for charitable objects would
be abandoned: fairs and all other flattering indirections for
wrenching out of niggardly souls a few pence, by the lure
and bribe of a dollar's worth of fancy and pleasure, would
be indignantly scorned as a gross insult on Christian love
and beneficence.
I shall, however, say no more on the subject, Charles;
yet do not too hastily conclude that I have exhausted all
my sarcasm; we could contrive to bring out of our treasury
things new and old, in that way, if you are not satisfied.
And we have more logic and serious argument, too, than
your pious ladies can easily answer. Do not provoke
another letter.
Yours ever,
R.
Carlton
.
LETTER LII.
Dear Charles
,I readily admit that the abuse of a
good
thing is no valid argument against its use; yet, if by
showing the ridiculous character of the abuse we prevent
that abuse at least, we render some service to the cause of
10
religion. Nor are all men who set forth the absurdities and
odious things that have become attached to the forms of
religion
to be regarded as enemies to religion. Some such
are, perhaps, glad of this pretext to assault true religion
itself
;
but they cannot do half the evil to it that is done by an
obstinate and prejudiced adherence to folly. Such friends
to religion are guilty of a living caricature of truth; and if
truth is not wholly destroyed by their outrageous
abominations
,
it is owing to the magnitude of the truth itself, and the
almost uneradicable hold it has upon the human mind.
A good thing is unquestionably abused when made a
pretence for violating a known duty, or for enlisting doubtful
instrumentalities. For instance, it is an abuse of the
temperance
principles, when we so hold meetings for their
promotion
on the Sabbath as to make temperance, in its present
technical and restrictive sense, paramount to religious
duties
,
and place this phase of morality in a kind of antagonism
to Christianity. It is an abuse of charity to hold sacred (?)
concerts on the Sabbath; to say nothing about the fact, that
very often all is sheer hypocritical canting about the poor,
to cover a worldly taste for music on a day tedious without
amusement. It is an abuse to employ a
danseuse
or a
comedian
,
low or high, to give benefits in favor of hospitals or
churches. In these ways we teach that the end justifies the
means, unless we at once take the worldly side of the
question
,
and openly contend that
poetic nakedness
, as well as the
poetry of motion
and buffoonery, are wholesome for public
morals.
Infidelity avails itself most adroitly of the current tastes
and tendencies, and changing into an angel of light, unites
most complacently and benevolently with nominal
Christianity
in promoting certain charities, and separate moralities.
It may be found curiously curled with serpent-like
sinuosities
,
into peace societies, abolition societies, temperance
movements, church fairs, Sunday concerts, and even
Odd-Fellowships
.
Hence the subtle innuendoes, the sly allusions, the
triumphant
comparisons, by which Christianity and its vital
doctrines are continually assailed by
some
members of all
these combinations: not that the combinations are not in
many things right,
per se
, but that they are convenient
platforms
for the erection of
masked
batteries, whence to dart
fiery arrows against truth.
Why do so many abolitionists sneer at Moses and the
plenary inspiration of the Scriptures? Why do some
temperance
lecturers reproach Christ for turning water into
wine, and try to show there was mistake when wine was
employed in the Lord's Supper? And why do many Odd
Fellows and Sons of Temperance sometimes ask, Whether
Christian professors
could
do more for one another than these
benevolent associations do for their members? Aye! to
my eyes, plain enough is the gleam of a fiery scale, and to
my ear the hiss of a venomous tongue, there! I wait not for
the head to erect itself boldly amid its huge and curving
body; I am alarmed at one gleam and one hissa snake!
It is not my wish to enter into the argument, at this time,
by which the sophistry is exposed of boastful philanthropy
and lop-sided philosophy; enough, that in many modern
schemes, originally designed by good men and for good
purposes
,
can now be discerned a spirit of antagonism to any
religion
that is worthy the name. Yet, mistake me not; there
is a lawfulness and a utility in many combinations, and to
some extent men may avail themselves of the advantages of
mutual assurance or insurance. But, this I hold: that in
all moral organizations involving one or two points only, is
resident a strong and almost uncontrollable tendency
towards
supercilious opposition to pure Christianitya
determination
to elevate the part above the wholea dormant
spirit of infidelity, that in favorable circumstances will
attack
truth and aim to bring it into discredit. As a general
rule, with rare exceptions, let Christians, and especially
clergymen
,
having a better way, stand aloof; lest by their
conduct they seem to say, the church and its plans are not
enough for the government of life.
Charles, you are exempted from military duties, and from
serving on juries;why? Because such matters are
intrinsically
wrong? No; but for some real or seeming
reasons
,
such matters are deemed inconsistent with clerical
duties
and character. Believe me, you are for similar reasons
exempted from speculations in stocksfrom dealing in
horsesfrom many things in which other men may, by
universal
consent, take part, and without injury to their
reputation
.
And, in the view of a proper public opinionnot of
the upper ten thousand, nor of the lower fifty thousand,
but a public opinion of very many wise, good, experienced,
and learned menyou are exempted from any necessity of
joining secret societies, whether odd in name or nature.
Can you not, Charles, preach a funeral sermon when a
stranger dies in your neighborhood, without inquiring whether
he be or be not a member of some assurance or insurance
society? I know, indeed, that you have repeatedly officiated
on these mournful occasions, when the deceased was a
stranger and far from home; but I know, too, Charles, that
neither you nor your friends published the fact in the village
papers. You did not, with ostentatious triumph, announce
the wonderful result of your principles; nor did you with
self-complacent meekness wonder if people elsewhere
behaved
as well; nor did you query if other folks did, may be,
neglect such obvious duties!
Something godlike seems to be in certain associations in
the old world, where men are banded as brothers to carry the
wounded and sick to the hospitals, and there to administer to
their wants; but secrecy in such associations differs from a
Masonic secrecy, concealing not thoughts, but actors; and
the good that is done, like the expansive love of the Bible,
is done, not to an Odd Fellow, but to a man!
If the men of this generation see fit, nothing forbids their
forming mutual assurance societies of a moral nature, and
they may, without sin, vow to bury and nurse one another;
but let Christians do all sorts of good to all sorts of men,
as they have opportunity, and especially to the household
of faith. And whilst odd and even fellows make a sputter
in those cases where they have helped a membera
worthy
member, and one who punetually
pays
his duesand while
they cry it up as
the
charity and
the
love
par excellence
, let
Christians, if they are compelled to boast in self-defence,
point to their hospitals, and infirmaries, and alms-houses, and
orphan and widow asylums; to their Bible societies, and
tract societies, and missionary societies, and societies for the
relief of the poor, innumerable! Yea! let every separate
congregation, of every denomination, disclose
all its secret
aid to poor brethren fallen into decay; which aid, from
delicate love, has never been disclosed; and let nameless and
countless Christian individuals, whose right hand has
concealed
from the left, deeds of kindness to all;let these
speak for Christian love and kindness!
Charles, there is a perverse propensity in man to seek
out inventions; some neglect the gospel morality, and some
despise it, and others are led away by the deafening clamors
of an obliqe philanthropy, which having laid its egg knows
how to cackle over it.
Yours ever,
R.
Carlton
.
LETTER LIII.
Dear Charles
,I am not censorious; and yet it is
probable enough my sentiments might subject me to the
charge of being over-nice and bigoted. And such charge
may be made, if my enemy could persuade me to write
a book on the various subjects discussed between us. In
that case, if the world noticed me at all, I should naturally
expect a torrent of abuse, especially from every Sunday
newspaper in the country, and from all moralists who deem
a
part
superior to the
whole
.
But how can we repress the elevation of dander, at seeing
these noisy fellows ever flinging at Christianity; and at
finding
here and there a silly sheep of our own number trotting
after some crankle-horned bellwether, and bleating on his
side; and ever and anon a small sheep-master essaying to
lead and pipe away his flock, lambs and all, into barren and
weedy pastures?
I have more than once read apologies from Reverend
Odd
-Fellows, in behalf of this and that moral oddity. In
spite of all, I still feel as if their reverences were,
notwithstanding
,
in very
odd
positions; and that the apologies were,
indeed, truly needed. In many mere worldly matters, I
repeat, we as citizens may properly enough act with our
fellow-citizens; but never ought we so to commit ourselves,
or so act as if any thing could, by any possibility, be a
substitute
for the Gospel.
Badges, and collars, and ribbons, and stars, and garters
look essentially ludicrous and actually funny over some
black coats; and not rarely in some minds among the
spectators
of the pageant, beget contempt for the cloth, even when
all are sported and strutted majestically. I doubt not some
clerical oddities, after having kicked up a dust in a
procession
to the tune of old Dan Tucker, have themselves felt
flat the day after in the pulpitvotes and toasts in their
favor not preventing!
Most honestly do I believe, and many are the reasons
with me for so thinking, and even on suitable occasions,
publicly and privately, have I both said and written, that all
in all, as a body, the clergy are the best or among the best of
men: and, for that cause, I am truly solicitous they should
do nothing to impair, or perhaps destroy their influence.
From time to time, Charles, I have furnished sixteen
reasons for my intolerable censoriousness in statements
and opinions; if you persist in your abusive letters I shall
certainly punish you with sixteen more.
Yours ever,
R.
Carlton
.
LETTER LIV.
Dear Charles
,You are absolutely provoking! and
with what assurance you cry out
Ohe! jam satis!
and
then go on and request my notions on choirs!
Charles!what have I done, that you should deliberately,
and of malice aforethought, try to lure me with so many
complimentary words into that discord? Why wish me to
hear the buzz when that hornet's nest is waked about my
ears? Can you not rest in solitary discomfort? And must
the open mouths of your singers be set to concert pitchor
a little higheragainst that insufferable and meddlesome
Carlton?
Where was prudence or kindness when you intimated to
the amiable young folks in the gallery at the last meeting,
that you intended to ask the advice of your friend at
Kaleidaville
?
Was it not certain the Misses Perte and the young
Bases would call usinsufferable?
But, reverend sir, I humbly conceive you clergy have
small right to complain. The many evils of irreligious
choirs were told and prophesied a hundred times; and many
a church, otherwise prospering, had been sadly injured by
such an unchristian committee installed to
do singing
a
kind of labor-saving machinery for idle Christians below.
True, you have had more
science
, and
taste
, and
entertainment
!
but such advantages are not to be considered an
equivalent for the abomination of a trifling, giggling,
note-inditing
,
whisper-loving company of irreverent young
choristers
.
How do I know all this? say you.In many ways:
among others I have been in choirs myself:and spite of
the presence of a clergyman there with us, and of two
church officers in additionthe gay and mirth loving young
folks
would
have their amusement! Nor could we all look
them downthey were past such rebuke.
Rather, by far, would I recall the solitary clerk who in
former days rose in his desk under the pulpit, and not only
set
the tune for the people, but
set
the people themselves so
a-going that hundreds of voices, and with the heart in
them, would, in unity, pour forth a hymn of praise that
would wake and move the very soul of the worshippers.
Yet these moderns talk of our discord in those times!
Discord, indeed!we might retort, and tell of what it is more
likely many most loud in their abuse of congregational
singing
are ignoranta deep melody of the interior heart that
was an acceptable song in the ears of God! But, sir, we
did not
make discord, even in the sense of polished and
scientific
moderns. Our plain old tunes were so known, and,
from long habit, so natural to us, that without any shuffling
parade of note books, we could sing, and we did sing in tune
and time; and, in most long established congregations, and
especially where the clerk had a singing-school during the
whole year, the combined melody was wonderfully rich,
solemn, and spiritualizing. And why not? Had people no
voice, no ear in former days? And how could we make
discord with tunes so easy, so familiar, so solemn as were
ours? I have heard as much discord and as bad time in
most choirs as were heard among Christians. And even
organs, flutes, and bass-viols are sometimes rebellious, and
do the worship contrary to the rules in all books fromI
forget wheredown to the Boston Academy's.
Even in the most favored churches, where perhaps,
singers
are all that can be wished morally, intellectually, and
musically, sometimes, we fear the singing is prone to become
a mere entertainment, rather than a devotion;the error
being in the system and not in the persons.
But, Charles, I do not wholly condemn choir singing.
Perhaps it might be made a more profitable means of leading
our devotions than the former way. Certainly an entire
congregation could be trained, by judicious management, to
sing with a choir as we once sang with a precentor or clerk.
This, indeed, is the case with some of our choirs and
congregations
in Kaleidaville, especially the * * * *;
although there is room for improvement in * * *
When you get out of your existing trouble, which by
the way will plague you and your church officers no little
then, never
no
NEVER,allow your choir to be composed
of irreligious people, and particularly of young ones. If
they should not, as is more commonly the case, destroy your
peace, and threaten temporary ruin to your church, it does
strike me as a gross absurdity, and as something not very
far off from impiety. What! a company of wicked and
irreverent
young men and women a committee to praise God
on behalf of believers!
No!give me, in preference, a hand-organ, and work it
by a crank. Both contrivances are machines equally
destitute
of grace and a devotional spirit; but the one does not
laugh at me while it does the job, and the other doesadding
insult to injury.
Use this opinion, Charles, if it can avail you any thing.
I have looked in the face of too many angry
men
, to be very
greatly moved by the pouting and sneering of your ill-bred
young folks.
Yours truly,
R.
Carlton
.
LETTER LV.
Letter from Clarence.
Dear Robert
,I will honestly confess that your
arguments
expressed and implied have modified my views on the
several subjects about which we have been battling for
some months past. Still I do think you are sometimes a little
snappish
, and write as if you lived in a tub and were cramped
for room. Certainly your chirography looks as if you did
not know the writing masters were abroad in the land; which
makes me believe you do not mingle much with the world,
confining your movement to the circumference of a very
small circlemoving, indeed, pretty actively, yet like a
squirrel in a cage.
In other words, Robert, I fear you are behind the age.
If you wish to overtake the times you must move more
ahead. Perhaps we are both wrong, I too lax, you too
rigid. If we were adroitly twisted into one, our cord would
be stronger and draw a greater burden. Grown folks are
very much like children, and we must occasionally humor
them; for if they are sick and
will
not take your medicines
exhibited
, you must conceal the doses in coating of
sugar-plums
and by admixtures of delicious syrups. Many a
cunning fellow will have
cascaded
the public by means of
his popular nostrums covering most nauseating doses, before
fellows like you can persuade them to take physic.
I am aware how these remarks will stir you, Robert;
and it would not be difficult, from my intimate acquaintance
with your style, to say pretty much all you can answer, and
in the same way, even to your commenting on the change
of figures from
cord
to
cascade
, in the last paragraph; but to
tell the truth I am disposed, for a season at least, to have a
suspension of hostilities. Do not think, however, my
ammunition
is expended, but my time is so occupied that I must
beg a truce.
As I intend soon to crave your aid, I may as well say at
once, that a literary gentleman at Somewhersburg is about
to become editor of a periodical; that I am engaged to
furnish
something weekly; and that I shall request you to
forward
something in the shape of prose or poetry, since
whatever
you furnish will be in lieu of mine.
By the way, will you permit me to publish in Mr. Keen's
Magazine some of your letters? I have reason to believe
many would be acceptable, and might do some goodcome,
what do you say?
At all events, send on just now, to begin with, some verse;
10*
and yet be admonished, Keen is difficult to please, and may
very possibly reject your rhymes.
But
mark
me, Carlton, you must allow us the stanzas and
so forth,
pro bono publico
we do not pay in this quarter.
And for this liberal policy we have two good reasons, superior
to any sixteen to the contraryin the first place we have no
money, and in the second, poetry and tales of the very first
chop, and in any quantity, can be had for the asking; and,
indeed, some clever geniuses will often pay to be printed.
In haste,
Yours, &c.
C.
Clarence
.
LETTER LVI.
Dear Charles
,In hasteno doubt. And so you
cry
peccavi!
Very well I will let you off; although like
the retreating Parthian you send back an arrow or two in
your flight. You have improved also in modesty as much
as in generosity; and your note is quite a
multum in parvo
.
Pray, did you learn modesty from the writing masters, as well
as penmanshipmany of those professors can teach manners
as well as writing. As for myself, I write as well as I can;
and considering that I have done all my letters with about
three quills, it would be easy for a stranger to form a rational
conjecture about the excellence of my chirography, without
your aid.
But to business. As to the letterswhat an idea! Charles?
Would you really publish fiddle-faddle? I have marked
you
now mark
me;
if my letters are opened to the public,
then the public may pay the postage! Do you take? So
Mr. Keen does not get
them
, at least
pro bono
. And if he
wait till
we
pay to have them appear, he will live beyond
Tithonus.
Pray, who is Mr. Keen? Has he a pointed nose, or an
edge to his tongue? Both are essential to a sagacious critic;
and if well furnished with such tools, he may cut and thrust
as
keenly
as
As to the verse,
that
you may have for the gathering.
Flowers are made to waste their sweetness on the desert
air. Our publications are perfectly redolent from full rose
beds, where grows the article in exuberance and variety,
enchanting
and bewilderingsome wild, some tamesome red,
some white, and some of no color at all. Plant my beauties
among the rest; although I have had them on hand so long,
that to me they have become very oddly deprived of an
elegance
and perfume they seemed once to have. At all events
their
sublimity
has evaporated. As they are intended for
one reading only in Keen's magazine, perhaps, they will bear
that. Then let them pass for dry leaves.
Inclosed, or rather appended, are two bricks from my
store; judge from them whether our poetic doings are fit for
your pages.
STANZAS,
On witnessing some young girls at a Boarding-School, danoing to the
sound of a Flute, played by the Music Teacher; while they
affectionately
kissed each other, and shed tears in prospect of their final
separation.
Enchantment rais'd, 'mid wastes of life, the scene!
Oasis-like, where cool and od'rous breeze
Fans brow of fainting trav'ler, on the green
By moss-crown'd fount reclin'd; the whisp'ring trees
The while touch kissing leaves, and golden wings
Flash bright, as warble back from echo rings!
With noiseless step, through mazy dance, and arms
Alternate wreath'd 'round airy forms, sprites move
O'er elfin meads, to sweet Arcadian charms
Of sylvan reed; and nymphs, with lips of love
To lips of Houris, nectar'd dews impart,
While heart responsive throbs to sister heart.
Saloon, with portraits from the touch divine,
And statues chisel'd by that skill! Can pride
Of pictur'd canvass, sculptur'd stone, with thine
Compare? In blush of youth, see! at our side
Breathes nature's self! Her joy and hope, her tear
And voice, her grace and beauty, all are here!
Oh matchless fair! when science lights the mind,
And virtue guards the path; when, like wrought gold
To circled gem, music and arts refin'd
Add grace to beauty! Ne'er can joys be told
That cluster thick around the household life,
Where such are lov'd,friend, sister, mother, wife!
Sweet scene, with lovely flow'rets here, adieu!
Conflict and toil, along life's arid plains,
Reluctant, yet refresh'd, we seek anew;
The battle fought, the vict'ry won, remains,
In that far land beyond the gorgeous West,
Where sunset shows the curtain'd gatea rest!
TO A LADY OF THE SOUTH,
Who, in her smile, look, and voice, recalled the departed Anna.
Smile!Maid of the orange bower,
Where the sunny land teems,
Fragrant with its fruit and flower!
From the hazy past, gleams
Vision forth of rosy hue,
Round a sainted form shed!
'Tis she of the bosom true!
Smiles the dear one, long dead!
Look!Maid of the isle-girt coast!
Eyes of heav'nly blue shine,
Angel's mid the seraph host!
In the by-gone hours, thine
Ravish'd thro' my deepest heart,
On the joyous morn wed,
Sudden ere the eve to part!
Looks the dear one, long dead!
Speak!Maid of the sea-side home!
Voice of early love's day,
Thrilling, as when wont to roam,
Where the silver moon lay
Pictur'd in the dark lake's wave,
Ere that Indian shaft sped!
Hark! from her bloody wood's grave
Speaks the dear one, long dead!
Stay!Maid of the sylph-like form!
Maid of magic voice, stay!
Spell entrancing, vivid, warm,
Soft, embodied!Oh! stay!
Vision, at the word farewell,
Like an empty dream's fled!
Ever in my heart she'll dwell
With the dear one, long dead!
LETTER LVII.
Dear Charles
,Mr. Keen is certainly a keener! He
objects to the first poem because it
seems
to recommend
dancing! and to the second because it ismoonshiny!
May-be
he expects
pay
for publishing themhe will whistle awhile
before that wind comes!
If, however, he be honest in his objection to the first, I
forgive his scruples, and the sentence it compels him to pass
upon the stanzas. Dancing, in the usual meaning attached
to the thing in the world, I cannot approve myself. In the
circumstances I saw it, the whole seemed on a par with
jumping the rope, or playing hide-and-go-seek. And could
dancing be always, as it was then, nothing could be, of a
mere worldly nature, so innocentit was the joyous play of
little girls and young ladies! They looked so happyso
guilelessso mutually lovingso like sisters of one family!
pity an innocent amusement and healthful recreation
should be so abused, so prostituted! Alas! that fallen man
so pollutes and poisons!
As to writing songsremember I do not write such
now. They were done in the past timesbefore the dark
hour, Charles! But, having a few among my papers, I
thought they would be harmless, if not actually profitable.
That is a very overstrained morality, which objects to every
thing not purely doctrinal and didactic. Thousands of
things in nature seem to have no use, except to recreate and
delight us;the color and form of leaf and feather and
flowerthe perfume of fragrant grassthe rich juice of
luscious fruitsthe sparkle of dew-gemsthe mysterious
dyes of the evening cloudsthe voice of birdsthe chirp
of insectsall, all are for harmless pleasure. And why not
moderately pursue the harmless pleasures of literature?
The severe censure cast by some worthy men upon all
poetry, not decidedly of a religious character, seems to me
unreasonable. Nor can I believe that all and every kind of
light literature is to be eschewed; nor that such has not a
valuable use. It may be of a bad characterand it may be
excessively indulged, both in writer and readerbut the
abuse and the excess are wholly unnecessary. Argument
against it, on such grounds, may easily be extended to
overthrow
every thing in literature and learning, except Biblical
Criticism, Church History, and Sermonizing.
Light and playful literature differs from frothy and
tasteless
;
and it is not necessary to be silly in being cheerful.
Nor if literature, when merely playful, is not decidedly
religious
,
must it of consequence, become immoral? There is
unquestionably a common ground where moralities of the
world and of the church may stand; or where
externally
good men may meet, and with what they hold in common.
How far professors of religion and doctors of divinity
may write
out
of their line, and occasionally indulge in the
harmless elegance and recreation of the allowable light
literature
,
is a question that each man must determine himself.
If others determine for him, let the others at least remember
the Saviour's admonitionJudge not that ye be not
judged. Some persons possess versatility of mind; and
amidst labors almost countless, and whilst discharging many
important offices, weighty with many grave responsibilities,
can yet, and in wonderfully short times, throw off many an
innocent pleasantry, and either from the mouth or the pen.
Let me commend to some censors Charlotte Elizabeth's
chapter on idols, in her Flower Garden; which, by the way,
has almost made me resolve, if not to write a sermon, yet
perhaps something worsea book on idolatry.
Appended is another trifle.
Yours ever,
R.
Carlton
.
On seeing the
American Flao
wave over a Temperance Meeting
in the Park Trenton, N. J., 184---.
Pride of the Free!
With sheen unfurl'd of starry ray,
Bound on the viewless wind away!
In azure sea,
Thwart field of light,
As streamlets bright,
Proudly thy stripes their gorgeous flow
Curve o'er yon Temp'rance Host below!
Thy glories stream'd
Amid our fathers' legions high,
Where wreath'd the clouds of battle's sky!
Thy proud stars gleam'd,
When foemen fled,
And left their dead
Pil'd thick upon the gory plain,
Round corse of patriot warrior slain!
In sulph'rous fires,
Wild, that billowy breast has toss'd,
Where lightning brands of steel have cross'd!
The sons, like sires,
On land and main,
Fought not in vain,
And forth as water blood they gave
Ever to have thee honor'd wave!
No martial beams
Around now flash from war's dread arms,
Nor trumpet peals its harsh alarms!
No proud plume streams
From helmed head,
Nor spearmen tread
With measur'd step, while thunders roll,
And frenzy fires the madd'ning soul!
The good and brave,
Knit soul to soul, in yonder band,
Firm fix'd in godlike purpose stand!
Soon ey'ry slave
Shall burst from thrall,
And ransomed, all,
From mountain's top to ocean's coast,
Or on its waves, shall freedom boast!
Child of the light!
Be crown of stars for ever thine!
O'er virtue's host for ever shine!
For endless fight
With demon foe,
Oh! ever flow,
Swelling upon the crystal flood,
Thou Flag! bought with our Fathers' blood!
LETTER LVIII.
Dear Charles
,Mr. Keen says the Flag is
tolerable
!
Well, that is more than Mr. Keen is. If he is so
hard to please, why does he not do his own articles, and let
us have a specimen of perfection? I suppose, however, Mr.
Keen, like most other critics, imagines his duty is simply to
criticise, although incapable of writing himself.
I have more than once read little poems and long tales, of
a very unmerciful and desperately unsparing and wholly
unpleasable cynic, which were certainly a little inferior
to his neighbor's wares, that in the same magazine had been
ruthlessly dashed and torn. Many a looker-on thinks he
could play chess better than either of the two engaged, who,
when his turn comes, moves with egregious blundering.
However, as I never set up for a tall poet, I have not far
to fall. Come, I will try againtwo sonnets are suffixed,
like a long bob-tail to a little kite.
Yours ever,
R.
Carlton
.
SONNETPRIMO.
TO AN ABSENT WIFE.
I.
O come, love!
Our home is very sad!
Oh! do not stay
So long away,
But haste to make us glad
Once more, love!
II.
O come, love!
Our brood requires thy wing!
They climb my seat,
And there repeat
Thy nameI bid them sing
Thy song, love!
III.
O come, love!
Our food is tasteless now;
It needs thy care
To dress our fare,
And drive from low'ring brow
The clouds, love!
IV.
O come, love!
Our flow'rs bloom not so gay!
I watch and train,
But all in vain
They smell, nor look to-day
So sweet, love!
V.
O come, love!
Our music all is flown!
Sad is the flute
Without thy lute;
I cannot bear alone
To play, love!
VI.
O come, love!
Our babes within my breast
Close tearful eyes,
And with their sighs
For thee, prevent my rest
At night, love!
VII.
O come, love!
Our home is very drear,
Till thy lov'd face
In every place
Beam smiles, and there we hear
Thy voice, love!
SONNETSECUNDO.
THE WIFE'S REPLY.
I.
I come, dear!
Our home!it thrills my heart
With joys and fears,
Mid gushing tears!
Sweet home!we must not part
Again, dear.
II.
I come, dear!
Our brood!I hear their voice,
Like birds in nest
'Neath feather'd breast!
The song!I must rejoice
With thee, dear!
III.
I come, dear!
Our food!the coarsest meal
Is sweet with you,
My fond and true!
To spread our board I feel
So proud, dear?
IV.
I come, dear!
Our flow'rs! how bright and fair
In parterre neat,
With fragrance sweet
Grateful they grow for care
From thee, dear!
V.
I come, dear!
Our music!how we'll sing
At twilight's hour
In favorite bower,
Till mountain echo ring
With home, dear!
VI.
I come, dear!
Our babes!they shall not weep!
A mother's arm,
Thrown round, like charm,
Soon lulls to gentle sleep
The babes, dear!
VII.
I come, dear!
Oh, joy!our home!our home!
No! no!I stay
Too long away!
Sad lot were mine to roam
From that, dear!
LETTER LIX.
Dear Charles
,Keen is hypercritical. He wishes to
know if sweet is the author's favorite epithet, and if the
author thinks it renders his verses luscious? If the
sonnets please him, let him change the words for some
synonym
.
As he gets the things for nothing, let him tinker them
to his purpose.
You wish, however, articles more decidedly religious, as
your magazine is intended for the religious world. I have
no leisure just now to do any thing new in that way, so I
send you three that have already appeared in religious
journals
.
Yours ever,
R.
Carlton
.
STANZAS.
Sung at the dismission of a School. after the death of a Pupil.
Sweet repose! all tasks are ended!
Home's bright vision thrills the heart!
Yet our souls with other blended,
Feel the pang when call'd to part!
Ever thus midst this world's pleasures,
Steals some pain to mar the joy;
Seek we then the blood-bought treasures,
Where is found no base alloy.
Time! how swift thy onward flying,
Since was spoke the last adieu!
Wise to keep the hour of dying,
E'en amid our joys in view!
One, alas! snatch'd from this number,
Sings no more its farewell song!
No voice wakes his dreamless slumber
In the silent church-yard throng.
Far beyond this shadowy dwelling,
When we cease the songs of earth,
May we join in anthems swelling,
Brothers made by heav'nly birth!
Hope like this will pleasure heighten,
Nerve for every work of life,
Darkness on the pathway brighten,
Conquer in the final strife!
LINES,
At the return of a Missionary's Wife from Africa, immediately after
burying her Husband, who died in a few months after he had
commenced there his labors.
Come, thou bereav'd one! Christian love spreads wide
Her arms to fold thee near our tend'rest hearts!
There rest thy head, while with thy sorrow's tide
Our grief commingles: thine, fresh gushing, starts,
For thou, Naomi-like, art widow'd come,
So stricken back, to seek thy childhood's home!
Sister! tears sadden'd, late, thy farewell hour;
Yet buoy'd with hope, and strong in faith, and warm
With heav'nly zeal, thou shedd'st a sunlit shower
Joy so gleam'd mid tears; and firmly on th' arm
Of warrior truebut not to shed men's blood
Trustful inclin'd, thou daredst the billowy flood.
Sister! that youth was 'listed for the life!
Sworn at thy bridal his, for weal or woe,
Thou wast, the campaign through, a soldier's wife;
And bless'd wast thou, when bid of God to go,
Tho' thy sole task to stay his fainting breast
With words of Christ, and see him pass to rest.
Sister! how soon the call for battle came
With the grim foe! How soon, alas! 'twas thine,
Though not amid the tented field of fame,
Where men of strife, gory and gash'd, recline
On honor's bed, yet still to see him slain!
But conq'ror then, he found death's dart was vain.
Sister! thy soul in that sad hour was rent
With keenest pangs! Yet with thy bitter cries
Rose mingled thanks to God, that thou wast sent
To that far land, to shut those darken'd eyes,
The death-damps from that changing face to lave,
And lay thy lov'd one in that strange, lone grave!
Sister! oh! sob no more, as tho' the strings
Burst from thy swelling heart! From Afric's shores
Heav'nward bend thy thoughts:see! on seraph wings
Triumphing, he, thro' burning hosts, upsoars,
Eyeing that crown, gift of redeeming love!
Oh! stay thy tears! He reigns with Christ above!
Sister! thy husband's God will ever shield
His wife. Faith, zeal, and toil for pagan lands,
From love of souls, or mid the scorching field,
Or ocean's waste, Christ graves upon his hands!
The honor'd spouse that shar'd dear Alward's fight,
Shares joy and praise, when faith is lost in sight.
LUTHER AT THE DIET OF WORMS.
Hier stohe ich: ich kan nicht anders: Gott helfe mir!
Thou there! but yesterday the cloister's cell
Echoed thy groans, and thy crushed spirit fell
E'en at a zephyr's breath!
Thou there alone against the world! O sight
For angels! Lo! thy weakness chang'd to might
That braves all forms of death,
And bids defiance unto Hell! God's power,
O man of faith! doth help thee in this hour.
Yes! there thou art! Awe-struck the gods, intent,
Both sceptered king and mitred priest are bent
Tow'rd thee with steadfast gaze!
'Tis Heaven's own grandeur stamped upon that brow,
That shames all pride and pomp of pageant now.
So looked men at the rays
From prophet's unveiled face, till at the sight
Appalled they fled, blind with celestial light.
What though the mighty ones are sworn and met,
With vengeful soul, an empty seal to set
On thine eternal fate?
What though is broke the hush of solemn spell
By muttered threat and curse of earth and hell,
And taunt of scorn and hate?
Thou moveless art, mid storm of fiercest ire,
As that famed rock that bears the beacon fire.
Vain hope! to weave for thee the darkest maze
Of cunning toils. Thou walkest mid full blaze
That streams from upper throne.
No lure to thee is bribe of rank and gold;
Like Him to whom long since by tempter bold
This world's whole pomp was shown,
Due price for homage done, stern dost thou say
To timid friends and treacherous foesAway!
Stand deathless on thy lofty mountain height
A glory sent our lower world to light,
Till heaven and earth are past!
Ever thy words shall stir the deep profound
Of inmost soul, and bid the bosom bound
With thought for speech too vast!
O Rome! for thee that voice has mystic tone
With this prophetic knellFall'n is thy throne!
LETTER LX.
Dear Charles
,I am glad your critical friend likes
the spirit of the last articles. He durst not say they
were not worth printing, since men as good judges as himself
had actually printed them. I now send, for the last attempt
at the Art of Poetry,
A Thunder Storm on the Lake
not
with the expectation of having Keen print it, but to elicit his
opinion.
Let me know at your earliest leisure what he says;
although
for the present I cannot promise to answer your
letters
,
except with the greatest brevity.
Yours ever,
R.
Carlton
.
THUNDER STORM ON THE LAKE.
Profound the hush around the silv'ry stream!
A hush, like musing melancholy's dream!
See! sprung from mirror wave, a vault of blue
Uparch'd and join'd to inverse semblance true,
Makes concave sphere, where, hast'ning to its rest,
Sun sinking meets sun rising in the West!
And curving banks with fringe of living green
Picture below, revers'd, a magic scene;
By bathing wing or leaping fish so stirr'd,
As in that phantom land breath'd wind, unheard
Above, where forms and colors moveless stand
Sweet, matchless paintings, trac'd by master hand!
Hark! what and whence that dread and solemn swell?
A mystic shout that grandly rose and fell,
As in the deep of mirror'd world some spirit choir
Responsive sang to theme of burning lyre!
Up starts the waking sense, intent to hear
That voice againthe heart the while in fear!
Nor vain; that voice, great tempest king, was thine,
Bidding fierce hosts of fire around thee shine,
And marshall'd from the hazy West to rise,
Mid darkness, o'er serene of smiling skies
There, hark! a longer and a harsher peal
The lagging chides, and orders quick to wheel,
With magazine of rain and forked light,
To where their angry lord holds back from flight
The winged steeds beneath his car of cloud
Winds chaf'd and uttering howls of discord loud!
Behold! like first faint dim from om'nous wings
When death, at distance coming, sadness flings
On infant face of lov'd and smitten child,
O'er picture scene below, solemn and wild,
Steals awe with shadetrue portent that the car,
On whirlwinds borne, is rushing from afar!
With terror fraught, akin to day of doom,
It casts a deep and yet a deeper gloom
Strange seeming shadows, mix'd with fiery red
Of sun obscure, thro' dimming sackcloth shed!
Loud thunder, now, speaks all the terror near;
And yonder imag'd world, as mov'd in fear
Its frame should pass, shakes in the quiv'ring lake,
And dreads, when next th' electric cloud shall break.
Ha! scatheful glare! how quick at vivid gleam,
Vanish'd, dissolv'd, my bright and gentle dream!
See! e'en yon tow'ring crag of frowning rock
Now quakes and smokes from vast and instant shock!
He comes! he comes! enshrin'd in that black cloud
Dense veil'd around his thronean awful shroud!
Its edges light with curl of silv'ry wreaths,
As smoke the deep-voic'd cannon breathes!
Away!to shelt'ring cave away!the crash
Is here!the deaf'ning roar!the dazzling flash!
The strife of winds and wavesbeneath, around,
Above, is madness all! The solid ground
Staggers! and o'er the lake, its foamy white,
Lash'd by wrathful winds in gaint might,
Ragesa sea of mingled mist and fire!
The trees, fierce shaken, in the ruthless ire
Of unseen potent forms, down crush'd, low bend,
And cries of woe, with frantic gestures, send!
Fast streams, from upper air, the torrent rain!
With noise, it beats reiterant the plain;
Or crystal rods, to fragments is it hurl'd,
Or myriad sparkles blown!a chaos world
Becomes the mass conglomerate of sky,
And earth, and fire, and flood! Wild fury's cry
His triumph marks, and rage, mid sullen light,
Thro' darkness struggling of sepulchral night!
But past the stormy car of sable cloud;
That voice, in distant thunder long and loud,
The elemental strife bids instant stay!
Swift squadrons wheel, on ready winds, away,
Darting from rank to rank the signal light,
And all, or far, or near, speed on the flight!
Lo! what a sudden tide of golden beams
From you rich mellow blaze of beauty streams!
'Tis essence burning from ambrosial grove,
Round couch, with sumptuous veiling, wove
From fleecy cloud, soft mist, and azure sky,
Suffus'd by angel art with gorgeous dye!
Rest meet to wait the splendent prince of day,
Majestic sinking from the scene away!
See, too, behind where night of tempest lowers,
Soft gems of rainbow dew in copious showers
Forth shed by tempest's lord, as sign of love,
Are ranged in yonder ample arch above!
The blending hues curve that vast circle's round,
Whose plane of light metes out distinct the bound
Between that zone of storm and this of rest,
Where earth smiles joyous in fresh verdure drest.
And lo! yet mingled, as in fitful dream,
With quiv'ring dyes of heaven and sunshine gleam,
Amidst the dancing waves, like sep'rate parts
Of picture torn, the vision world forth starts!
Thus, to our view, breaks first the spirit land,
When pass'd, disrob'd of flesh, we awe-struck stand
Beyond the wave, on Jordan's farther shore,
And curious catch the distant blended roar
The words mysterious, and strange solemn notes
A seraph song mid empyrean floats!
Dread sounds!a voice wakes in the ravish'd soul
An echo comes like farewell thunder's roll.
THE END.